Authors
Jamie Peck
Number of Reviews
148

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
Rating: ** (out of ****)
MGM / 2:08 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, thematic material, strip-club
nudity, sexuality)
Cast: Val Kilmer; Mira Sorvino; Kelly McGillis; Nathan Lane; Bruce
Davison; Steven Weber; Ken Howard
Director: Irwin Winkler
Screenplay: Steve Levitt; Irwin Winkler; Rob Cowan
Here's an ironic oddity: a movie about overcoming a handicap that,
despite a dearth of assets, never quite overcomes its own handicaps.
Notable for the trivia it offers rather than for presenting a
well-rounded portrait of disability, "At First Sight" tells an immensely
crowded tale adapted from a case study in Dr. Oliver Sacks' 1995
non-fiction novel "An Anthropologist on Mars." But check out Penny
Marshall's "Awakenings" for a stronger Sacks adaptation, as "Sight"
boasts similar high-quality acting and an engrossing set-up, but lacks
the eventual focus and smarts of its '90 counterpart. Oh, well. At least
it settles the alleged existence of a special Braille "Playboy" once and
for all.
Photogenic leads Val Kilmer and Mira Sorvino click as a blind masseur
(he) and a traveling architect (she) who fall deeply in love after an
apparently superlative back-rub moves her to tears - a goofy sequence
saved, like many others, by their generated chemistry. Not far into the
affair, Sorvino locates a cure for Kilmer's nearly life-long affliction:
miracle eye surgery that restores his vision but comes with damaging
physical and mental side-effects, like lots of blurry, distorted camera
angles. At this point, interest in the story reaches its pinnacle as
Kilmer grapples with his newfound sense. Then, the film goes in
directions that don't make much sense.
Kilmer's omnipresent Stevie Wonder-esque smile during all of this will
cause unintentional laughs for some, but his performance is still an
improbable stretch he executes admirably. Sorvino's supposed to be a
brain, but thanks to some unfortunate scripting, she comes off like the
air-headed dealership clerk she so wonderfully played in "Romy and
Michele's High School Reunion." Kelly McGillis lends fine support as
Kilmer's stolid sister, and even Nathan Lane ("The Birdcage") pops up
for a few scenes as a visual therapist described by colleagues as
"unorthodox," though his "unorthodox" methods seem to stem less from
narrative necessity than a need for comic relief.
Further distracting from the highly intriguing central
to-see-or-not-to-see dynamics - and bogging down the midsection
considerably, inflating this puppy out past two interminable hours - are
a seemingly endless (but inexplicit) series of sex-in-the-shadows
montages and a pair of superfluous subplots involving Kilmer's search
for his estranged father and Sorvino's relationship with her ex-husband.
We don't care, many are likely to say. Even a TV-movie-of-the-week,
which is the status the overloaded "At First Sight" struggles to
overcome, would have jettisoned this padding in favor of a leaner,
meaner - and therefore more effective - message.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Maybe another 200 cigarettes would have helped; coughing would be
better than some of this dialogue." -Roger Ebert on "200 Cigarettes"

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
Hollywood / 1997 / 2:08 / R 
Cast: Demi Moore; Viggo Mortensen; Jason Beghe; Anne Bancroft; Lucinda
Jenny; David Vadim; Morris Chestnut; Scott Wilson; Josh Hopkins 
Director: Ridley Scott 
Screenplay: Danielle Alexandra; David Twohy 
        A buff, tawny Demi Moore shaves her head and goes Navy in "G.I. Jane,"
and the unanticipated result is a well-crafted drama that will do more
for strong women's roles than her turn as Hester Prynne in 1995's "The
Scarlet Letter" ever did. "Jane"'ll likely win her audience raves (and
she deserves them), thus covering up the box office sting started by
"Letter" and continued by last summer's "Striptease." 
        Moore's "G.I. Jane" role is that of Lieutenant Jordan O'Neil. Gutsy
Senator Lillian DeHaven (Anne Bancroft) handpicks her to play a major
part in a study that will hopefully reform the military's guidelines of
restricting women in combat. The trial she faces is to pass the
rigorous Navy SEAL training, a task that more than half of the men who
attempt to succeed end up dropping out of. But O'Neil faces her
challenge with optimism, telling DeHaven, "I expect a certain amount of
pain" from the proceedings. 
        Upon her arrival at Catalano Naval Base in Florida, her statement is
put to the test. Her drill instructor for the duration, Master Chief
John Urgayle (Viggo Mortensen), immediately tells her what the best
thing about pain is -- "It lets you know you're not dead yet." Ouch. Her
presence is immediately met with prejudice not only from Urgayle and all
of the SEALs-in-training, but also from the base commander (Scott
Wilson). Even her boyfriend (Ed Harris-lookalike Jason Beghe), also in
the military, doesn't think she'll last long. But last she does, and
upon learning that she has been given a certain amount of leeway because
of her sex, O'Neil demands equal treatment, no matter how rough things
get. And things do get rough. 
        Rather than hop on a preachy feminist bandwagon, "G.I. Jane" stays
extremely accessible. Because O'Neil is a strong part -- and because
Moore compensates with strong acting -- there's no problem in rooting
for her. Director Ridley Scott knows a thing or two about female
heroines -- his "Alien" turned Sigourney Weaver into one of filmdom's
first and finest -- and thus Jordan O'Neil is as convincing and potent
as either one of the leads from his "Thelma & Louise."
        A solid supporting cast backs Moore up. Mortensen makes his mark by
fleshing out a role that could have been the embodiment of evil
chauvinism. The sequences he and Moore share -- especially a shockingly
violent episode that comes late in O'Neil's training -- are among the
movie's most riveting. Bancroft is exceptional as a powerful political
figure who may or may not be using the press surrounding the controversy
to her advantage. The actors who make up O'Neil's squadron are uniformly
good even though none of them are really allowed to develop a
personality, and Beghe, although eventually a plot convenience, creates
an interesting character. 
        As it stands, "G.I. Jane" is a good movie, but what keeps it from being
a better one is a problematic undoing it shares with "Air Force One" --
it's allowed to play on for about 25 minutes too long. Had "Jane" stuck
to its cerebral battle-of-wills, it could have achieved greatness (and
another half-star). But it feels the need to add on a silly,
shakily-shot action climax for no other reason than to disprove a sexist
remark made to O'Neil by Urgayle. The jiggling camera work is
well-utilized during earlier parts of the film, but in the finale
becomes headache-inducing. 
        "G.I. Jane" has its flaws, but I don't mean to suggest by any means
that it is an ineffective movie. It provides a fine showcase for Moore,
who gives a daring, noble performance, and a distinctly change-of-pace
project for Scott, who's most well known for his deep impact on the
science fiction genre. Executed with intelligence and importance, "G.I.
Jane" is thought-provoking, bold and one of the summer's best surprises. 

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
Miramax / 1:41 / 1997 / R (sex, brief nudity, adult themes)
Cast: Helena Bonham Carter; Linus Roache; Alison Elliott; Charlotte Rampling; 
Elizabeth McGovern; Michael Gambon; Alex Jennings 
Director: Iain Softley 
Screenplay: Hossein Amini 
Fast on the heels of October's "Washington Square" comes "The Wings of the 
Dove," another Henry James-based tale that glamorously showcases the 19th- 
and 20th-century author's brilliance in creating robust characters. "Square" 
and "Dove" are James' second and third adaptations to hit theaters in less 
than a year -- couple last December's opulent but uneven "The Portrait of a 
Lady" with these two dazzlers and you've got enough arty appeal to crown 
James as *the* dead literary author of the moment. (He takes the crown from 
Jane Austen, as 1995 through 1996 saw the hot streak of "Persuasion," 
"Clueless," "Sense and Sensibility" and "Emma.") 
In bringing "Wings" to a contemporary screen, director Iain Softley and 
screenwriter Hossein Amine have changed a few details, like pushing the 
story's setting ahead a decade into 1910. But the film still boasts an 
anti-heroine for its lead role, spirited free-thinker Kate Croy (Helena 
Bonham Carter). Following the death of her mother, Kate moves in with her 
financially loaded Aunt Maude (Charlotte Rampling) and is quickly inducted 
into the upper rungs of high London society. But Kate is lustily involved 
with journalist Merton Densher ("Preist"'s Linus Roache), a commoner who 
doesn't comply with her aunt's elitist ideals. Kate wants to be with Merton, 
but requires the wealth of Maude's upscale offerings to care for her 
impoverished father. 
Into this complicated picture comes American heiress Millie Theale (Alison 
Elliott), who fast becomes close friends with Kate and even accompanies her 
and Merton on a trip to Venice. But under Kate's civil exterior lies a 
diabolical scheme -- upon learning that Millie is stricken with an eventually 
terminal disease, Kate leads her to believe a relationship with Merton is 
possible. He'll seduce her, she'll die and leave her fortune to him. Millie's 
money will be able to solve all of Kate's problems, but the plan comes with a 
high price. 
The narrative employs most of Henry James' usual focuses (wealth, social 
status, etc.), so anyone familiar with his literature or films or melodrama 
in general will probably be able to anticipate "The Wings of the Dove"'s 
downer of an outcome. The predictably tragic story arc, however, is 
overshadowed by superb technical credits. The production design and 
cinematography are tops. Director of photography Eduardo Serra's camera 
captures palazzos and gondolas in all of their old-time extravagance, and the 
steamy, rain-soaked clinches between Kate and Merton will induce swooning 
among more romantic audience members. 
"The Wings of the Dove"'s cast and characters are its two most laudable 
assets. Carter, Roache and Elliott are never cheap enough to do one-note 
riffs on any of Amine's strongly-scripted roles. Period piece veteran Carter 
("A Room With a View," "Howards End" and the Mel Gibson "Hamlet") plays Kate 
as both a manipulative and sympathetic force -- it's a difficult combination 
to bring to an already-difficult part, but she aces it. The other two leads 
aren't quite what they seem either; Roache's Merton is smarter and more 
passionate than his hesitant, easily-influenced guise, and Millie is far from 
brittle -- she's nobody's victim. As played by the feisty Elliott ("The 
Spitfire Grill"), the latter is also a sunny scene-stealer. 
Director Jane Campion infused her Portrait of a Lady with surreal ostentation 
that occasionally doused its potency. Softley ("Hackers" and "Backbeat") 
renders "The Wings of the Dove" in a much more straightforward manner -- 
delivering his best film yet -- and although it's not as polished as 
"Washington Square," it's still beautiful and moving. And perhaps it's no 
coincidence that "Wings" and "Washington" are playing simultaneously -- 
they'd be quite a lovely afternoon double bill, and make one look forward to 
James' next screen venture with dizzy anticipation. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
WILD THINGS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
High school guidance counselor Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is well-liked in the 
town of Blue Bay, especially by pretty, popular Kelly Van Ryan (Denise 
Richards), whose family name is among the Florida yachting enclave's most 
financially prominent. Hoping to take her crush to a physical level, Kelly 
seductively slinks into Lombardo's house after washing his jeep for a 
fundraiser, but, the very next day, tearfully admits to her trollop mother 
(Theresa Russell) that she was raped. Before long, Blue Bay detectives Ray 
Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega) are listening to 
similar allegations from Kelly's rebel classmate Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell). 
Lombardo, who maintains his innocence, hires neck brace-sporting, opportunistic 
lawyer Ken Bowden (Bill Murray) to defend him in court. 
The previews give away the following revelations, so if you haven't seen any of 
the movie's spots on the television or in the theater, you might want to skip to 
the next paragraph. While cross-examining Suzie on the witness stand, Bowden 
gets her to break down and admit that the alleged rapes never took place -- that 
Kelly had concocted this entire scheme because she was angry that Lombardo was 
sleeping with her mother and not with her. To pay Lombardo for the damages, 
Kelly's mother breaks her daughter's trust fund and gives him $8.5 million. But 
Lombardo, Kelly and Suzie are actually all working together, and plan to take 
the money and run as fast as they can. Duquette and Perez, however, begin to 
suspect that there's more afoot to the case than just false accusations. 
If there's a major drawback to "Wild Things," it's that it's oversexed to a 
fault. The much-talked-about hotel room menage-a-trois between Dillon, Campbell 
and Richards is a turn-off. It's also cut short (sorry, guys), and should have 
been cut shorter -- the movie grinds to a halt for pure titillation once too 
often. What we don't see is far more effective than what we do. Another example 
of this is Kevin Bacon needlessly going the full monty in a shower scene. Er, no 
thanks. Also, Bacon's Duquette feels simultaneously underdeveloped and 
overwritten. Daphne Rubin-Vega, from Broadway's "Rent," tries to compensate for 
a superfluous character. Theresa Russell is just plain wooden. And when, in the 
end, all is out in the open, ask yourself if certain scenes involving these 
three were really necessary. 
But what keeps the movie from being throwaway junk is an engaging chain of 
surprises (some predictable, some not) that never seems to end. "Wild Things" 
has more twists than a crate full of corkscrews, and most are so gleefully, 
over-the-top nasty that you can't help but be charmed by their absurd 
showmanship. A great deal of amusement also comes from watching Bill Murray in a 
supporting part that appears to have been written for his sly comedic talent; 
Murray's a stitch, especially when pulling up beside the Van Ryan limo after 
winning Lombardo's case and flipping them off. And don't leave when the closing 
credits hit the screen, or you'll miss the film's best part -- four bonus 
flashbacks that smooth over plot holes while offering a few more tiny turns, 
plus a final scene that caps everything off with a great stunner of a bombshell. 
Speaking of bombshells, Denise Richards, who plays almost every scene in a blue 
bikini top, does the teen tease thing with a malicious allure that she was never 
allowed to flaunt in "Starship Troopers." Matt Dillon flexes his sleepy-voiced 
sex appeal, and pulls off personality changes with chameleonic precision. Neve 
Campbell, lovely as ever except when sporting a blond wig, gives Suzie a 
vengeful vulnerability that makes her the most interesting member of the 
conspiring trio. Re-edited and toned down a bit, the dynamics between these 
three actors could have carried the film to greater lengths. But what we're 
given works well enough. "Wild Things" is highly entertaining and, indeed, very 
wild.

Title
Review for Wild America (1997)
Warner Bros. / 1:46 / 1997 / PG (animal violence and intensity, language)
Cast: Jonathan Taylor Thomas; Devon Sawa; Scott Bairstow; Jamey Sheridan; 
Frances Fisher 
Director: William Dear 
Screenplay: David Michael Wieger 
A kiddie nature adventure where the special effects aren't too special, 
"Wild America" is more "When Fake Animals Attack" than a "National 
Geographic" special. But it's no painful sit -- this entertaining, if 
uninvolving, yarn does more than a few things right, starting with a 
nice, hokey setup and some rather interesting main characters. Whenever 
the sights cause unintentional hilarity, there are usually assets to fall 
back on. And when there's not ... well, everyone can use a good chuckle 
now and then.
"Wild America" takes place in 1967 and charts a summer in the early lives 
of the Stouffer siblings, a trio of Arkansas brothers who would 
eventually become wildlife photographers for the nature program that 
shares its name with the film. At 18, Marty (appealing Scott Bairstow) is 
the eldest, locking horns with their trucker dad (Jamey Sheridan) over 
future career paths. Vain, 16-year-old Mark (Devon Sawa, frequently 
shirtless for some reason) can't get enough of the ladies. And baby bro 
Marshall (Home Improvement's Jonathan Taylor Thomas), who's 12, is very 
much a dreamer. Manned with a brand new camera, all three take off on a 
cross-country tour to capture exclusive footage of endangered species, 
but don't stop to consider the danger they're placing themselves in. 
A meatier budget could have helped things considerably -- it's hard to 
get excited over some of the creature contact when the animals are 
obviously phony. A runaway moose hoists Marshall up on its antlers for a 
wild ride, but it looks too artificial. The same can be said for a run-in 
with supposedly-venomous rattlesnakes. And the movie's nature-set climax, 
where the boys stumble into a bear den (hibernating in the heat?) and 
wake its occupants up, falls flat on its face thanks to -- yep, you 
guessed it -- actors in furry suits. A "Mystery Science Theater 3000" 
interlude would have been much appreciated amidst all of this weirdness. 
And speaking of weird, wait'll you see Danny Glover's peculiar turn as a 
crazy mountain man! 
While large chunks of "Wild America" are dopey -- and some even too 
heavy-handed (there's needless "spiritual" filler involving a pet owl and 
a destined plane ride) -- the movie still clicks as a honest showcase for 
three fine young actors and nice wildlife footage; clips from the 
Stouffers' real movies are even shown during the end credits, and are 
worth sticking around for. The situations that Bairstow, Sawa and Thomas 
are put into don't always ring true, but their camaraderie feels right, 
and elevates the film past such recent family-oriented fare as "Far From 
Home: The Adventures of Yellow Dog" and "Alaska." "Wild America" 
certainly means well, and the story holds enough promise to keep you 
diverted, if never fully satisfied.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Rating: *** (out of four)
TriStar / 1:34 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, crude humor)
Cast: Adam Sandler; Cole & Dylan Sprouse; Joey Lauren Adams; Leslie
Mann; Allen Covert; Peter Dante; Kristy Swanson; Jon Stewart; Rob
Schneider; Steve Buscemi; Joseph Bologna
Director: Dennis Dugan
Screenplay: Steve Franks; Tim Herlihy; Adam Sandler
Late in the new Adam Sandler vehicle "Big Daddy," a character makes the
observation that "Most critics are cynical a--holes." The line is played
for a laugh, coming straight from the mouth of an adorable little boy,
but given that Sandler co-wrote "Big Daddy"'s screenplay (with Steve
Franks and frequent collaborator Tim Herlihy), perhaps it suggests some
pointed hidden meaning. See, critics have never really been all that
kind to Sandler, an ex-"Saturday Night Live" cast member whose
constantly soaring popularity at the box office seems to be inversely
related to their consistently declining opinion of his films.
But lo and behold: "Big Daddy" rates pretty good as a comedy and better
as a Sandler opus - a silly, sappy concoction that, yes, probably only
cynical a--holes will be able to out-and-out resist. Sandler tones his
patented obnoxiousness down in favor of appealing to what could be his
largest audience yet, meanwhile eliminating a lot of the irritating
elements from past cinematic ventures. There's no smug inanity like in
"Billy Madison." No fingernails-on-the-blackboard baby-voice like in
"The Waterboy." No sugary sentiment like in "The Wedding Singer" - until
an overwrought send-off piles it on thick, that is. But for the most
part, "Big Daddy" taps Sandler highs unheard of since the randy golf
farce "Happy Gilmore."
Sandler stars here as immature New York law school grad Sonny Koufax,
but before you begin to ponder the notion of Sandler respectfully
addressing a judge, please note that the guy lives off a huge insurance
settlement from a taxi mishap and entertains himself by tossing tree
branches in front of Central Park rollerbladers. All typical Sandler
hijinks. It's an atypical Sandler plot revelation, though, when the
abrasive actor grows a heart after taking an abandoned five-year-old
(Cole and Dylan Sprouse) under his wing. The kid is not his son, but
Sonny conveniently uses him to falsely flaunt fatherhood-esque
responsibility in front of his frazzled girlfriend (Kristy Swanson).
Alas, a reconciliation ain't in the cards. She, sick of his man-child
ways (maybe she's seen his movies), leaves him for a beard-and
cardigan-sporting grandpa-type, and even he agrees that Sandler suffers
from lack of ambition. "Hey, Old Man River," Sonny retorts. "Zip it."
Too late. The "Austin Powers" sequel beat "Big Daddy" to that punchline
and racks up a more solid laugh quotient, but the plights of Sonny's
so-called parenting evokes hefty yucks and yuks nonetheless. Let's just
say that Dr. Spock he's not - Sonny's answer to every problem is
newspaper, helpful for the absorption of spilled milk, wet beds and
vomit. Yes, Virginia, bodily fluids and Sandler shtick still go together
hand-in-hand.
But in "Big Daddy," the creative mind seems to be maturing - slowly but
surely - even as it panders to lowbrow tastes. When two of Sonny's
college buds (Allen Covert and Peter Dante) are introduced as gay lovers
with a sudden liplock, the stage is set for homophobic humor which
thankfully never arrives, using the pair to instead make light of public
discomfort with same-sex affection. Elsewhere, Sandler's frat-boy
sensibilities come into focus, especially in the portrayal of a dopey
Eastern European delivery guy (fellow "SNL" alum Rob Schneider) who pals
around with Sonny. Forget that Jar Jar Binks. Schneider makes for the
season's most potentially offensive ethnic stereotyping.
"I keep hoping the kid'll change him," bemoaned a viewer to her
companion after the umpteenth instance of Sonny's bad influence rubbing
off on the tyke. Duh. Sandler's guaranteed reformation is strictly
been-there, done-that as a story arc, so credit must be given to a
colorful supporting ensemble for providing ample distraction - some of
whom you might be surprised to find in a Sandler flick. They include
glib Jon Stewart as Sonny's roommate, sweet Joey Lauren Adams as Sonny's
new squeeze and witchy Leslie Mann as Sonny's longtime adversary. Those
Sprouse brothers are promising as well. Let's hope they pass on the
impending sitcom and home video deals.
Sandler, too, stays on par with his castmates until "Big Daddy"'s
climactic courtroom trial sequence, which, in a Sandler film, feels as
out of place as ... a climactic courtroom trial sequence. Here, our
leading goofball sticks out like a sore thumb, his snarling-jester
exterior shredded so that tears can run down his cheeks, his charged
speechifying allegedly exposing vulnerability and emotion but delivered
in a hurried monotone perhaps indicative of his own disbelief at the
turn taken by his own script. Drama may never be Sandler's bag, which is
why his movies are what they are so far. Following suit, "Big Daddy"
won't melt your heart, but - when it steers clear of gavels and grovels
- it'll tickle your funny bone.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
Paramount / 1:28 / 1997 / PG-13 
Cast: Kevin Kline; Joan Cusack; Tom Selleck; Debbie Reynolds; Wilford 
Brimley; Matt Dillon; Bob Newhart; Gregory Jbara 
Director: Frank Oz 
Screenplay: Paul Rudnick 
"The Birdcage," 1996's Mike Nichols-directed remake of "La Cage Aux 
Folles," must be considered as a landmark breakthrough for gay-themed 
films. For a type of film that is not generally known to be embraced by 
certain factions of the movie-going public, it earned both soaring 
audience word-of-mouth and cleaned up at the box office to the tune of 
$120 million. Now, about a year-and-a-half later, another step is being 
taken to get the genre into the mainstream with "In & Out," and although 
it's not as solid or polished as "The Birdcage," it's still an 
unequivocal success on all sides. 
The movie takes place in Greenleaf, Indiana, the kind of conservative, 
naive midwestern province whose marker boasts that it's "a great big 
small town." Prominent high school English teacher Howard Brackett (Kevin 
Kline) entertains his classes by telling students about past pupil 
Cameron Drake (Matt Dillon), a local hero who made it to Hollywood and is 
now the odds-on favorite to claim the Best Actor Oscar at the upcoming 
Academy Awards ceremony. Win Cameron does, and while accepting his award, 
he bestows his thanks upon Howard. Everything goes like clockwork until 
Cameron tacks on a two-word final thought to conclude his gratitude: 
"He's gay." 
The phrase is met with gasps by the residents of Greenleaf, all 
attentively staring at their television sets, their jaws on the floor. 
But no one is more shocked than Howard himself, who's viewing the
ceremony with fiancee Emily (Joan Cusack), his girlfriend of three years. 
His sexuality is immediately called into question, resulting in rather 
large problems for both his personal and private life. Complicating 
matters further is the presence of Peter Malloy (Tom Selleck), an 
investigative journalist for "Inside Entertainment," a tabloid TV 
newsmagazine that decides Howard's on-the-air "outing" is a worthy story 
to follow. Also in a tizzy are his parents (Debbie Reynolds and Wilford
Brimley) -- who see his impending marriage as a birthright -- his 
principal (Bob Newhart) and a few of his male students, who begin to 
wonder if Howard's interest in them was ever something more than 
educational. 
"In & Out" is written by Paul Rudnick, an openly gay humorist who penned 
the script to "Addams Family Values" and has a monthly column in 
"Premiere" under the alter-ego of Libby Gelman-Waxner. His most recent 
project, an adaptation of his own hit play "Jeffery," was well-recieved 
by those who had the opportunity to see it but failed as the crossover it 
was likely intended to be. This project will probably make up for that -- 
because Rudnick doesn't confine himself to one hot-button issue, he 
playfully tweaks many of them. "In & Out" sends up sexual orientation, 
celebrity status, political views and even supermodels, all with 
Rudnick's hilariously askew viewpoint. What else can be said when Steven 
Seagal is in the runnings for an Oscar opposite Cameron -- albeit for a 
film called "A Snowball in Hell"? A few plot elements seem too 
coincidental, but "In & Out" never quite isolates itself in reality. Only 
the finale becomes too preachy for its own good. 
A sterling cast appears to be having an immense deal of fun with 
Rudnick's acid-glazed one-liners. This is one of Kevin Kline's best 
performances since "A Fish Called Wanda;" he deftly balances the
satirical side of Howard with the human one, and creates a wonderful, 
realistic comedic character. Those in supporting roles have great moments 
as well. Even the usually low-key Selleck manages a surprise sequence 
with Kline that will have Jerry Falwell reaching for his Tums. If "In & 
Out" has a scene-stealer, though, it's got to be Joan Cusack. Her 
interpretation of Emily's Ms. Havisham-esque personality merits serious 
Oscar consideration, especially in a great, wacky Cusackian moment where 
she throws her hands up in the air and exclaims, "Is everybody gay? Am
I in 'The Twilight Zone'?" 
"In & Out" is a prime example of how to do a farce right, from writing to 
acting to timing to editing. What remains to be seen, though, is how well 
this type of film will play with the absense of such a nationally 
accessible star like Robin Williams. Will people go see "In & Out" for 
its broad comedy and make it a "Birdcage"-sized hit, or be put off by 
such potentially edgy material and send it the way of "To Wong Foo"? 
Whatever happens, smart audiences will pack themselves in and not stay
out. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Universal / 1:58 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, comic violence, crude humor)
Cast: Ben Stiller; William H. Macy; Hank Azaria; Janeane Garofalo;
Geoffrey Rush; Wes Studi; Paul Ruebens; Kel Mitchell; Greg Kinnear;
Claire Forlani; Eddie Izzard; Tom Waits; Lena Olin
Director: Kinka Usher
Screenplay: Neil Cuthbert
If you've been pining to see William H. Macy removed from his element,
then "Mystery Men" is going to be your kind of movie. The "Fargo"
Oscar-nominee and critically-acclaimed character actor here plays a
blue-collar (and blue-jeans) crime-fighter known as The Shoveler, and
seeing him dispatch disco-vamping enemies with a swift whack of his
namesake weapon provides many a pinch-me-so-I-know-I'm-not-dreaming
moment. Be thankful you're wide awake: Chief among the perverse
pleasures of "Mystery" is witnessing him and more unexpected talents
deadpan their way through a story that's all punchlines and sensory
explosion.
A single member of a trio of hero-wannabes in the Gotham-like metropolis
Champion City, Shoveler's team also includes Mr. Furious (Ben Stiller,
radiating manic cool in stubble, spiky hair and black leather), prone to
attention-getting tantrums, and The Blue Raja (Hank Azaria), a
fork-flinger sporting an effete British accent and a wardrobe that looks
stitched together from an elderly lady's housecoat. (It probably was.)
They genuinely want to help rid their hometown of bad guys, yet always
seem to fall into the shadow of the amazing Captain Amazing (Greg
Kinnear, perfectly utilized), Champion City's bonafide defender against
evil.
With this set-up, "Mystery Men" sounds like any number of comics brought
to large, lush life on the big screen - and, as every colorfully askew
frame makes evident, it's source is just that (specifically, a Dark
Horse publication called "Flaming Carrot"). But that the protagonists
are second-rate saviors hints at vast opportunities for a wicked sense
of humor, an edge that the performers, screenwriter Neil Cuthbert and
debut director Kinka Usher take to the hilt. And what a hilt: A
particularly amusing running gag involves Kinnear's promotional
sponsorship, his NASCAR-esque jumpsuit displaying logos for Reebok,
Rayovac and Pepsi.
Actually, Captain Amazing loses the latter endorsement after one too
many ho-hum rescues. This puts him in a glum mood, so he demands that
his publicist work to free old arch-nemesis Casanova Frankenstein (hammy
Geoffrey Rush) from the local asylum to spark some deadly new conflict -
only the plan backfires when he gets kidnaped by Casanova, allowing
Shoveler, Mr. Furious and Blue Raja to prove their worth. First order of
business: A backyard barbeque to hold auditions for new partners, where
such funny rejects as Waffle Man (special power: "truth syrup") and PMS
Avenger expire their moment in the spotlight.
Enter the real deals ... well, sort of: Paul "Pee-Wee Herman" Rueben's
flatulent Spleen, Wes Studi's uber-enigmatic Sphinx, Kel Mitchell's
affable Invisible Boy and "Mystery" MVP Janeane Garofalo as The Bowler,
whose ball - containing both her dead father's skull and spirit - throws
like a destructive boomerang. Once these cads come together following a
shaky beginning, "Mystery Men" stands tall and proud on terra firma.
Usher piles his freak show high in trappings so garish and silly that
they occasionally topple under the weight, especially the messy action
sequence that inaugurates the movie. But when they fly, they soar.
"Mystery Men" similarly finishes on a sloppy note, as each individual
good guy gets his or her chance to shine in the run-of-the-mill
climactic battle; the film dangerously courts becoming what it so far
has poked a generous amount of fun at. But even with Usher's
inexperience creating cluttered bookends, the long, strong midsection's
mirthful mayhem and summer-flick satirizing are as irresistible as the
priceless cast. Given the delightfully demented accomplishment here, a
sequel that reunites these super friends and their behind-the-scenes
counterparts - in some cases older, in others wiser - isn't out of the
question.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Upon hearing word of this outrage, Star Wars' creator George Lucas (in
the throes of developing scripts for the two remaining "Star Wars"
films) quickly removed all references to an upcoming character allegedly
named Stingy MacHaggis, a kilt-wearing alien who was to spend a good
portion of Episode II' drinking, picking fights and playing an alien
musical instrument that strongly resembled a set of bagpipes.  He is to
be replaced by another alien character - a formless, colorless and mute
creature who in no way resembles any culture or individual that ever
existed or ever will exist. -AAlgar on "The Phantom Menace"'s
race-stereotyping controversy

Title
Review for She's So Lovely (1997)
Miramax / 1:28 / 1997 / R (language, violence) 
Cast: Robin Wright Penn; Sean Penn; John Travolta; Harry Dean Stanton; 
Debi Mazar; Gena Rowlands; James Gandolfini; Chloe Webb 
Director: Nick Cassavetes 
Screenplay: John Cassavetes 
"She's So Lovely," a "romantic fable" scripted by the late John 
Cassavetes and directed by his son Nick, opens to the tune of Bjork's 
wild "It's Oh So Quiet." In retrospect, it's a great selection, because 
the movie, much like the song, is about how passion can drive you crazy. 
But as "She's So Lovely" hacks away at getting its point across, it also 
commits several deadly errors that render it from being the hip, offbeat 
fairy tale it so aspires to be. Chief among them is the drawback that 
its strange cast of characters fails to ever make much sense. 
Case in point: Eddie (Sean Penn) and Maureen (Robin Wright Penn) are one 
of the most bizarre husband-and-wife pairings that filmdom has likely 
ever seen. He disappears for several days at a time while she carts her 
pregnant self around town, scanning the local bars for her spouse and 
taking time to enjoy herself with a few drinks while she's at it. 
Maureen gets a little too free-spirited during a particular one of 
Eddie's absences, and spends the afternoon sharing whiskey with a creepy 
neighbor (James Gandolfini) who then beats her up after she rejects his 
advances. When Eddie finally resurfaces and catches a glimpse of 
Maureen's bruised face, he eventually wigs out and hits the streets with 
a loaded gun. 
No fair telling what havoc ensues immediately thereafter, but the movie 
then flashes forward 10 years. Eddie, now released from the mental 
institution where he's spent the last decade, gets a dye job and a new 
look and begins searching for Maureen. She, meanwhile, has gone from 
happy hour to homemaker, married a wealthy hothead named Joey (John 
Travolta), raised a trio of adorable little girls and established living 
quarters in quaint suburban decadence. Inevitably, Eddie crashes 
Maureen's pleasant but unfulfilling lifestyle, and inevitably, there's a 
mental (and physical) tug-of-war between Eddie and Joey as to who she'll 
profess her undying devotion to. 
This is love? The movie says it is, but that's its main undoing -- Eddie 
and Maureen repeatedly tell us and each other that they're in love, but 
"She's So Lovely" does little in the way of showing off their inner 
workings. Both are unstable, fragile creatures, and the film seems to 
think that bizarre personal similarities constitute an explanation as to 
how their relationship works. It doesn't. We're also never given any 
reason as to why the new-and-improved Maureen -- if she is in fact so 
preoccupied with her past life with Eddie -- would so willingly project 
her affection on Joey. This love triangle, as "different" as it sounds, 
fails to click in most cases because it doesn't break its character 
surfaces or lets its cast portray people with little more dimension than 
cartoons. 
Speaking of the cast, "She's So Lovely" has a nice one, with the two 
Penns (real-life man and wife, in case you hadn't already figured that 
out) and the lone Travolta performing successfully enough to overlap 
some of the movie's gaping flaws. They also compensate for a very shaky 
shift in tone; the Eddie-Maureen first half is too serious to be 
dramatic and too silly to be serious, but act two, featuring Eddie's 
release and the events there on, makes the proceedings insanely quirky 
(Joey to nine-year-old daughter: "Shut up and drink your beer!"). 
Travolta steals most of his scenes in a smaller-than-you-might-suspect 
supporting role, male Penn is nicely subtle and female Penn does
an almost-fascinating combination of Betty Boop, Olive Oyle and Mira 
Sorvino's "Mighty Aphrodite" lead. 
The title's a little off too, because I came away thinking that Penn's 
Maureen is anything but lovely. I also blinked at how quick the film 
delivers its resolution, which is extremely abrupt but also too fast to 
be boring. "She's So Lovely" isn't a terrible movie by any means, but it 
is one with a lot of ill-used talent. It's an interesting (I hesitate to 
use the word "refreshing") change-of-pace to see a summer movie that at 
least attempts to tackle an unusual topic, albeit one where John 
Travolta doesn't trade faces with anybody and the biggest special effect 
is Sean Penn's spunky bleached-blonde hairdo. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)
Rating: ** (out of ****)
Walt Disney / 1:33 / 1999 / PG (bawdy humor, brief nudity)
Cast: Jeff Daniels; Christopher Lloyd; Elizabeth Hurley; Daryl Hannah;
Wallace Shawn; Ray Walston; Michael Lerner; Christine Ebersole
Director: Donald Petrie
Screenplay: Sherri Stoner; Deanna Oliver
As if last spring's big-screen version of "Lost in Space" didn't scream,
"Danger, movie-goers! Danger!", here's yet another unnecessary updating
of a beloved 1960s TV chestnut. Martian the sitcom ran from '63 through
'66 and featured wacky Ray Walston as an extraterrestrial living amongst
earthlings in human disguise; "Martian" the movie runs 93 minutes and
gives equally wacky Christopher Lloyd the Walston role, though Walston
himself does show up in a supporting turn that eventually pays heed to
the his former self.
That in-joke will be lost on kiddies, but they'll probably be content
enough with the film's potty humor, lively pace and fun special effects.
Adults, on the other hand, may only enjoy "My Favorite Martian" if they
were fans of its original incarnation, or if they don't mind gazing at
pretty female co-stars Darryl Hannah and Elizabeth Hurley (though both
are arguably miscast). The story - Lloyd's "Uncle Martin" crashes in
Santa Barbara and is taken under the wing of a harried television
producer (Jeff Daniels in the Bill Bixby part) - accomplishes pretty
much what the series did in just its pilot and finale, albeit with far
better production values, moments of lavish lunacy (like a cool
climactic alien rampage) and computer-generated antennae.
There's some decent physical shtick here, and even a few chuckle-worthy
moments, but most of the comedy is provided by a talking, gyrating space
uniform named Zoot (brought to, uh, life by the voice of "Seinfeld"'s
Wayne Knight). This Zoot suit is no riot, and neither, unfortunately, is
too much of "My Favorite Martian."
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Maybe another 200 cigarettes would have helped; coughing would be
better than some of this dialogue." -Roger Ebert on "200 Cigarettes"

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
Columbia / 1:38 / 1997 / PG-13 (language, sex-related dialogue, 
violence)
Cast: Alicia Silverstone; Benicio Del Toro; Christopher Walken; Jack 
Thompson; Nicholas Turturro; Michael Bowen; Sally Kirkland; Leland 
Orser; Harry Connick, Jr. 
Director: Marco Brambilla 
Screenplay: Max D. Adams; Dick Clement; Ian La Frenais 
By starring in Amy Heckerling's "Clueless" two summers ago, Alicia 
Silverstone proved she wasn't just another pretty, pouty ingenue, 
showing a buoyant comedic craftiness that blew all previous jobs -- 
namely a stint as the Aerosmith girl and a silly turn as the lethal 
Lolita of "The Crush" -- out of the water. Her only work since that 1995 
gem has been in June's "Batman & Robin," where she overcame the 
underwritten role of Batgirl. Now, she's the star and producer of 
"Excess Baggage," a hopelessly phony film that demonstrates how an 
ill-composed story can drag an otherwise solid performer down to its 
level. 
Silverstone's Emily T. Hope is stuck with a billionaire father (Jack 
Thompson) who neglects her emotionally. In an outlandish plan to gain 
his affection, she fakes her own kidnapping -- Emily uses an 
electronically disguised voice to call her dad and set a pricey ransom, 
ties her legs together and mouth shut with duct tape and locks herself 
in the trunk of her BMW. But before the police can "rescue" her, 
professional auto thief Vincent Roche (Benicio Del Toro) jimmies the 
locks, hot-wires the engine and makes off with both the car and Emily, 
who's still trapped in the back. 
When Vincent discovers Emily, the two don't exactly hit it off -- she 
annoys him, he annoys her, and at the advice of his slimy car salesman 
partner (Harry Connick, Jr.), he decides to drive her out to the middle 
of nowhere and leave her there. Along the way, of course, they get into 
a whole heap of trouble, and come to realize that being together is the 
only way to get out of their sticky, felony-studded situation. It 
doesn't help matters that Emily and Vincent are being trailed by cops, 
crooks and even her shady Uncle Ray (Christopher Walken), who's wise to 
his niece's ploys for attention and has mafia connections. 
For at least a half-hour, "Excess Baggage" bounces along fast and 
efficiently. During this time, Emily and Vincent sport engaging 
personalities as well as a nice role-reversal twist -- she's an awfully 
aggressive, combative victim and he's quite the aloof, seemingly 
vulnerable captor. But once it's past its set-up, the situation suddenly 
becomes uninvolving as the story tries to be too many things at once. A 
road movie, a teen comedy, a mob thriller, a drama about family 
relationships -- you name the cliche and "Excess Baggage" likely covers 
its territory. Of course a romance develops between the two leads, but 
it all seems forced, and thus characterization is manipulated to cause 
the finally happy outcome. "Do you like my tummy?" Emily coos to Vincent 
at one point in the film. Huh? Did I miss something? The hard-edged, 
foul-mouthed grrrl is suddenly gone and replaced with a pair of batting 
goo-goo eyes. 
Then again, "Excess Baggage" becomes so weak in so many areas that the 
personality transplant is not a complete surprise. A supporting cast 
attempts to do what they can with colorful but empty secondary roles, 
but the movie isn't game enough to use them all and therefore seems 
overcrowded. Motivations keep shifting, resulting in an often confusing 
narrative. Scant existing story background confuses matters even worse 
and adds to the growing list of unanswered questions. "Excess Baggage" 
has too many characters, too much plot and juggles with one arm behind 
its back and a remaining shaky hand. 
I loved Silverstone's turn in "Clueless" as an aloof, pampered Beverly 
Hills matchmaker inspired by Jane Austen's "Emma." Looking back at the 
skill she displayed for comedy there, it's simple to justify any high 
expectation or enthusiasm that I had mustered for "Excess Baggage." 
Sadly, however, "Excess Baggage" is no "Clueless." But, on the other 
hand, it is clueless. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
TriStar / 2:09 / 1997 / R (violence, gore, language, gore, violence,
sex, gore, nudity, gore, violence)
Cast: Casper Van Dien; Dina Meyer; Denise Richards; Patrick Muldoon;
Jake Busey; Neil Patrick Harris; Clancy Brown; Michael Ironside; Seth
Gilliam
Driector: Paul Verhoeven 
Screenplay: Ed Neumeier 
Casting "Doogie Howser" star Neil Patrick Harris as mind-reading
military intelligence is only one of the guilty pleasures of "Starship
Troopers," a hugely entertaining, mega-budgeted sci-fi yarn directed
by Paul Verhoeven, who's making quite a recovery from his 1995
G-string epic "Showgirls." Sure, "Starship Troopers" qualifies as
cinematic junk food, but that's forgivable when the junk food is this
tasty. Everyone needs a high-calorie change-of-pace from fall's
onslaught of costume dramas and other assorted Oscar bait, and
"Troopers" does the job admirably despite its flaws.
For its first hour, "Starship Troopers" plays like a cheeky futuristic
hybrid of "Saved by the Bell" and "G.I. Jane." In the distant years
ahead, high school grad Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) signs up for
Federal Service along with his girlfriend Carmen (Denise Richards); he
gets accepted into the Mobile Infantry but she wants to travel to the
Fleet Academy to become a starship pilot, so the couple is broken up.
But there's temptation awaiting both of them -- Johnny's is in the
form of an old friend (Dina Meyer) also in the infantry and still
harboring a secret crush, while Carmen attracts the eye of her
flirtatious instructor (Patrick Muldoon).
Personal rivalry and sexual jealousy carry over into the final 65
minutes, when an impending alien menace begins making good on its
threatening presence and obliterates part of South America, killing
Johnny's parents and destroying his home. Our weakening, lovesick
protagonist is given new reasons to stick around the Mobile Infantry,
and is dispatched with a group of fellow fighters to the aliens' home
planet, where he will head up a ground assault to end the threat for
good. But the enemy is far smarter, more diabolical and numerous than
the good guys give them credit for, and after an initial walloping,
they must re-examine their strategy.
The exposition -- played like a futuristic soap opera -- is silly, but
aware of its own ridiculousness enough to merit more smiles than
groans. Once we get past the campy character introductions and the
numerous (but never boring) training sessions, "Starship Troopers"
really kicks into high gear. Its last half is all gruesomely violent
action -- a fury of severed limbs, decapitations, disembowelments,
brain removal, explosions and other jolt-inducers that are really
going to please the 13- and 14-year-old boys lucky enough to dodge
getting carded or caught on their way into this deservedly R-rated
show. The creature design and special effects are amazing as expected,
and their interaction with the human actors are a realistic,
imaginative high point.
It's nice to see intergalactic beasties that aren't too derivative of
the titular menace from "Alien." These monsters are appropriately
terrifying sights, especially the Arachnids, a spider-scorpion-crab
combo that's all sharp talons and even sharper legs. They attack in
packs of hundreds, and it's a funny, scary sight to see these bugs
take repeated hits and still crawl, jerk and struggle towards their
intended victims in a determined, gooey mess. It matters not that they
actually have a laughable master plan in mind (ask yourself if a
species like this seems capable of carrying out such a plot); these
sequences of insect warfare are numerous, bloody and immensely
satisfying.
The occasional dramatic moments -- one cast member's death, the final
resolution to Johnny's love triangle -- are botched, a testament to
how "Starship Troopers" fails to create any strong, outstanding
characters. These bland Ken-and-Barbie archetypes serve the story
adequately enough to keep any distractions at arm's length, but
restrain the film from achieving a higher ground a la "Star Wars,"
where even the slightest aliens had definite personality. The acting
is decent (but never spectacular); most of the performers hail from
Aaron Spelling territory -- smallish roles on "Beverly Hills 90210"
and/or "Melrose Place" -- and it occasionally shows. Van Dien, for
example, is limited but perfectly likeable. In smaller parts are the
afore-mentioned Neil Patrick Harris as Johnny's best friend and Jake
Busey (Gary's son) as Johnny's sidekick; the latter excels at playing
creeps (see "The Frighteners" or "Contact") but seems off-kilter as a
second banana.
"Starship Troopers" is based on the novel by Robert Heinlein, a sci-fi
writer who hasn't exactly seen any recent adaptation justice done to
any of his books what with 1994's howler "The Puppet Masters." But the
overall familiarity to the "Alien" trilogy -- and the promise of great
gobs of gore -- could act as a crowd-drawer. Its own possible
influence, however, might well work against it when the franchise
continuation "Alien: Resurrection" opens in a few weeks. We will know
then which film to crown as the best summer movie of the fall.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
CRUEL INTENTIONS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
A contempo update of the malicious goings-on in Choderlos De Laclos' 
1782 novel "Les Liaisons Dangereuses," also the basis of the 1987 Glenn 
Close-John Malkovich dazzler "Dangerous Liaisons," "Cruel Intentions" 
substitutes the aristocratic France setting with a posh New York 
boarding school on summer break. It retains the deliciously 
agenda-minded characters, however, because the teens of today can 
presumably be as vicious as the patricians of yesteryear. Buying this is 
a bit of a stretch, if somewhat vital to immerse yourself in the film's 
warped atmosphere - exaggeration has never been so enjoyable. 
Gellar's Kathryn and stepbrother Sebastian (Ryan Phillippe, her co-star 
previously in "I Know What You Did Last Summer") are so bored with their 
very blue-blooded existence that they've taken it upon themselves to 
bring down everyone who crosses them - and even a few who haven't. 
Kathryn's current project concerns sexually soiling the naive new 
girlfriend (Selma Blair, from TV's "Zoe, Duncan, Jack & Jane") of her 
ex-squeeze, a task Sebastian isn't up to because it's far too easy for 
his extensive debauching talents. Oh, well. Guess she'll just have to 
initiate the corruption herself. 
He, meanwhile, is far more taken with the headmaster's daughter 
("Pleasantville"'s Reese Witherspoon), mostly because she wrote an 
article for "Seventeen" about her bold (well, for this day and age) 
decision to stay abstinent until marriage. Sebastian and Kathryn, then, 
see this as an opportunity for a little pseudo-incestuous wager over 
whether or not he can rip her of her innocence: If Kathryn wins, she 
gets his hot 1956 Jag. If he wins, he gets her - in the Biblical sense. 
"I'll let you put it _anywhere_," Kathryn not-quite-demurely purrs, 
which pretty much cements the deal for Sebastian. 
"Cruel Intentions" eventually covers some iffy terrain when real-life 
couple Phillippe and Witherspoon actually warm to each other after 
initially rocky introductions; his charismatic but necessarily 
stone-cold portrayal makes their rushed courtship a little hard to 
totally buy, while it's difficult to comprehend why someone so smart and 
determined as she could ever fall for a smooth operator like him. If 
this were the only storyline, "Intentions" would be in trouble. But it's 
not - the subplots have subplots, which, in turn, have subplots still 
(some of them iffy as well). It's a complex tale, but one in which even 
the corners are dressed with delicious trappings. 
Gellar's icy hauteur is chief among them, but she's got some serious 
competition from WB network co-actress Blair. The latter steals the 
movie with her giddily self-depreciating demeanor, and gets to share a 
racy scene with Gellar destined to go down as an audience favorite - at 
least for the males. Witherspoon is fine, too, wisely making her part's 
lifestyle choice neither sanctimonious nor self-congratulatory. And 
director/writer Roger Kumble hardly misses a beat as far as the smirky 
tone is concerned, from the opening sequences of one-upmanship to the 
guaranteed closing comeuppance. 
Kumble is also successful with style and locale. The sumptuous 
production design - posh bedrooms, blush poolsides - is as sensual as 
any of the lead performers, the cinematography crisp and darkly 
colorful, and the subdued rock soundtrack - available, ironically, on 
Virgin Records - only furthers "Cruel Intentions" satiny ambience. (The 
score, however, just isn't on par, with some annoying techno loop 
constantly in the background.) Nothing, however, overpowers the games 
these people play, nasty and naughty though they may be. For a movie 
with its intentions mostly in the right place, "Intentions" is cruel but 
cool.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
LOST IN SPACE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
In 2058, Earth is sustaining itself by branching out into the cosmos, 
and one family is selected to play a key role in the colonization 
process. They are the Robinsons -- Professor John (William Hurt), his 
wife Maureen (Mimi Rogers) and their children Judy (Heather Graham), 
Penny (Lacey Chabert) and Will (Jack Johnson) -- and the intended plan 
is for them, along with gung-ho pilot Major Don West (Matt LeBlanc), to 
board the spacecraft Jupiter 2 and make a many-year journey to the 
distant planet Alpha Prime. Once there, the crew will establish some 
sort of portal that will allow Earthlings to make the jump to Alpha 
Prime in no time. But thanks to villainous saboteur and stowaway Dr. 
Smith (Gary Oldman) and his Global Sedition cohorts, things don't quite 
go so smoothly. Around a half-day into the flight, the Jupiter 2 is 
thrown off course. When everyone comes to, they're in a foreign place in 
an unspecified time, and must find their way back home or remain lost in 
space forever. 
In patches, "Lost in Space" is as glibly fun as a video game. Director 
Stephen Hopkins (that awful killer-lion flick "The Ghost and the 
Darkness") brings the major action sequences, surprisingly few though 
they are, to giddy, palpable life. Two extended bits stand out from the 
eventual blur: the initial siege on the Jupiter 2 by the nameless Robot 
programmed to protect and aid the Robinsons, and the search through a 
creepy ghost ship as the movie nears its midsection. That Robot (yes, he 
gets to say the immortal line, "Danger, Will Robinson! Danger!"), by the 
way, is a far better way to entertain the family audiences than the 
computer-generated Blawp, a cuddly, Gizmo-esque creature the Robinsons 
pick up on their trek. The Blawp doesn't even look like it's sharing the 
same scenes with the human actors, but most of the other special effects 
work nicely, especially the movie's sleek sets. 
The interesting ensemble cast is partially ill-used. Oldman always makes 
a good bad guy, and his "Lost in Space" work makes one wish that the 
movie hadn't cut to some special effect every time his Dr. Smith 
threatens to become a complex personality. On the plus side, Hurt and 
Johnson have a realistic father-and-son chemistry. Matt LeBlanc is 
essentially playing his "Friends" alter-ego as a hotshot hero (complete 
with one-liners like, "Okay, last one to kill a bad guy buys the 
beer!"), but his aloof swagger works, and this movie is, at least, way 
better than Ed. Mimi Rogers and Heather Graham (Rollergirl from "Boogie 
Nights"), lovely and talented though they are, are trotted out whenever 
a reaction shot is needed; Graham's sexual flirtation with LeBlanc is 
never developed and largely feels like wasted time. Spunky Lacey Chabert 
("Party of Five") fares the worst, sounding like she's been sucking on a 
helium tank while offscreen. 
"Lost in Space" was written by Akiva Goldsman, the man behind the script 
for the very underrated (and surely I can't be the only one to think so) 
"Batman & Robin." He's toned down the series' high camp factor in place 
of a dark, more sinister edge, which serves the first 60 minutes of the 
movie well. But "Lost in Space"'s murky tone and visuals just don't mesh 
with part two's elongated family therapy session. This year's first 
official summer release is a botched one, with too many distractions and 
flaws to even rank as pleasing eye-candy -- a big no-no as far as 
seasonal movies are concerned. As Robot might say, "Danger, moviegoers! 
Danger!" 

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
Polygram / 1997 / 2:08 / R (brief sexuality, violence, language) 
Cast: Michael Douglas; Sean Penn; Deborah Kara Unger; James Rebhorn; 
Anna Katerina; Armin Mueller-Stahl 
Director: David Fincher 
Screenplay: John D. Brancato; Michael Ferris 
David Fincher is a master of the dark, dreary and depressing. His only 
two previous directing credits are "Alien 3" and "Seven," but anyone who 
has seen either of those films can testify that an unsettling atmosphere 
is practically a character alone whenever Fincher's at the helm. This
menacing ambiance certainly plays a part in "The Game," his extremely 
clever new thriller that incorporates a little of Henri-Georges Clouzot 
and a lot of Alfred Hitchcock, yet still feels like a complete original. 
It's one of those movies where the cinematic experience is far from over 
when the credits start to roll -- in fact, it's really just begun. 
"The Game" stars Michael Douglas as Nick Van Orten, a millionaire 
investment banker who lives only with his maid in an immense San 
Francisco mansion. Birthday number 48 is fast approaching, a milestone 
that is met with both trepidation and surprise; not only is that the age 
his father was when he took his life, but Nick's black sheep brother 
Conrad (Sean Penn) mysteriously surfaces to offer his sibling a surprise 
present -- a gift certificate to a shady agency known as Consumer 
Recreation Services. "They make your life fun," Conrad says to Nick. Um, 
sure. 
Somewhat reluctantly, Nick pays a visit to CSR's downtown offices where 
he learns that his gift is a real-life "game" tailored to match his 
stamina and cerebral capacities. He undergoes a lengthy series of tests, 
both mental and physical, and is sent on his way after being told that 
his game will start without warning. Before too long, strange things 
begin to happen -- occurrences as mundane as his ballpoint pen leaking 
in his breast pocket or as bizarre as a waitress (Deborah Kara Unger) 
spilling drinks on him and then admitting she was paid $400 to do so. He 
also finds keys with the CSR emblem on them all over the place. Nick 
begins to cast a suspicious eye on all of his surroundings, as even the 
most innocent everyday acts -- like taking a cab or watching TV -- seem 
to yield nightmarish circumstances. 
To say anything else about "The Game"'s story would be unfair, because 
the vast enjoyment of this particularly labrynthine mystery is derived 
from its tumbling domino-like chain of events. Surprises are numerous, 
frequent and so involving that Fincher actually positions us in the 
middle of the creepy goings-on. In a sense, we become Nick and work 
through the puzzle with him, and many scenes act as a testament to that. 
When, early in the film, a business associate inexplicitly tells Nick of 
his dealings with CSR only by quoting a Biblical passage -- "I once was 
blind but now I see" -- it's hard to keep the hairs on the back of your 
neck from standing up. There's also a standout sequence where Nick 
ambles through an airport and views every person walking by and every 
object in reach as a element of the game. With Fincher's eerie focus, 
even a baby rattle appears malevolent. 
Much was made of the shocking conclusions to both "Seven" and "Alien 3," 
and when it comes to "The Game"'s finale, "shocking" is quite an 
understatement. I suppose there are those in the audience who will have 
things all figured out by the time "The Game" reaches its actual 
denouement, but its concluding scene is one that probably no one will 
predict. Fincher's execution completely defies expectation, and for that 
reason alone, "The Game" really pulls the wool over your eyes -- this is 
one of those endings that's more genius the more it's thought about, and 
it should be thought about a lot. How the movie arrives there is quite a 
different matter, utilizing sporadic bouts of coincidence and a few 
ideas that are never fully explained or developed, but then again, John 
D. Brancato and Michael Ferris'screenplay so eagerly explores so many 
insane tangents that it's not necessarily jolting that they eventually 
shoot themselves in the foot. 
There are many things to admire about "The Game," and chief among them 
is the Fincher's pure exhilarating craftsmanship. Michael Douglas' 
performance is also wondrous itself, and because his fleshed-out, 
unnerved anti-hero is featured prominently in just about every scene, 
it's quite easy to see what's keeping him on his toes. Nick Van Orten is 
a classic "innocent man on the lam" role, and the movie offers a classy 
yarn for him to run through. And as the game toys with Nick's head, "The 
Game" gets inside ours. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-Mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
20th Century Fox / 1:45 / 1997 / PG-13 (violence, language, disaster
intensity)
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones; Anne Heche; Don Cheadle; John Corbett; Keith
David; Gaby Hoffmann; Jacqui Kim; John Carroll Lynch
Director: Mick Jackson
Screenplay: Jerome Armstrong; Billy Ray
The official summer movie season has begun -- in April, no less -- with
the release of "Volcano," the first big-budget disaster movie since, oh,
February's "Dante's Peak" ... also a film where eruption plays a major
role. Because "Peak" explored very similar territory sooner (and
better), "Volcano," while somewhat good on its own terms, pretty much
falls into a slight category: Same taste, less filling.
The movie's premise has potential -- a vent in the earth's plates has
allowed magma to begin rising towards the crust, scenic Los Angeles to
be exact. Tommy Lee Jones plays Mike Roark, the head of an emergency
crew that's already on edge because of recent, intense quakes. It
certainly doesn't help matters that some strange activity in L.A.'s
underground has nuked a team of workers. We, of course, know why it's
hotter than hell down there.
Pretty seismologist Amy Barnes (Anne Heche) is called on by Roark to
help figure things out; she comments that a downtown spring has upped in
temperature, and it takes a geological event to make this happen. Before
too long, the implicit danger becomes blatantly obvious to the city, as
the La Brea Tap Pits spit out chunks of molten rock, setting fire to all
surroundings, and MacArthur Park begins, well, melting in the dark.
Roark's daughter (Gaby Hoffman) is badly burned in the mass confusion,
and sent to a local hospital with a dependable doctor (Jacqueline Kim)
who happens to be on the scene treating injured firemen. Roark and
Barnes meet up in all the ensuing commotion, and, with the help of
Roark's second-in-command (Don Cheadle) at the Emergency Management
command post, try to devise a plan to stop the stream of lava that's
flowing down Wilshire Boulevard.
The rest of the story clunks around as Los Angeles puts its diversity
aside and bands together to combat their natural enemy, and this is
where "Volcano" begins to fall apart. I really could have done without
the whole subplot which finds a white cop arresting a black citizen
because he's creating a nuisance in telling the police to help his
neighborhood out (references to Mark Fuhrman and the L.A. riots of a few
years back are used comedically here) -- it's extremely obvious that the
screenwriters are using mock racial tension solely for the purpose of a
ridiculous scene in which both men put their differences aside and work
together.
I think this is why I enjoyed "Dante's Peak" so much more. "Peak" knew
it was an E-ticket and provided adrenaline-pumping action scenes with
little plot or social relevance. Towards its end, "Volcano" tries to do
both -- explicitly so when a little boy, who's looking for his mother,
sees all of the ash-covered residents of Los Angeles and comments, "They
all look the same!" "Volcano" even features a dog leaping to safety,
which seems to be a staple for all recent disaster films.
Acting-wise, all is fine. Jones can play this kind of take-charge role
in his sleep, and he does it extremely well. Heche, a real find in
independent films, has likely found the part that will serve as her
breakthrough into the leading mainstream. And Cheadle, most recently
seen in "Rosewood," manages to steal most scenes he's in, even though
he's confined to a desk for the film's entire run.
Put all plotting flaws aside, though, and you have some great special
effects, and I suppose that this is the true reason to rush out and see
"Volcano;" after all, it wouldn't have been made without them, right?
(In one gruesome segment, a key character lands feet-first in lava and
slowly melts like the Wicked Witch of the West -- it looks so strange
and disturbing that I didn't know whether to laugh or be disgusted.) And
for the record, I'd rather watch lava turn the City of Angels into an
iferno than aliens blow up the White House any day.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
Warner Bros. / 2:07 / 1999 / R (language, sexuality, brief violence)
Cast: Clint Eastwood; Isaiah Washington; Denis Leary; Lisa Gay Hamilton;
James Woods; Diane Venora; Bernard Hill
Director: Clint Eastwood
Screenplay: Larry Gross; Paul Brickman; Stephen Schiff
The big crime committed by "True Crime" is one of excess, but it's
rarely severe enough to be labeled as wretched. This stately Clint
Eastwood thriller suffers from both an overlong running time and
eventually overcooked story elements, undoings that have also jumbled
recent directorial outings "Absolute Power" and "Midnight in the Garden
of Good" and Evil, and even suffers a bit from the Aging Matinee Idol
Factor - at 68, Eastwood's self-exuding machismo sometimes comes across
like a weird parody of itself, and the actor is way too old to doff his
shirt for a sex-aftermath scene. Still, he's in better shape than some,
a statement that also rings true for "True Crime."
Those who have seen the coming attraction and are aware of the whole
death row storyline know that "True Crime" looks about as promising as
"Dead Man Walking" with our man Clint in the Sister Helen Prejean role.
But surprise, surprise: Portions of the movie really hit home, even if
its ambitions are diametrically opposite to that deep, thoughtful
rumination on capital punishment. Dramatic sparks do occasionally fly as
Eastwood's Steve Everett, a newspaper reporter sorting through his share
of nasty personal problems (most involving a voracious lust for women),
maneuvers through a most difficult assignment - to chronicle the last
hours of life spent by a convicted killer.
Of course, this being a Clint Eastwood film, the set-up isn't as
meditative as it might sound. Everett is handed the article with little
prep time, just after the writer slated to take it dies in a sudden car
accident, but immediately senses that things aren't quite kosher. So,
with less than 24 hours left until the execution, he sets out on an
all-out quest to find out what really happened in this seemingly random
convenience store murder. Adding fuel to the fire is that the alleged
perpetrator (noble Isaiah Washington) maintains his innocence yet has a
double-strike criminal record and questionable ties to the victim, only
circumstantial evidence exists, and witness testimony is faulty at best.
Can clues and leads overlooked for six years be unearthed in time to
save a condemned man who very well might be innocent? Maybe not in the
real world, but there's probably a serious dearth of living journalists
with Eastwood's rough, squinty-eyed determination - an attribute that
serves both his character's plight and his dedication as a filmmaker to
deliver the goods. Here, those include a fine attention to detail and a
full-fledged sense of humor that often borders on surprising; most of
the laughs come from subplots involving the bickering between Everett
and his high-strung superior (James Woods). So good is this material
that you occasionally wish it were "True Crime"'s main focus.
Too bad most of the other discursions don't gel as well. Much is made of
the fact that Everett is fooling around with the wife of his aware
section editor (Denis Leary), but this aside provides little more than
prolonged manly glaring. Everett's failing marriage is also given
generous (and often questionable) coverage, bogging the narrative down
further, while random sidetracks involve penitentiary workers on a lunch
break, a randy homeless man whose footage seems cut from a completely
different movie, and Michael McKean as a intrusive prison chaplain. What
the latter is doing here is anybody's guess, especially since his comic
talents aren't rewarded with any kind of a payoff.
But as long as "True Crime" sticks to Eastwood's dealings with
Washington and/or Woods, it cranks out a fine flow of strong scenes,
even when they involve twists and revelations best described as
suspension of disbelief-reliant; this must be the first cinematic
mystery, for example, to hinge upon the location of a rack of potato
chips, while a key clue turns up with "something fishy here" literally
_inscribed_ on it elsewhere. Swallow goofiness like this and "True
Crime" ranks as serviceable matinee fare, as cool and cozy as it comes.
It could be Eastwood's relaxed-as-blue-jeans ardor paired with the overt
plot familiarity, but this must be the most comfortable
race-against-the-clock scenario ever.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"There is possibly an audience for this movie, but I have the oddest
feeling that on opening night the people in the theater will all be in
black and white. See Pleasantville' if you wonder what I mean. In fact,
see Pleasantville' anyway." -Roger Ebert on "I'll Be Home for
Christmas"

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
Columbia / 1:52 / 1997 / PG-13 (language, violence, sex, brief nudity)
Cast: Ethan Hawke; Uma Thurman; Jude Law; Gore Vidal; Alan Arkin; Loren Dean; 
Elias Koteas; Xander Berkeley; Jayne Brook; Tony Shalhoub 
Director: Andrew Niccol 
Screenplay: Andrew Niccol 
"Gattaca" represents a solid breakthrough in the recent onslaught of 
science-fiction films -- it's a genre picture that doesn't rely on alien 
creatures or loud explosions to tell its story. The movie takes place in a 
futuristic world where babies are created through genetic tampering and not 
sexual reproduction. This allows parents to predetermine what kind of eye color, 
intelligence and life span they'd like for their child, and also eliminates most 
pesky chances of health defects. Those made the old-fashioned way are labeled as 
"in-valids" and confined to the lower rung of society. 
Vincent Freeman (Ethan Hawke) is one such person, born not too long before the 
genetic process was perfected and forced to grow up in a home with his petrie 
dish-molded younger brother Anton. Fed up with being second-rate and enchanted by 
dreams of one day traveling through space, Vincent leaves home and takes a 
janitorial position at the Gattaca Aerospace Corporation. Everyday, he watches as 
"superior" folk make his fantasy a reality. Determined to do the same, Vincent 
meets a DNA broker (Tony Shalhoub in a funny cameo) who sells fake identities to 
in-valids. His counterpart for this scam is Jerome Morrow (Jude Law), an 
ex-athlete left paralyzed in an accident and confined to a wheelchair for life. 
For a price and the promise of a caretaker, Jerome supplies Vincent with his 
identity, as well as blood, skin and urine samples for all of those pesky 
on-the-job tests and physical examinations -- this future is one where employees 
clock in by pricking their fingers instead of punching a time card. Because of 
his drastically improved status, Vincent is quickly propelled to a high position 
in Gattaca, and catches the eye of comely co-worker Irene (Uma Thurman) on the 
way -- obsessed with her own minor heart defect, she's enamored by his flawless 
persona she doesn't know is a lie. But on the figurative eve of his upcoming 
planetary departure, the mission director is murdered. Two ardent detectives 
(Alan Arkin and Billy Bathgate's Loren Dean) determine the killer is on the 
inside of Gattaca, and the sole clue they find at the crime scene -- one of 
Vincent's eyelashes -- threatens to blow Vincent's cover and derail his goal. 
Even if "Gattaca" were dramatically empty, it would still boast a sublime set of 
production credentials -- the film's look is dazzling without ever being flashy. 
First-time director/writer Andrew Niccol (he also wrote the screenplay for the 
upcoming Jim Carrey drama "The Truman Show") demonstrates a keen eye for the 
stylish; his collaboration with cinematographer Slawomir Idziak, production 
designer Jan Roelfs and costume designer Colleen Atwood result in a sophisticated 
composition that emanates classy, retro ambiance. An opening credits sequence -- 
where skin, nail and hair fragments fall in slow-motion through a colored camera 
lens -- displays these combined talents uncannily. Niccol even utilizes 
voice-over narration (a device almost always poorly-employed) in an effective 
way. 
When it comes to acting, the movie is also flawless. Ethan Hawke does magnificent 
work, proving his ability to carry a film and reaffirming his enormously high 
charisma level. His chemistry with Thurman is a bit on the icy side, but 
needfully so, adding to the setting's clinical chill. As the bitter Jerome, Jude 
Law has a star-making presence, and it's his scenes with Hawke that give the 
movie its fine emotional core. In "Gattaca"'s series of final shots, the fates of 
Vincent and Jerome are superimposed over each other, and the effect is sad, 
lyrical and beautiful. Things get a little strange as the movie nears its climax, 
when Vincent's relationship with his brother comes back into view. The big 
dramatic culmination is a swim race, which is somewhat silly albeit beautifully 
photographed. 
Still, the single most surprising aspect of Gattaca is its use of backdrop -- 
it's successful sci-fi without showy special effects, it's a crisp thriller with 
character-driven thrills, it's a futuristic fable without blood and guts. Even 
its murder mystery is relegated to a secondary subplot, ensuring that a smart 
story about smart people and smart science takes center stage. Although it's 
portrayal of the upcoming century is grim, "Gattaca" serves up one of the most 
thought-provoking societal forecasts ever depicted on film. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for I'll Be Home for Christmas (1998)
I'LL BE HOME FOR CHRISTMAS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Bemoaning "I'll Be Home for Christmas"' lack of originality is pretty 
much a waste of time and effort, since you're aware going in that this 
isn't the type of film to break new ground as far as narrative or 
characters are concerned. And though things here have higher sugar 
content than a sleigh full of candy canes, this tinsel-laden tale's 
simple-minded pleasantness and sporadically clever writing make it 
awfully hard to dismiss in Scrooge-like fashion. 
At least it's a given that young female fans of "Christmas" star 
Jonathan Taylor Thomas will refrain from bah-humbugging on the way out 
of the theatre; they'll presumably get their allowance money's worth of 
the photogenic "Teen Beat" coverboy and erstwhile "Home Improvement" 
star due to the fact that he's in just about every scene. JTT 
comfortably plays a suave California college student named Jake, who, 
after crossing some campus bullies in a botched attempt to help them 
cheat on a history test, is left for dead in the desert clad in only a 
glued-on Santa costume. 
That's a bummer, mostly because Jake was promised a '57 Porsche by dad 
(Gary Cole) if and only if he'd make it to his family's New York home in 
time for Christmas Eve dinner. What's worse, his girlfriend (pretty 
Jessica Biel) is traveling with the studly mastermind (Adam LaVorgna) of 
the plan to deter Jake from vintage automobile paradise. Typical road 
movie situations are given a festive spin as our hero trails his gal pal 
and attempts to get from one side of the country to the other.
As cliche, cloying and laden with plot coincidence as it can be, "I'll 
Be Home for Christmas" musters up more than a handful of good scenes and 
decent laughs. Worth the price of admission alone is a sizeable story 
thread that finds JTT helping a cop (Sean O'Bryan) rekindle a dampened 
romance with his waitress wife; the payoff borders on imaginative. A 
brief bathroom interlude as Thomas tries out his Santa voice on an 
extremely honest little boy is a rib-tickler. For once, a non-animated 
Disney release is more ho-ho-ho than ho-hum. And for that, we can be 
thankful.

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)
Disney / 1:23 / 1989 / G 
Vocal Cast: Jodi Benson; Christopher Daniel Barnes; Pat Carroll; Buddy 
Hackett; Samuel E. Wright; Jason Marin 
Directors: Ron Clements; John Musker 
Screenplay: Ron Clements; John Musker 
Disney's 17-day, special engagement re-release of "The Little Mermaid" 
proves that even their newer animated features can stand the test of 
time, even if only a scant eight years have passed since its original 
debut. Has it really been less than a decade? It certainly feels longer, 
because this 1989 hit made Mickey Mouse a mint and paved the 
crowd-pleasing way for such gems as "Aladdin" and "Beauty and the Beast" 
-- both of which, by the way, seem quite old themselves. 
This loose adaptation of the Hans Christian Andersen fable finds teenage 
mermaid Ariel (lovely voice of Jodi Benson) falling head over fins for 
land-lubber Prince Eric (Christopher Daniel Barnes, who has since gone 
on to play Greg in both of the "Brady Bunch" movies) from afar. Defying 
her father's wishes and ignoring the warnings of a chatty Jamaican crab 
named Sebastian (jovial Samuel E. Wright), she strikes up a deal with 
the evil sea witch Ursula (Pat Carroll) -- her voice for a pair of
legs. In makeshift human form, Ariel makes it on land but finds herself 
without a way to profess her love for Eric. 
Although the male lead isn't as interesting a character as the female, 
"The Little Mermaid" has much strength in telling its simple story with 
brilliant fanfare. The colors are vibrant, the supporting creatures 
charming (even if Buddy Hackett takes birdbrain to the max as a dopey 
seagull), and the songs landmarks on their own. Although I consider the 
recent "Hercules" and "The Hunchback of Notre Dame"to be majestic films, 
I walked out of neither humming like I did with "The Little Mermaid."
Sebastian's pro-ocean jamboree "Under the Sea" is a production number 
yet to be rivaled, and the doo-wop ballad "Kiss the Girl" (connection to 
the current Morgan Freeman rape thriller is purely coincidental) is 
another high point. 
But why "The Little Mermaid," and why now? Aside from a digital and 
audio clean-up, nothing has been changed or added -- no bonuses, no 
alternative ending (remember, Andersen's original was quite a downer), 
not even a cameo by Jabba the Hutt. The answer: Aside from the fact that 
it's a wonderful film, it's also the one movie that jumpstarted Disney's 
animated box office and made the public realize that cartoons aren't 
only for kids. "The Little Mermaid" deserves this kind of treatment. 
Of course, there are those who will say the studio has polished up 
"Mermaid" for this special holiday engagement because its opening date 
bests "Anastasia" -- 20th Century Fox's first tread into Disney's 
animated musical territory -- by a week. But in a year that has also 
seen the theatrical resurrection of such corny tripe as Dirty Dancing, 
perhaps the question is less "Why 'The Little Mermaid'?" than "Why not?" 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
TriStar / 2:05 / 1997 / R (language, explicit violence, sex, brief nudity)
Cast: Sean Penn; Jennifer Lopez; Nick Nolte; Powers Boothe; Claire Danes; Jon Voight; 
Billy Bob Thornton; Joaquin Phoenix; Julie Hagerty; Laurie Metcalf 
Director: Oliver Stone 
Screenplay: John Ridley 
Back in 1993, Oliver Stone's "Natural Born Killers" opened to divided
critical response and an even more mixed audience reaction. People
couldn't agree on exactly what they had seen -- a darkly funny
commentary on media extremes or a crass, gratuitous glorification of
violence. The mainstream crowd is likely to sport a warmer feeling
about Stone's new "U-Turn," a black comedy mood piece that boasts a
superb cast and electrifying production values. Undoubtedly bizarre
and unarguably outlandish, "U-Turn" will probably cause people to look
upon it with either strong like or dislike, but likely more of the
former.
"U-Turn" tells the story of drifter Bobby Cooper (Sean Penn), who's
traveling through the desert en route to pay off a hefty gambling debt
in Las Vegas. A busted radiator strands him in Superior, Arizona, a
derelict mining town that seems to be just on the edge of
reality. Bobby comes to said conclusion after a surreal encounter with
shrewd, disgusting mechanic Darrell (Billy Bob Thornton), who sports a
hideous beer gut and runs the only gas station in the
vicinity. Darrell claims it'll take some time to repair the car, so
Bobby decides to pass the time by roaming around Superior.  Superior
is the kind of town where a panhandler keeps his long dead dog at his
side and an aging Mexican convenience store clerk whips out a shotgun
to enact some vigilante law enforcement; Bobby's money is blown to
smithereens in that second incident.
Things get stranger still as Bobby repeatedly runs across a cast of
unsavory locals.  The only normal person he comes across is Grace
McKenna (Jennifer Lopez), a beautiful Native American who immediately
invites Bobby back to her upscale estate and seems to be seducing him
with every look. But before their mutual attraction can be
consummated, Bobby and Grace are interrupted by her husband Jake (Nick
Nolte), an odious real estate salesman who both knocks Bobby out and
then offers him a ride away from the premises in the same breath. On
the way, Jake makes an intriguing proposal: He'll pay Bobby to kill
his wife. Bobby reluctantly accepts, and upon setting out to do so,
receives a counter offer from Grace.
The setup of "U-Turn" is ripe with the many pleasurable elements of a
neo-Western film noir (some of which were most recently put to good
use in "Red Rock West"): Life insurance policies, bloody homicides,
double-crosses aplenty and pitch-black humor.  All of this territory
is predictable genre stuff, but Stone executes each new plot
development with extremely intriguing visuals. "U-Turn" (like every
other Stone movie since "JFK") is ripe with entrancing, audacious
sights, and here, they work well to give the proceedings an edge and
never reach the level of sense-overkill like they did in Natural Born
Killers. Occasionally, Stone's employment of these different film
stocks is out of place -- the initial encounter between Grace and
Bobby could have been steamy and erotic if not for all the jump cuts
and close-ups -- but generally, his stylistic devices work
extraordinarily well.
Another area that "U-Turn" aces is casting. Following a several-year
absence from movie projects, the omnipresent Penn (he can also be seen
currently in "The Game" and "She's So Lovely") is sublime in a tricky
role -- he can never seem too comical or too serious, and deftly
manages just the right mix of both. Lopez is also exceptional as the
film's question-marked object of desire; she's both a good girl and a
bad girl, and we understand why men are alternately lusting after her
or attempting to kill her. Meanwhile, Nolte aces one of his riskiest
parts yet. Underused but priceless are Clare Danes as a doofy hick and
an unrecognizable Jon Voight as a blind Indian vet. And worth the
admission fee alone is the twirly beehive and apparently crack-induced
flirtatious behavior of Julie Hagerty as a greasy spoon waitress named
-- get this -- Flo.
"U-Turn" is similar to last spring's trippy "Lost Highway" in its
bizarre characters, eccentric goings-on and elliptical structure, but
this movie, unlike David Lynch's sloppy tale, at least seems to make
sense when it's all over. And when it is all over, you'll be slapping
yourself in the forehead -- it's a wicked, funny twist that you
realize you should have anticipated beforehand. "U-Turn" is one of
Oliver Stone's more accessible, most enjoyable films, and maybe that
will distinguish it from the glut of other fall movies causing a
seasonal traffic jam of cruddy releases.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Rating: ***1/2 (out of ****)
Columbia / 1:43 / 1999 / R (language, violence, strong drug use,
sexuality, glimpses of nudity)
Cast: Sarah Polley; Desmond Askew; Jay Mohr; Scott Wolf;Taye Diggs;
William Fichtner; J.E. Freeman; Katie Holmes; Timothy Olyphant; Jane
Krakowski; Breckin Meyer; James Duval
Director: Doug Liman
Screenplay: John August
The emphatic title of "Go" alternates as a well-deserved, one-word
recommendation of the movie itself: Don't dawdle, don't deliberate,
don't protest, just _go_. It also functions as a well-deserved, one-word
summary of what happens in the movie: The characters here are constantly
_on_ the go, outrunning disgruntled junkies, angry strip club thugs or
their own mistakes. Slap the double-meanings together and you've got one
seriously wild ride. To pass "Go" would be to deny yourself the rush of
watching fine filmmaking, a truly unpredictable storyline and spirited
acting come together in a fully satisfying whole.
A rush of a different kind accompanies the on-screen action, which
begins with a Ecstasy deal gone horribly awry and paves the way for
trips - literal and figurative - into territory seedier still. A
snowball effect of sorts starts in "Go"'s opening scenes, as
strapped-for-cash supermarket clerk Ronna (Sarah Polley) agrees to take
the shift of British co-worker Simon (Desmond Askew) so he can travel to
Las Vegas with his mates and she can hopefully nab enough cash to avoid
being evicted from her Los Angeles pad. How convenient, then, that she
stumbles into an opportunity to make some extracurricular dough via
dabbling in the drug trade.
With a breakneck pace and fine attention to detail, all this is nearly
perfectly realized - and only the first in a series of three separate
but interlocking "chapters" cooked up by debut screenwriter John August.
Bravo to him for keeping momentum dizzily spinning throughout "Go," even
if the influence of Quentin Tarantino is fairly obvious in narrative
structure, a key soundtrack selection and same scenes shown through
several different points-of-view. Could this film have been made without
"Pulp Fiction" or "Reservoir Dogs"? Maybe not. Does that negate its
intoxicating good-time vibe? Definitely not.
Besides, to call "Go" totally Tarantino overlooks its original energy,
style and tone. These assets spark the remaining pair of vignettes,
although they aren't quite up to the challenge of topping Ronna's
hilariously chaotic plight (though the finale comes close). In the
middle section, the focus is on Simon and company, as they recklessly
tear through Sin City and get a nudie bar crew on their bad sides. Then,
a couple of soap stars (Jay Mohr and Scott Wolf), significant
role-players in Ronna's quest for excess, spend a bizarre Christmas
dinner with a strange cop (William Fichtner) and his stranger wife (Jane
Krakowski).
That last bit provides "Go"'s biggest laugh, as Fichtner's understated
performance successfully compliments his unforeseeable ulterior motives.
Other MVPs that shine in an already supremely polished cast: Polley,
unfazed and quite the entrepenuer; Katie Holmes as her best bud, cutely
nervous and caustic when issued by Polley as collateral to a dealer;
Timothy Olyphant as the dealer, his dangerous profession and demeanor
hiding the fact that he's a pretty OK guy; Taye Diggs as a suave,
meditative high-roller; and the always engaging Breckin Meyer,
delightfully over-the-top as a crude homeboy-wannabe.
Director Doug Liman went the same route in "Swingers," combining
colorful people, snappy dialogue and a jazzy locale, but "Go" goes his
freshman feature a few better by upping both dramatic urgency and
production values. Most of the plot threads, for example, end up
congregating in a place that would have been way out of "Swingers"'
budget - a seductively glowing, techno-pumping warehouse rave. It's an
ironic setting to bring everything in "Go" together, because this movie
deserves some raves of its own.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"And not only do we see genitalia in this movie - they do exercises."
-Roger Ebert on "Pink Flamingos"

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
BABE: PIG IN THE CITY
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
This "Babe" picks up with the titular porker leading a peaceful 
existence on the serene country farm of Farmer Hoggett (James Cromwell, 
briefly reprising his Oscar-nominated role from the first movie). But a 
series of complications and crises leads Babe (voiced by E.G. Daily, who 
can also be heard as Tommy in "The Rugrats Movie") and Mrs. Hoggett 
(Magda Szubanski) on a quest for prize money and strands them in a big, 
frightening metropolis, the abstract likes of which haven't been seen 
since Tim Burton's last "Batman" film. 
There, the pair crash at an inn populated mostly by creatures great and 
small who also have the gift of gab but live in fear of the city's 
stringent animal-control policies. Before long, Babe has gained the 
trust of the hotel hierarchy - including a pair of malapropping chimps 
(Steven Wright and Glenn Headly) and a wizened orangutan (James Cosmo) - 
and also a gang of homeless, mock-vicious street strays lead by a 
tough-talking pitbull (Stanley Ralph Ross); together, they veer in and 
out of trouble. 
That director George Miller (the producer of "Babe" 1) is also the 
creator of Australia's Mad Max movies seems to explain why "Pig in the 
City" is such a bizarre film. Miller's impressive visual dynamo steers 
toward many memorable sights even when the scenes that show them off 
play on for too long. Couple that with the overt gloom of some passages 
and you've got prime examples of how this "Babe" might be too much for 
the wee ones to bear - a depressing sequence where Babe's furry friends 
get impounded almost extends to the point of morbitiy. 
Other affairs that threaten the movie's G-rating include the implication 
of an airport cavity search for Mrs. Hoggett (!), a crippled terrier who 
has flashes of the afterlife following a nasty accident, and even 
glimpses of pretty city girls in thongs that don't leave much to the 
imagination. But these head-scratching moments are simple distractions, 
not overt detractions; "Babe: Pig in the City" is simply too fun a 
fantasy to be hampered by out-of-place moments, especially given that 
the entire movie blindsides the viewer. 
So the first "Babe" ends up winning by a snout, but this 
handsomely-mounted charmer comes in a close second. All too precious is 
the film's flawless pastiche of real, animatronic and computer-generated 
critters - most memorably, a 20-cat chorus that belts out a heavenly 
rendition of "Three Blind Mice." Though naysayers (make that 
_neigh_-sayers) may dismiss the notion as just more of the same, a third 
"Babe" adventure doesn't seem out of the question, because for all of 
its uncanny nuances and twisted peculiarities, "Pig in the City" brings 
home the bacon.

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
BRIDE OF CHUCKY
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Chucky (again voiced by Brad Dourif), of course, is the star of the 
"Child's Play" series, a My Buddy-type doll possessed by the spirit of a 
slain serial killer. In "Bride," the plot (heh) picks up with his 
girlfriend Tiffany (Jennifer Tilly) resurrecting Chucky's remains (he 
was blown up at the end of "Child's Play 3") with the help of a black 
arts manual called "Voodoo for Dummies." Silly mortal. Before long, 
she's also been reduced to shin-high figurine status, and the plastic 
incarnations of these one-time lunatic lovebirds hit the road to scope 
out some potential new human bodies. 
The rest of this rocky horror puppet show plays out as Tiff and the 
Chuckster stalk a young couple (Nick Stabile and Katherine Heigl) with 
conjugal plans of their own, leading them towards a New Jersey grave 
where a magical, soul-transferring amulet allegedly lies in wait. Along 
the way, our murderous Barbie and Ken go through post-marriage motions 
similar to any given pair of newlyweds - bicker, argue, kiss and make 
up. But when they squabble over who's going to do the dishes, watch out. 
Hey, even faux people have got to work through their problems. 
Director Ronny Yu keeps the mayhem flashy and stages an inventive scene 
or two, but not even visual flair can make up for the fact that these 
creepy Kewpies are neither scary nor menacing. When one of them charges, 
it's nothing a good forward punt couldn't take care of. And when a 
climactic chase scene is needed, one of the dim-bulb protagonists must 
_pick_Chucky_up_ so the demonic toy can force his hostage to run at 
gunpoint. Throw in some silly casualties and a ridiculous ending (will 
"Son of Chucky" be next?) and this is a bizarrely bad 89-minutes at the 
movies. 
As is the thing to do in post-"Scream" slasher cinema, Don Mancini's 
screenplay slathers on the in-jokes and genre-parody. But little of the 
humor succeeds, proving self-reference can be completely worthless when 
it lacks bite. To be fair, though, most of "Bride of Chucky" is on 
auto-pilot, so it's not quite right to single out one misfired aspect of 
the film. Similarly shaky, the acting ranges from screeching camp to 
boring bland, the effects aren't that special and the story is one big 
groaner. Here's hoping Chucky and his entire clan - past, present and 
future - rest in peace.

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
Rating: ** (out of four)
Dimension / 1:35 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, thematic material, muted sex)
Cast: Katie Holmes; Helen Mirren; Barry Watson; Marisa Coughlan; Jeffrey
Tambor; Michael McKean; Lesley Anne Warren; Molly Ringwald; Vivica A.
Fox
Director: Kevin Williamson
Screenplay: Kevin Williamson
One exits "Teaching Mrs. Tingle" wishing horror scribe extraordinaire
Kevin Williamson had been taught a few more lessons before being set
loose on his own. Sure, the guy knows his genre well, as evidenced by
his fun screenplays for boo-machines from "I Know What You Did Last
Summer" to "The Faculty." And no doubt he learned the tricks of the
trade during his two "Scream" collaborations with suspense maestro Wes
Craven. But for some reason, tangled "Tingle" - Williamson's debut
wearing both screenwriting and directing hats - doesn't find the
wunderkind at the top of his game.
Maybe it's the story, which exchanges the subversive humor, staggering
body counts and spiffy plot twists synonymous with Williamson projects
past for 90 minutes of talky, tawdry psychological warfare between four
people - a trio of high school students and the meanest history teacher
to ever grade papers. As the terrible Mrs. Tingle (the latter, in case
you're wondering), great British actress Helen Mirren comes off like
Margaret Hamilton in librarian ensembles and would feel right at home
alongside the evil educators in "The Faculty." For finer Williamson,
rent that 1998 sci-fi lark and skip this messy melodrama.
Tingle catches straight-A senior Leigh Ann ("Dawson's Creek"'s Katie
Holmes) with a crib sheet she was only holding for her boozer
boyfriend-wannabe (Barry Watson) and decides to report them to the
principal - just days before graduation. What's a distressed missy with
valedictorian potential to do? Why, traipse across the neighborhood to
Mrs. Tingle's residence with a third pal/witness (Marisa Coughlan) and
plead her case in person, of course. And if, upon arrival, a struggle
erupts and Tingle ends up tied to her bed? Well, this kind of
problem-solving they didn't cover in fifth period.
Never explored: How Tingle retains her Mrs. status when no husband is in
sight and she's carrying on with the football coach (funny Jeffrey
Tambor, around to enliven the movie's midsection). Or if woodworking is
among the talents of one character, who breaks and then must reassemble
a headboard so that a later scene can occur. Or from where a strangely
sudden sex romp between Holmes and Watson comes. This kind of disturbing
behavior is expected from a hormonally-charged "Creek" gal, but he - a
regular on the WB's inspirational "7th Heaven" - should know better.
Mirren adds chilly class to "Teaching," then gets shortchanged when her
Tingle goes full-tilt psycho for a bone-smashing, crossbow-chucking
climax. Holmes surrenders to similar circumstances, introduced in the
movie as a rational straight-arrow and finishing on a level of dementia
equivalent to that of her adversary. By the time the final image
flickers across the screen, ask yourself two highly problematic
questions: Does a key line of dialogue negate the fact that these kids
committed a vast array of imprisonable offenses? And does the film
really suggest they deserve what they get?
"Teaching Mrs. Tingle" might keep you interested to see how Holmes and
posse escape from the corner they paint themselves in, but it's soon
apparent that a similar fate has befallen Williamson. However, since his
treatment for the eagerly-awaited "Scream 3" is currently finalizing
principle photography and slated for a December release, we'll cut him a
bit of slack for this dishonor-roll flick: detention instead of
expulsion.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu | darth_fluff@yahoo.com
Hey! You! Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"The best possible argument for including [a shot of Bruce] Willis'
genitals would have been that the movie, after all, contains everything
else." -Roger Ebert on "Color of Night"

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
LOST IN SPACE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
In 2058, Earth is sustaining itself by branching out into the cosmos, 
and one family is selected to play a key role in the colonization 
process. They are the Robinsons -- Professor John (William Hurt), his 
wife Maureen (Mimi Rogers) and their children Judy (Heather Graham), 
Penny (Lacey Chabert) and Will (Jack Johnson) -- and the intended plan 
is for them, along with gung-ho pilot Major Don West (Matt LeBlanc), to 
board the spacecraft Jupiter 2 and make a many-year journey to the 
distant planet Alpha Prime. Once there, the crew will establish some 
sort of portal that will allow Earthlings to make the jump to Alpha 
Prime in no time. But thanks to villainous saboteur and stowaway Dr. 
Smith (Gary Oldman) and his Global Sedition cohorts, things don't quite 
go so smoothly. Around a half-day into the flight, the Jupiter 2 is 
thrown off course. When everyone comes to, they're in a foreign place in 
an unspecified time, and must find their way back home or remain lost in 
space forever. 
In patches, "Lost in Space" is as glibly fun as a video game. Director 
Stephen Hopkins (that awful killer-lion flick "The Ghost and the 
Darkness") brings the major action sequences, surprisingly few though 
they are, to giddy, palpable life. Two extended bits stand out from the 
eventual blur: the initial siege on the Jupiter 2 by the nameless Robot 
programmed to protect and aid the Robinsons, and the search through a 
creepy ghost ship as the movie nears its midsection. That Robot (yes, he 
gets to say the immortal line, "Danger, Will Robinson! Danger!"), by the 
way, is a far better way to entertain the family audiences than the 
computer-generated Blawp, a cuddly, Gizmo-esque creature the Robinsons 
pick up on their trek. The Blawp doesn't even look like it's sharing the 
same scenes with the human actors, but most of the other special effects 
work nicely, especially the movie's sleek sets. 
The interesting ensemble cast is partially ill-used. Oldman always makes 
a good bad guy, and his "Lost in Space" work makes one wish that the 
movie hadn't cut to some special effect every time his Dr. Smith 
threatens to become a complex personality. On the plus side, Hurt and 
Johnson have a realistic father-and-son chemistry. Matt LeBlanc is 
essentially playing his "Friends" alter-ego as a hotshot hero (complete 
with one-liners like, "Okay, last one to kill a bad guy buys the 
beer!"), but his aloof swagger works, and this movie is, at least, way 
better than Ed. Mimi Rogers and Heather Graham (Rollergirl from "Boogie 
Nights"), lovely and talented though they are, are trotted out whenever 
a reaction shot is needed; Graham's sexual flirtation with LeBlanc is 
never developed and largely feels like wasted time. Spunky Lacey Chabert 
("Party of Five") fares the worst, sounding like she's been sucking on a 
helium tank while offscreen. 
"Lost in Space" was written by Akiva Goldsman, the man behind the script 
for the very underrated (and surely I can't be the only one to think so) 
"Batman & Robin." He's toned down the series' high camp factor in place 
of a dark, more sinister edge, which serves the first 60 minutes of the 
movie well. But "Lost in Space"'s murky tone and visuals just don't mesh 
with part two's elongated family therapy session. This year's first 
official summer release is a botched one, with too many distractions and 
flaws to even rank as pleasing eye-candy -- a big no-no as far as 
seasonal movies are concerned. As Robot might say, "Danger, moviegoers! 
Danger!" 

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
Paramount / 1:37 / 1997 / R (mucho gore, violence, language, nudity)
Cast: Laurence Fishburne; Sam Neill; Kathleen Quinlan; Joely Richardson; 
Richard T. Jones; Jack Noseworthy; Jason Isaacs; Sean Pertwee; Holley 
Chant 
Director: Paul Anderson 
Screenplay: Philip Eisner 
A traditional ghost story dressed up in spiffy sci-fi trappings, "Event 
Horizon" plays like a patchwork assembly of the "Alien" films with a 
spooky demonic presence in place of the nasty outer-space monster. In 
fact, it's so derivative in pretty much every imaginable way, that it 
makes "Mimic" -- another new release that heavily incorporates bits and 
pieces from the afore-mentioned trilogy -- look like a complete 
original. "Horizon" isn't ever the movie event it aspires to be, but, 
boy, it does have its weird moments. 
If being something of a copycat is a hefty drawback, then at least 
"Event Horizon" is successful in setting up its terrifying atmosphere. 
Director Paul Anderson (who made the awful "Mortal Kombat") and 
production designer Joseph Bennett kick off the creepy proceedings 
incredibly well; that even the slightest detail -- in one scene, a lone 
drop of water -- seems menacing is a testament to that. But after a 
stable first hour or so, it becomes all too clear where Philip Eisner's 
screenplay is getting ready to go. 
The film takes its title from a prototype spaceship that mysteriously 
turns up somewhere off the crust of Neptune in 2047 following a 
seven-year disappearance. Event Horizon inventor Dr. William Weir (Sam 
Neill) and emergency team leader Captain Miller (Laurence Fishburne) 
head a crew aboard a search-and-rescue craft to intercept the Horizon 
and find out what happened to those on board. A radio transmission gives 
Weir and company little hope -- distinguishable among the mass screaming 
is "Liberate me!", a Latin plea for help. 
Their perspectives don't improve after climbing aboard and finding what 
appears to be blood and entrails caked on the walls. Miller's corps -- 
who include Kathleen Quinlan, Richard T. Jones ("The Trigger Effect") 
and Joely Richardson ("101 Dalmatians") -- make several other disturbing 
discoveries, one of them being a surprise confession from Weir and a 
video tape of ship goings-on that becomes suspiciously snowy at one key 
moment. Before long, there appears to be an evil visitor lurking in the 
Event Horizon's core, something that is capable of turning the team's 
worst fears against them. It first preys upon Miller's engineer Justin 
(Jack Noseworthy). 
Every twist "Event Horizon" takes, the less involving it becomes, 
finally degenerating into an exceedingly silly, endlessly gory climax 
where Fishburne gets to wallop a nude, scabby Neill and the blood flows 
like cherry Kool-Aid -- literally. A rule stating the less that's shown, 
the more horrifying it can be is certainly true in this case. For 
instance, one of the movie's "huge scares" (when we're shown what 
exactly is on the security tape) made me laugh so hard I nearly fell out 
of my seat -- it looks like a kinkier, more explicit Marilyn Manson 
music video (although it might be worth focusing on if you've ever 
wondered what it looks like when someone's intestines are pulled out 
through their mouth). 
I never found "Event Horizon" unwatchable, but it is disappointing that 
what starts out so strong finishes up like "Alien" by way of Clive 
Barker and David Lynch. The movie tells us too much too fast, and as a 
result, exactly where the ship has been is pretty easy to figure out. 
Also, "Horizon" treats the obvious villain somewhat ambiguously, so it's 
no shock when he wields a Ginsu and carves up victims in an icky manner 
that would impress Hannibal Lecter. Other characters are
shakily developed, too. Fishburne is excellent, but Miller is low enough 
on personality so that you never quite root for him, and Brooks just 
hangs around to provide unnecessary comic relief. Quinlan and Noseworthy 
-- both of whom starred in last May's "Breakdown" -- are the real 
standouts here. 
So while at least half of "Event Horizon"'s substance is problematic, it 
does a fantastic job with visuals and ambience. The seemingly dynamic 
hand of effects supervisor Richard Yuricich molds some really exciting, 
dazzling sights, and it's also interesting to see science-fiction that 
focuses on religious nuances rather than slime-dripping creatures, even 
if "Contact" did beat it to the punch (and do a far better job). The 
movie covers fascinating, absorbing territory for a while, but when the 
Event Horizon goes to hell, so, in many areas, does the film. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Grease (1978)
GREASE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
A very skinny John Travolta and a very young Olivia Newton-John have the 
respective leads of Danny Zuko and Sandy Olsson, and their pairing still 
ranks as one of screendom's most effervescently charming. For those 
eight of you who aren't familiar with the story, here's a brief recap: 
Greaser bad boy Danny and Aussie good girl Sandy are reunited for their 
1959 senior year at Rydell High after a brief fling during the summer; 
both thought she was going to return to her native continent before 
school started, but both were wrong. Sandy tries to rekindle their 
relationship, but Danny's too cool a cat to fall for her wholesome 
appeal in front of his T-Bird buddies (including Jeff Conaway). So Sandy 
hooks up with a gang herself -- the Pink Ladies, headed by sassy, sexy 
Rizzo (Stockard Channing, just superb as an independent woman well ahead 
of her time) -- and Danny, who still really feels love for her, attempts 
a compromise of ideals in order to win her back. 
The drag race finale is yet something of a drag, and I never have 
thought much of "Greased Lightening," the film's big "guy" number (that 
choreography -- ack!), but "Grease"'s flaws amount too few to carp. The 
movie's first showpiece is "Summer Nights," where Danny and Sandy 
separately recount wildly different versions of their fun-in-the-sun 
romance. Not only is "Nights" tremendously catchy, but it's also a smart 
look at how men and women see the same events with varying eyes. There 
has yet to be a live-action musical sequence that rivals the one-two 
punch of "You're the One That I Want" and "We Go Together," "Grease"'s 
euphoric cappers. All this and some of the most pleasing moments come 
from the smaller, quieter moments; the Oscar-nominated "Hopelessly 
Devoted to You" is a lovely showcase for Newton-John, and Channing's 
lamenting ballad "There Are Worse Things I Could Do" is one of 
"Grease"'s most unjustly overlooked tunes. 
The soundtrack is remastered (though Travolta still hits that awful high 
note at the end of "Nights") and the restored widescreen allows us to 
see previously pan-and-scanned-out choreography, but nothing else has 
changed -- no computer-generated backgrounds, no outtakes or new musical 
numbers, no Jabba the Hutt cameos. And it's a testament to "Grease"'s 
timeless success that nothing needs to be changed -- it's the same 
all-around blast it's always been, with an appealing cast in a fun story 
told with great music. To '90s viewers, "Grease" will probably recall 
disco and bellbottoms as much as it made its original audience nostalgic 
for doo-wop and poodle skirts. But regardless of what decade it 
transports us to, we can all agree on one thing -- without a doubt, 
"Grease" is still the word.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Dimension / 2:00 / 1997 / R (gore, violence, language)
Cast: Neve Campbell; Courteney Cox; David Arquette; Jamie Kennedy; Jerry 
O'Connell; Elise Neal; Timothy Olyphant; Liev Schreiber; Sara Michelle 
Gellar; Laurie Metcalf; Jada Pinkett; Omar Epps; Lewis Arquette; Duane 
Martin; Heather Graham; Tori Spelling 
Director: Wes Craven 
Screenplay: Kevin Williamson 
(Dimension Films, "Scream 2"'s distributor, has asked press to say 
extremely little -- if anything -- about the film's twisty plot. That's 
no easy task considering the wit that deserves to be mentioned here, but 
I will do my best to be vague (now, there's a first).)
"The first one was [good], but all the rest sucked," said a  
cinematically-savvy teen in last winter's Wes Craven thriller "Scream," 
her statement referring to the films of the "Nightmare on Elm Street" 
series but really putting down franchise overkill in general. The 
comment certainly carries clout: For every truly great sequel, there 
appears to be a couple of duds, making one wonder if writers are better 
off sticking solely with fresh ideas. But like it or not, along comes 
"Scream 2." And believe it or not, it's a doozy -- a slick, sinister, 
madly subversive good time at the movies, as intent on sending up 
Hollywood's sequel syndrome as much as its prequel poked fun at slasher 
conventions. "Scream 2" is definitely that rare movie thing -- a 
follow-up that can stand along side its original with pride. 
It's been two years since a pair of overzealous horror movie fans clad 
in Edvard Munch-esque get-ups carved their way through the young 
populace of Woodsboro, California. Those surviving the ordeal have 
gotten on with their lives. Plucky heroine Sidney Prescott (Neve 
Campbell) is a drama student at the Midwestern Windsor College; her pop 
culture-whiz pal Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy) has tagged along. Trash 
tabloid reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has written a best-seller 
based on their ordeal, the basis of which has been turned into a (very 
bad) movie called "Stab." And Dewey Riley (David Arquette), still 
suffering from wounds inflicted during "Scream," has left his job as a 
police officer for a while. 
Life is tranquil ... at least for a while. Several sudden murders bring 
Sidney, Randy, Gale and Dewey together again, but with suspicious eyes 
cast on each other and most of those in their surroundings -- if these 
four people learned anything from the past, it's to trust no one. Thus, 
the possible victim/potential killer list includes said quartet, as well 
as: Derek (Jerry O'Connell), Sidney's new beau; Cici (Sara Michelle 
Gellar), a chatty sorority gal; Joel (Duane Martin), Gale's cameraman 
who's not too thrilled with her blood-soaked past; Hallie (Elise Neal), 
Sidney's sassy roommate; Debbie (Laurie Metcalf), a local reporter who 
gives Gale some not-too-friendly competition; and Mickey (Timothy 
Olyphant), Randy's good friend and fellow film student. Cotton Weary 
(Liev Schreiber), the man Sidney wrongly accused of her mother's murder 
in Scream, also shows up on campus -- but why? 
Like the first Scream, Craven and screenwriter Kevin Williamson 
inaugurate things with a bang. This time, it's an extended sequence that 
finds an African-American couple (Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps) attending 
a sneak preview of "Stab," making sly references about everything from 
Sandra Bullock to the lunchmeat non-roles of blacks in slasher cinema. 
Before tragedy ensues at the screening, the movie-within-a-movie setup 
allows for plenty of jokey moments, including a scene from "Stab" which 
turns Scream's now-famous Drew Barrymore prologue on its ear. ("B----, 
hang up the phone and Star-69 his a--!" Pinkett yells at the screen.) 
It's funny, creepy stuff (I don't think I'll ever feel safe in a movie 
theater again) that effectively foreshadows the ratio of smart scares 
and spoofy laughs down the road. Another flawless example of this is a 
riotous cell phone-assault of the killer on Randy, Dewey and Gale in 
broad daylight; it builds comedically and ends with genuine terror 
because of the emotional investment made on these delicious characters. 
There are other superb set pieces, but explaining them risks ruining 
their effect. 
There are more players this time around as to provide both a higher 
number suspects and a staggering body count. It's something of a 
trade-in -- the new characters are too large in number to be as 
fully-developed as the original "Scream" gang, but this movie packs in 
knowing performances (especially by Kennedy and Cox) and more death for 
your dollar. It can be argued that, while the original might outclass it 
by a tad, Scream 2 is both scarier and funnier. It certainly doesn't 
skimp with shocks -- a major one being the killing of one cast member 
very near and dear to my heart (I actually questioned Craven and 
Williamson's judgment here, considering how much this person has added 
to these films). Sometimes you wish that more could have been done with 
Stab -- the two scenes we're shown are dead-on -- but for film fans, 
there are plenty of subtle nods to movies like "The Usual Suspects," 
"Aliens" and "The Empire Strikes Back." 
Still, "Scream 2" does so many things right, it's petty to quibble. Its 
penchant for parody is irresistible, discussions of the merits of film 
sequels and all. The attractive, solid cast is a definite bonus. And the 
denouement (while not as shocking as "Scream"'s) is priceless; the 
film's final revelation incorporates bits of a particular horror film 
prominently referred to in "Scream" with one of the best bad guy motives 
ever put on paper. All this and a "Scream 3" is in the works. Knowing 
the series' tendency for self-reference, perhaps one of its characters 
will again discuss the concept of sequel justice. Mentioning "Scream 
2"'ll help them in their argument. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The "SNL" incarnation of "Roxbury," as fans of the show already know, 
follows the plight of two wild-and-crazy-wannabes (played by Will 
Ferrell and Chris Kattan) as they peruse - and get thrown out of - the 
L.A. club scene for violently pelvic-thrusting pretty ladies, all the 
while bobbing their heads to the beat of Haddaway's dance hit "What Is 
Love?" Not much meat to build an 87-minute story on, and boy, does it 
show. For those keeping track, the movie's biggest accomplishment is 
giving these loser siblings names - Steve and Doug Butabi. 
The Butabis ambition, for lack of a better word, is to one day gain 
passage into the Roxbury, a swank, Studio 54-esque nightspot that celebs 
like Richard Grieco (playing himself) frequent. Once Steve (Ferrell) and 
Doug (Kattan) finally make it inside, due to a Grieco-involved auto 
mishap that's perhaps the most complicated thing about the film, the 
Roxbury angle is pushed aside for some boring business involving trampy 
golddiggers, brotherly dissension and Steve's impending nuptials with 
the heiress (Molly Shannon) of a lightbulb enterprise. 
At least that last development allows for an uproarious wedding climax 
that manages to pull off witty jabs at "The Graduate," "Say Anything 
..." and "Jerry Maguire," all one right after the other. And although 
those spoofs are probably "A Night at the Roxbury"'s sole claims to 
hitting the comedic bullseye, there is enough sporadic lowbrow silliness 
to impress those looking for a cinematic good time a la "Dumb and 
Dumber" - these guys make those guys look like Stanford grads. Ferrell 
and Kattan must be, er, complimented for their ability to, uh, lose 
themselves in their characters. 
Loni Anderson shows up with that scary cleavage of hers as the Butabi's 
plastic surgery-addicted mom, and Chazz Palminteri does a turn as the 
Roxbury's owner, a goateed lothario fond of asking various friends and 
patrons, "Did you grab my a--?" But the former refrains from speaking 
much and the latter isn't even billed - it seems that even the on-hand 
talent was aware of how unevenly unhip "A Night at the Roxbury" is. Oh, 
sure, those that eat the Butabis up in their weekly fragmented "SNL" 
format will really love this ... but what is love, really?

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
DISTURBING BEHAVIOR
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
In this greatest-hits mesh of "The Stepford Wives," "Village of the 
Damned," "Invasion of the Body Snatchers" and (oh, why not?) "A 
Clockwork Orange," a sinister force is at work in the nice little 
community of Cradle Bay, turning a large percentage of the young adult 
populace into ideal, zombie-like preppies whose primary concerns include 
the honor roll and bake sale strategies. New-kid-in-town Steve (James 
Marsden) makes friends with Cradle Bay outcasts Gavin (Nick Stahl) and 
Rachel (Katie Holmes); together they become increasingly suspect of 
their classmates' unnaturally perfect existence, and begin to uncover a 
conspiracy involving their peers' own parents. 
Even though the story plays its silly scares with a straight face, 
"Disturbing Behavior" isn't a complete bust -- it's just nowhere near 
the clever, frightening post-Scream thriller it so aspires to be. The 
wannabe-trendy dialogue is chuckle-worthy for all the wrong reasons, and 
with lines like "Self-mutilate this, fluid boy" and "Who put the acid in 
my Spam?", it's no wonder. Late in the film, when Steve and Rachel find 
unsettling surprises in a dark, dreary asylum, the scene plays like 
"Awakenings" on crank. Since what's really missing here is running audio 
commentary from the "Mystery Science Theater 3000" gang, you might be 
enticed to create your own. 
Holmes, of "Dawson's Creek" fame, survives her howler-heavy part with 
her fresh reputation in tact, although this is one film her precocious 
television buddies would definitely pass judgement on. Stahl and Marsden 
make the most out of their roles as well, but the latter is saddled with 
a head-scratcher subplot involving a sibling who committed suicide. In 
the movie's most frenzied performance, William Sadler (the Grim Reaper 
from "Bill and Ted's Bogus Journey"), as a wild-and-crazy janitor, chows 
on the scenery, coughs it back up and devours it again. It's called 
"unsubtle foreshadowing" when he uses a high-pitched radio frequency to 
cure his boiler room of a rat problem. 
Those seeking gobs of blood and guts are better off checking out "Saving 
Private Ryan" this weekend -- the most violent scene here includes just 
a forced nosering removal. The film itself is also a pretty painless 
sit, thanks to a running time that barely constitutes 80 minutes -- and 
that includes the several seconds devoted to a completely unnecessary 
breast shot. At least you can't accuse "Disturbing Behavior" of wearing 
out its wack-job welcome, even if it does squander its potentially 
intriguing subject material in favor of something hip, fast, flashy and 
filled with enough good-looking teens to make a whole new Aaron Spelling 
series. Mark my words: This flick is a midnight movie in the making.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
Warner Bros. / 2:16 / 1999 / R (language, violence, icky sci-fi goo)
Cast: Keanu Reeves; Laurence Fishburne; Carrie-Anne Moss; Joe
Pantoliano; Hugo Weaving; Julian Arahanga
Director: Andy Wachowski; Larry Wachowski
Screenplay: Andy Wachowski; Larry Wachowski
Keanu Reeves as an alleged Chosen One destined to liberate the enslaved
human race of a grungy futuristic setting instantly sounds like a bad
idea to end all bad ideas - it's Ted "Theodore" Logan as Mad Moses
Beyond Thunderdome! Any film capable of mining a casting coup out of
this ripe-for-ridicule synopsis, however, promises to take a lot of
people by surprise, and that's just what "The Matrix" will presumably do
with Reeves and still more adventurous elements. While watching "The
Matrix," the pulse is quickened, the eyes are dazzled and the brain is
twisted beyond recognition several times over.
Unfortunately, this is also a movie that isn't as deep as it sometimes
pretends to be, pleases viscerally more often than mentally and sports
murky concepts up the wazoo. The latter flaw definitely detracts from
the viewing experience, as important and much-needed exposition arrives
in sudden bursts of dialogue too thick to take in all at once - even
this typically story-savvy critic was left gasping for air (or at least
a rewind button) in certain places. But is it really fair to criticize a
film that boasts the imagination to create and continually play by its
own rules? Maybe not.
"The Matrix" provides a great deal of intrigue in early moments, where
Reeves' computer expert Neo slips into panic mode after being contacted
by a group of underground hackers lead by shady types Morpheus (Laurence
Fishburne) and Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss). They freak him out with
several disturbing bombshells - among them, 1999 is not 1999
(definitely), reality is an illusion created by malevolent robots that
have enslaved the world populace for battery power (probably), and Neo
is the dude who shall deliver us (possibly). Reeves' dazed, fazed and
generally endearing demeanor works for him in this role.
Before long, Morpheus begins playing Yoda to Neo' Luke Skywalker,
training him with a literal interpretation of the En Vogue dance hit
"Free Your Mind" - do so and almost any physical feat is possible in
this falsified universe (with the right computer upload, of course).
Wanna learn jujitsu? Done. Wanna be able to vault from skyscraper to
skyscraper in a lone leap? _Voila_. These sequences make for some
genuinely exhilarating moments - namely a hand-to-hand match between
Reeves and Fishburne that starts off in silly fight stances and finishes
up with spectacular gravity-defying choreography.
Then comes the empty midsection, which would be a downright snooze if it
weren't so hole-riddled and confusing. Not only are most of the weird
explanatory bits forcefully spewed forth here, the thrills take an
ill-fated detour with several head-scratching sidetracks involving a
half-baked act of mutiny and a supremely strange visit to an all-knowing
entity known as the Oracle. Brothers Andy and Larry Wachowski,
co-scribes and -directors here, seem guilty of both over- and
underwriting in these hazy passages, but their handling of most other
material is pitch-perfect.
"The Matrix" isn't so weak as to be labeled a sophomore slump for those
creative Wachowski boys, though 1996's nifty crime-drama "Bound," their
feature film debut, came together more cohesively. Even if their second
act doesn't live up to its awe-inspiring bookends, give them credit for
regaining footing for a sensational final half-hour that finds Reeves
and company infiltrating enemy headquarters and unleashing the Force -
or whatever it's called - to the fullest. This includes further unique
special effects like enabling the actors to run across walls and limbo
under slow-motion bullet trails.
When it sticks to incomparable tricks and treats like these, "The
Matrix" is deeply cool - perhaps enough to catch again if you're sure
the narrative will flow better. In other words, the likelihood of
running commentary by the Wachowskis addressing the huhs of the plot, as
well as other behind-the-scenes extras answering the technical-related
hows, on "The Matrix"'s sure-to-be-upcoming DVD release might be too
good to pass on, even for those who don't find the movie very
user-friendly.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"The best possible argument for including [a shot of Bruce] Willis'
genitals would have been that the movie, after all, contains everything
else." -Roger Ebert on "Color of Night"

Title
Review for Double Team (1997)
TriStar / 1:30 / 1997 / R (language, violence, Dennis Rodman)
Cast: Jean-Claude Van Damme; Mickey Rourke; Dennis Rodman; Natacha 
Lindinger; Paul Freeman 
Director: Tsui Hark 
Screenplay: Dan Jakoby; Paul Mones 
Ripe with explosions, mass death and really weird hairdos, Tsui Hark's 
"Double Team" must be the result of a tipsy Hollywood power lunch that 
decided Jean-Claude Van Damme needs another notch on his bad 
movie-bedpost and NBA superstar Dennis Rodman should have an acting 
career. 
Actually, in "Double Team," neither's performance is all that bad. I've 
always been the one critic to defend Van Damme -- he possesses a high 
charisma level that some genre stars (namely Steven Seagal) never aim 
for; it's just that he's never made a movie so exuberantly witty since 
1994's "TimeCop." And Rodman ... well, he's pretty much Rodman. He's 
extremely colorful, and therefore he pretty much fits his role to a T, 
even if the role is that of an ex-CIA weapons expert. 
It's the story that needs some major work. Van Damme plays 
counter-terrorist operative Jack Quinn, who teams up with arms dealer Yaz 
(Rodman) to rub out deadly gangster Stavros (Mickey Rourke, all beefy and 
weird-looking) in an Antwerp amusement park. The job is botched when 
Stavros' son gets killed in the gunfire, and Quinn is taken off to an 
island known as "The Colony" -- a think tank for soldiers "too valuable 
to kill" but "too dangerous to set free." 
Quinn escapes and tries to make it back home to his pregnant wife 
(Natacha Lindinger), but Stavros is out for revenge and kidnaps her. So, 
what's a kickboxing mercenary to do? Quinn looks up Yaz and the two 
travel to Rome so they can rescue the woman, kill Stavros, save the world 
and do whatever else the screenplay requires them to do. 
With crazy, often eye-popping camera work by Peter Pau and Rodman's Lite 
Brite locks, "Double Team" should be a mildly enjoyable guilty pleasure. 
But too much tries to happen in each frame, and the result is a movie 
that leaves you exhausted rather than exhilarated. The numerous action 
scenes are loud and headache-inducing and the frenetic pacing never slows 
down enough for us to care about what's going on in the movie. 
And much of what's going on is just wacky. There's a whole segment 
devoted to net-surfing monks that I have yet to figure out. And the 
climax finds Quinn going head-to-head with a tiger in the Roman Coliseum 
while Yaz circles them on a motorcycle, trying to avoid running over land 
mines and hold on to Quinn's baby boy (who's in a bomb equipped basket) 
-- all this while Stavros watches shirtless from the bleachers. Did I 
mention "Double Team" is strange? 
When it all comes down, this is just another rarely entertaining formula 
killathon, albeit one that feels no need to indulge in gratuitous 
profanity. Rodman juices things up with his blatantly vibrant screen 
persona, though, leading up to a stunt where he kicks an opponent between 
the legs. But we didn't need "Double Team" to tell us he could do that, 
did we? 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
PAYBACK
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
In fact, it'd probably be a safe bet to accuse "Payback" of employing 
nary a nice guy in its complex story. Gibson's Porter character is the 
closest thing to a protagonist it has, and audiences will get the gist 
of his nastiness from the opening on: Not only does he narrate the film 
in the gravelly, low-octave hush commonly associated with the rogues 
gallery, we also get our first glimpse of him as he swipes a cash stash 
from a crippled vet. OK, so this panhandler turns out to be phony - even 
the bit parts aren't sympathetic here - but the point is that this 
Porter guy is someone with a vicious streak you definitely don't want to 
provoke. 
Too late. Gibson starts off "Payback" already in a snit, and an 
understandable one at that. It seems he recently fell the victim of a 
scam at the hands of his duplicitous partner Val (Gregg Henry); Val 
helped Porter pull off a $140,000 heist from the Chinese mob and then 
stabbed - well, shot, if you really wanna know - his buddy in the back, 
leaving him for dead. But heavies rarely go down without a fight, and 
when Porter makes an unexpected recovery some months down the road, he 
hits the mean streets to track down Val and collect his $70,000 cut by 
any means necessary. This is where all the afore-mentioned 
unpleasantness kicks in. 
"Payback" is so deliriously violent that audiences expecting a cuddly 
crime yarn a la the last few "Lethal Weapons" are going to be shocked 
into submission. And speaking of submission, one of the recurring 
vicious plot threads likely to distress unsuspecting viewers involves 
the kinky machinations of an Asian dominatrix named Pearl ("Ally 
McBeal"'s Lucy Liu), a gal who mingles pleasure and pain with malicious 
glee. Like it or not, the supporting cast includes many colorful roles 
like the above, and their featured sidetracks are far more fun to behold 
than Porter's pulpy lust for revenge. As assorted lowlifes, David 
Paymer, James Coburn, William Devane and Kris Kristofferson steal more 
than their share of scenes. 
Much has been made of the fact that "Payback" had quite a troubled 
production schedule - apparently director Brian Helgeland's cut of the 
film did not appease Gibson, or something of the like, and a decent 
amount of new footage was reshot in order to lighten the tone a bit. It 
sort of shows: The first half of the movie is exceedingly dark and 
brooding in ways that are almost distancing, while act two exceedingly 
lets humor (mostly of the black comedy variety) and its star's 
never-fail charm seep into the mix. The hard-to-classify final result - 
you try putting it in the appropriate genre - is dangerously uneven but 
still a decent game of double-crossing and one-upmanship.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
20th Century Fox / 1:46 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, brief drug use, sexual
discussion)
Cast: Drew Barrymore; David Arquette; Michael Vartan; Molly Shannon;
John C. Reilly; Leelee Sobieski; Garry Marshall
Director: Raja Gosnell
Screenplay: Abby Kohn; Marc Silverstein
What kind of movie combines a preposterous premise with improbable
casting, confusing character treatment and an overdose of gloppy
sentimentality? In the case of "Never Been Kissed," a thoroughly
charming one. It's rare when a film coasts on pure star power alone, but
this lightweight if extremely pleasant romantic fantasy is downright
unthinkable without the talents of totally game lead Drew Barrymore. Her
perfectly sunny performance elevates what could have been grade-C
schmaltz into quite the springtime charmer. Only gruff cranks will leave
the theatre unsatisfied - at least with Barrymore.
She plays Josie Gellar, an ambitious, mid-20s copy editor at "The
Chicago Sun-Times" who suffers from the titular lack of passion in her
too-rigid life, let alone a nerdy facade, stuffy wardrobe and
unflattering hair-don't that keeps Barrymore's spunky sexuality
successfully under wraps. Fate tosses her a second chance when her
grumpy superior (Garry Marshall) orders her to enroll undercover at the
local high school to get the scoop - any scoop. Exactly how this is done
is never revealed, and it would be a major enjoyment roadblock had
"Never Been Kissed" already made us so eager to watch Barrymore's ugly
duckling become a swan.
Flashbacks confirm Josie's past nightmarish educational experience -
where she was dubbed "Josie Grossie" by cruel classmates and made the
victim of a vicious prank - and here she is out of her element again,
trying her darndest to make friends with the in-crowd. They, of course,
reject Josie at first, only to later embrace her following some story
twists best described as unlikely. But so what if practically nothing in
this movie rings true? Barrymore, in a role that definitely goes against
type (come on, who _wouldn't_ want to be her buddy - or more?), performs
with such conviction that even the biggest leaps in logic are pretty
irrelevant.
Also ultimately mattering little by the time "Never Been Kissed" arrives
at its grandly melodramatic - yet wholly satisfying - ending are the
occasionally iffy relationships Barrymore has with some of her co-stars.
As a new student, Josie becomes friends with a math clubber (Helen Hunt
lookalike Leelee Sobieski) also spurned by the hip kids, but she
disappears for a long while following an odd bonding sequence that moves
all too quickly from tears to giggles. And when Josie finally clicks
with an ambiguously-written trio of Miss Popularities and one Mr. Cool,
"Kissed" can't decide if it wants to hiss or laugh at them.
Better luck is had with supporting actors David Arquette, as Josie's
underachieving brother, and "Saturday Night Live" ace-pratfaller Molly
Shannon, as an oversexed "Times" co-worker. They exist to prod the story
along (sometimes plausibly, sometimes not), which includes Josie's
potential - and potentially reciprocated - attraction to a handsome,
young English teacher (Michael Vartan). Since she's working under the
guise of a 17-year-old, this subplot sounds full of the Mary Kay
LeTorneau heebie-jeebies, but pulling it off is Barrymore and Vartan's
welcome subtlety in some surprisingly tender scenes that addresses its
implications.
The big prom finale has been seen before in every recent bit of
teen-oriented fare (from "She's All That" to "10 Things I Hate About
You" - take your pick), and "Never Been Kissed" assuredly follows suit.
This time, though, the formula doesn't feel old because of an
interesting literary couples theme - bonus points for Josie's smashing
Renaissance costume and the visual references to Raoul Duke and Dr.
Gonzo references - and a treacly moment-of-truth that actually works.
The related monologue is delivered by Barrymore's Josie, of course, and
her emotional strength make this preachiness, this person and this movie
utterly embraceable.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Upon hearing word of this outrage, Star Wars' creator George Lucas (in
the throes of developing scripts for the two remaining "Star Wars"
films) quickly removed all references to an upcoming character allegedly
named Stingy MacHaggis, a kilt-wearing alien who was to spend a good
portion of Episode II' drinking, picking fights and playing an alien
musical instrument that strongly resembled a set of bagpipes.  He is to
be replaced by another alien character - a formless, colorless and mute
creature who in no way resembles any culture or individual that ever
existed or ever will exist. -AAlgar on "The Phantom Menace"'s
race-stereotyping controversy

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
ROUNDERS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Matt Damon, fresh off his "Good Will Hunting" hot streak, is perfect for 
the role of Mike McDermott, a young law student with a tremendous gift 
for gambling. But after losing all of his tuition money in a killer 
high-stakes match with Russian poker aficionado Teddy KGB (John 
Malkovich, deliciously hammy), he shifts his focus to scholarly matters, 
leaving his true area of expertise far, far behind. Things change, 
however, when Mike's old buddy Worm (Edward Norton) re-enters his life - 
it seems Worm, just out of jail, owes a hefty sum to nasty thugs, and is 
counting on his friend's superlative skills to help him pay off the 
debt. 
That "Rounders"' story quickly molds itself into a conventional, 
predictable tale of redemption doesn't hinder its potency. Director John 
Dahl, infamous for his neo-noirs "Red Rock West" and "The Last 
Seduction," gets extremely convincing mileage out of the been-there, 
done-that plot mechanics by trumping up the relationship between Mike 
and Worm. Damon and Norton bring so much to their roles that they'd be 
worth catching even if "Rounders" ultimately folded, but the movie ups 
its fascinating ante by contrasting their wildly different ways of 
winning. Any sequence where the two men sit at the table together is an 
unarguable highlight. 
If only the other character interaction was as successful, "Rounders" 
might merit consideration when it comes time to number the year's best 
films. Current "It Girl" Gretchen Mol is sweetly appealing as Mike's 
girlfriend Jo, aware and weary of his seedy past, but her scenes with 
Damon number too few to be very effective. John Turturro's aging mentor 
and Famke Janssen's tempting siren, both interesting sketches, are 
hampered by the same limited screen time. And as a wizened judge, the 
great Martin Landau makes memorable a role that's mostly a plot device - 
he's on hand mostly to sort-of save the day and provide a voice for 
"Rounders"' moral. 
That moral, by the way, is "Our destiny chooses us," and it's something 
of a surprise when "Rounders" supports this solemn proverb by eschewing 
the conclusion you might expect; Mike does learn from his mistake, but 
neither the mistake nor the way he learns from it is what it initially 
appears to be. In the end, "Rounders" sees gambling as less a mere 
addiction than a potential art form, but the poker itself is only a 
metaphor for a much larger picture. The road to true fulfillment lies 
within the realization and exercising of your natural passions, the 
movie espouses, no matter what they might be. Here, low-rent lowlifes 
like Worm just aren't cut out for the cards. 
Screenwriters David Levien and Brian Koppelman entertain and educate in 
their quest to vividly render a culture that's often generalized by 
movies; even complete poker neophytes should cross the line from 
observers to participants when the movie gets to its concluding game 
scene. Inside every adventurous filmgoer, there is a desire to be taken 
someplace new and exciting, and that's the precise allure of "Rounders." 
It ultimately matters not that a few of our tour guides feel 
partially-realized or that the journey itself is cluttered with sites 
we've seen before, because the final destination is a satisfying one. In 
the end, "Rounders" holds a winning hand.

Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
CLAY PIGEONS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The story at least gets off to an interesting start, as dim gas station 
attendant Clay (Joaquin Phoenix) finds himself in hot water with his 
married sexpot lover (British actress Georgina Cates, doing great 
Midwestern trash) - her husband learned of their secret hanky-panky and 
killed himself, but not before making it look like murder and 
implicating Clay. "Pigeons" takes a turn for the worse, however, around 
the time the body count eerily starts to rise, a mystery that may or may 
not be related to a mysterious cowboy named Lester Long (Vince Vaughn) 
who drifts into the sleepy Montana burg and quickly befriends Clay. The 
FBI shows up hot on the trail of a serial killer, and it's then - quite 
late in the game - when the movie finally comes alive.
These flickers of greatness probably have something to do with Janeane 
Garofalo, whose turn as the cynical agent in charge of the 
investigation, at first doubting Clay and later helping him, is the best 
thing about "Pigeons." The precise moment she shows up, you can actually 
_hear_ the film improving; Garofalo may be her usual acidic, deadpan 
self, but her talents fit the role snugly and serve as a sardonic 
contrast when things get too silly. And things get too silly too often - 
as "Clay Pigeons" chugs towards its conclusion (which is completely 
ludicrous, by the way), a series of distracting plot holes and 
contrivances attempt to wrap things up, but all they really do is turn 
what once was a wildly unpredictable movie into a wildly convoluted 
mess. 
Vaughn and Phoenix don't fare as well as their female co-star, though 
it's not their fault. Vaughn gives a vibrant performance, but no amount 
of animation could ever hide that Lester Long is a two-dimensional 
cartoon. Talk about not knowing what you have - this guy can create 
fireworks with a role that's up to his juicy comedic rhythms (see 
"Swingers"). Phoenix plays the straight man to Vaughn's court jester; 
he's supposed to be our tour guide through this topsy-turvy world, the 
guy we root for and sympathize with in spite of his flaws. If only David 
Healy's script hadn't made his flaws so glaring, that might've been 
possible. "Clay" the movie and Clay the man, then, are too much alike - 
dumb nogoodniks that just barely scrape by thanks to the aid of one 
sarcastic little lady.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
Dimension / 1:40 / 1997 / R 
Cast: Mira Sorvino; Jeremy Northam; Charles Dutton; Giancarlo Giannini;
F. Murray Abraham; Josh Brolin; Alexander Goodwin 
Director: Guillermo Del Toro 
Screenplay: Matthew Robbins; John Sayles; Steven Soderbergh 
        Okay, check this out -- you know those craggy, mysterious,
trenchcoat-clad figures that skulk around the alleys and transit systems
of New York City? As it turns out, they're really genetically-evolved
mutant bug-like monsters. Who'd have thought? 
        Well, there's actually an answer to that second question, and it's John
Sayles, Steven Soderbergh and Matthew Robbins, who use the strange
premise to a solid effect in the new horror flick "Mimic." Credit
Dimension Films (a subdivision of Miramax) with single-handedly reviving
the genre -- they're the movie company behind this, last winter's hit
"Scream" and the looks-like-a-winner "Nightwatch," to be released this
fall. "Mimic" has its flaws, but its a nonetheless a strong entry in an
until-recently dead film category, boasting a sturdy dramatic turn by
Mira Sorvino and some of the frightening special effects of the year. 
        Sorvino plays expert entomologist Susan Tyler. When New York City is
seized by an unusual plague that effects only children, Tyler targets
the source -- cockroaches. She engineers the creation of the Judas
Breed, a ferocious DNA-spliced insect to be released in the city's
sewers; their purpose is to secrete a substance that will attract and
destroy the disease carriers and then keel over themselves when their
six-month life expectancy has been exhausted. Everything is pulled off
... or so it seems, until three years later when bizarre murders begin
in the area. 
        It seems as though the Judas Breed didn't die out as thought. One
scientist says, "Evolution has a way of keeping things alive," and in
the Judas Breed's case, it has also caused maturity in physical stature,
as they can "mimic" their prey in order to infiltrate them. And since we
are
the game and they are the hunters, they are able to take on human
appearance -- albeit a tall, pale, bald human who wears a long, black
trenchcoat. Together with disease researcher husband Peter (Jeremy
Northam of "Emma" and "The Net") and a quirky secondary cast that
includes a tough cop (Charles Dutton) and a sarcastic investigator (Josh
Brolin), Tyler takes to the sewers to uncover the nest and find a way to
exterminate the Judas Breed once and for all. 
        I could carp about certain problematic areas of "Mimic" (and I will
momentarily), but the movie provides such a high level of
gnaw-off-your-fingers fun that it's somewhat useless to even bother. The
story background is both interesting and creative, but "Mimic" doesn't
spend more time than it should on it. In fact, "Mimic" moves incredibly
fast, with dazzling opening credits a la "Seven," a first half that's
engrossing, exciting setup and a second part that satisfies with much
creepy-crawly impact. Director Guillermo Del Toro toys well with
audience expectation,
and waits until exactly the right moment to unleash the first full-view
of the monster. From then on, the shocks are plenty, the scares are
amusing and the terror is palpable. 
        Sorvino has fashioned a career -- and a great one -- by dazzlingly 
portraying vacuous airheads in "Mighty Aphrodite" and "Romy and
Michele's High School Reunion." The surprise here is that Sorvino is as
good playing the brain as she is the bimbo. The dashing Northam offers
solid support, as does Dutton in the small but heroic role he normally
plays. Giancarlo Giannini, as a local shoeshiner whose seemingly
autistic grandson has disappeared after encountering the Judas Breed, is
properly eccentric even if the subplot devoted to him is Mimic's most
uninteresting one. Brolin ("Flirting With Disaster"), a little-known but
appealing actor, is not given much to do but compensates with an
engaging performance. 
        Del Toro, the man behind the Mexican vampire film "Cronos," doesn't
skimp when it comes to shocking in the first hour (basically, he's not
afraid to kill off children), but my main gripe about "Mimic" is that
its concluding 50 minutes isn't so daring, relying more on slick
convention than daring innovation to tell its story. At no time was I
not entertained, but "Mimic" ends up being a patchwork rip-off of the
"Alien" trilogy, "Jurassic Park" and other sci-fi landmarks. Still,
that's not something that you don't exactly think about going in, and
besides, if "Mimic" mimics other movies, it smartly mimics the best. 

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
Gramercy / 1:50 / 1998 / R (violence, language, glimpses of nudity, drug use)
Cast: Jeff Bridges; John Goodman; Julianne Moore; Steve Buscemi; David 
Huddleston; Peter Stormare; Tara Reid; Philip Seymour Hoffman; Flea; John 
Turturro; Sam Elliott 
Director: Joel Coen 
Screenplay: Ethan Coen; Joel Coen 
You know you're in for a truly different cinematic experience the moment you 
realize Steve Buscemi has been cast as the movie in question's most normal 
character. Such is the case with "The Big Lebowski," Joel and Ethan Coen's 
first venture since their "Fargo" nabbed nationwide acclaim and a mantlepiece 
of Academy Award nods. There's no need to fear that the Coens suffered 
creative burnout with that accomplishment, because "Lebowski" is an effort 
that makes words like "strange" and "unusual" seem like an understatement. 
Thanks in part to delicious characterization and an all-encompassing sense of 
humor, the film is a smashing success. 
The central oddball here is the Dude (Jeff Bridges), an unemployed cad whose 
ambitions appear to be zilch beyond smoking pot, drinking beer and going 
bowling (are you college students already rooting for him, or what?). One 
night, a pair of thugs break into his house and pee on his carpet, a 
threatening act that's supposed to be carried out against a famous Pasadena 
millionaire (David Huddleston) who shares his birth name -- Jeff Lebowski -- 
with the Dude. Once the Dude realizes this coincidence, he visits the Big 
Lebowski in hopes to claim reparations for his soiled rug, and is back to his 
normal life with alley pals Walter (John Goodman), a hotheaded Vietnam vet, 
and Donny (Buscemi), a mild-mannered surfer, before too long. 
Soon, though, Lebowski's trampy trophy wife Bunny (Tara Reid) is kidnaped and 
held for a hefty ransom, and he turns to the Dude for help. It seems Bunny's 
troubles are related to a line of work she's kept secret from her husband -- 
she's actually an adult film star and is very in debt with a shady producer 
named Jackie Treehorn. The Dude, now on Lebowski's payroll, accepts the offer 
and agrees to handle the money drop; Walter tags along and insists that the 
Dude keep the cash for himself. Chaos obviously ensues, and the Dude 
eventually finds himself in hot water with cops, crooks and Lebowski's 
ultra-eccentric artist daughter Maude (Julianne Moore). 
"The Big Lebowski" deserves to win the Coens the same amount of acclaim that 
"Fargo" did; while that 1996 black comedy was certainly a better film, 
"Lebowski" is at least as breathtakingly imaginative. The movie boasts a 
mile-high absurdity level that sometimes threatens to topple over, but 
thankfully never does. The Coens (Joel directed, Ethan produced and both 
wrote) keep you in stitches as they unravel their exceedingly loopy tale, and 
must be commended for juggling a number of people and subplots one would 
expect to find in a Robert Altman flick. Whether we're watching Bridges fend 
off a marmet in his bathtub or Moore don Viking duds and dance in a Busby 
Berkeley-esque dream sequence, "The Big Lebowski" is immensely lively. There 
are those who will dislike this film, but not because it's boring. 
The cast has a great deal of fun with the bounteous material they're given. 
Bridges exudes a likeable, surprisingly sweet presence; his Dude sure isn't 
the cleanest guy around, but you'd still follow him to another movie. Goodman 
merits 1998's first Oscar consideration, as Walter's manic temper is one of 
"The Big Lebowski"'s many highlights; the same goes for Moore, whose throaty, 
delectable performance as Maude is a hilarious hoot. John Turturro may very 
well steal the movie with his two scenes as a colorful bowler from a rival 
faction. Sam Elliott's rambling narration gets the film off to a solid start. 
And some will recognize Peter Stormare -- "Fargo"'s silent heavy -- as Carl 
Hungus, a porn star who's really a samurai sword-wielding German nihilist and 
has-been pop star. 
Only in its final third does the movie falter, with a couple of loose plot 
threads and some cast members who quickly disappear and never emerge for a 
curtain call. These flaws are forgivable, though -- the Coens have crafted a 
tale so rich with personality that it's hard to look at the final product 
with anything but a big grin on your face. Without a doubt, "The Big 
Lebowski" is the best film so far this year. Sure, we're only three months in 
and the competition ("Deep Rising," "Desperate Measures," "The Wedding 
Singer," etc.) has been pretty bland, but it's still the gospel truth. Maybe 
during next awards season, "Lebowski" won't be a far cry from "Fargo." 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
OCTOBER SKY
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Talk about a movie having its cake and eating it, too. Said hype had 
"October Sky" pegged as "inspirational" and "uplifting," and it turns 
out that neither adjective is a misnomer. This is probably because the 
tale's factual roots - taken straight from Homer Hickam's autobiography 
"Rocket Boys" - have been unexpectedly maintained in a genre fond of 
pounding narratives into predictable, cliche-littered schmaltz. That's 
not to say every story development is unexpected and every character is 
a complete original, but the magic in "October Sky" stems from how these 
seemingly straight-from-stock situations and supporting roles are 
treated: humanely. 
The year is 1957 and high school-aged Homer (played by Jake Gyllenhaal) 
is pretty much stuck on an adamantly preordained path in the footsteps 
of his mine superintendent dad ("Lone Star"'s Chris Cooper), a 
stone-faced type with a soot-stained legacy he feels Homer must 
continue. But when Homer spies the Soviet satellite Sputnik passing 
overhead on its historical orbit, a passion for science is awakened - a 
passion that puts him at odds with his direly disappointed pop. 
Nevertheless, Homer recruits two pals (William Lee Scott and Chad 
Lindberg) and the class nerd (Chris Owen) to help him in his own 
rocket-building missions. 
This father figure is where "October Sky" begins to depart from the 
expected route of coming-of-age stereotypes. In such films, the 
authoritative parent usually exists only to provide resistance to the 
protagonist's aspirations, but Cooper and screenwriter Lewis Colick 
essay a distinct individual whose reluctance to accept his son's chosen 
path is entirely believable. Gyllenhaal is just as vital to "Sky"'s 
success, so full of unactorly charm and candor that he makes Homer's 
wonder and eventual heartbreak immediately palpable. And as Homer's 
sweet mama, newcomer Natalie Canerday is so natural in her scenes that 
it's hard to believe she's not the real thing. 
Speaking of authenticity, "October Sky"'s final reel gets a little 
crowded with several extraneous subplots - like the illness of Homer's 
encouraging teacher (effective Laura Dern) - but atoning for the 
quick-to-shift focus is that each actually had a hand in shaping an 
array of lives. Even furthering the impact is a concluding montage of 
grainy home movies from the '50s, providing glimpses of the cast's 
in-the-flesh counterparts and updates on where they are now. Some are 
sad and some are surprising, but none is more fitting than the road 
traveled by Homer Hickam. No fair spoiling it if you already don't know, 
but here's a hint: The sky's the limit. 

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
Columbia / 1:40 / 1997 / R (language, violence, gore, terror)
Cast: Jennifer Love Hewitt; Sarah Michelle Gellar; Freddie Prinze, Jr.; Ryan Phillippe; 
Anne Heche; Muse Watson; Bridgette Wilson; Johnny Galecki 
Director: Jim Gillespie 
Screenplay: Kevin Williamson 
"I Know What You Did Last Summer" is just the kind of horror movie
that last December's hit slasher satire "Scream" poked fun at. It's an
ironic connection, seeing as how screenwriter-of-the-moment Kevin
Williamson penned both of them, adapting the former from Lois Duncan's
popular young adult novel and creating the latter from scratch. But
while "Summer" boasts a much more solemn tone than "Scream" (and bears
more flaws), it certainly proves Williamson's staying power -- simply
put that whether the guy's milking or laughing at the genre, he's
quite solid at doing it.
The movie tells the story of four friends -- there's prim, sensible
Julie ("Party of Five"'s Jennifer Love Hewitt), beauty queen Helen
(Sarah Michelle Gellar of TV's "Buffy the Vampire Slayer"), boozy jock
Barry ("White Squall"'s Ryan Phillippe) and low-key outcast Ray
(Freddie Prinze, Jr. of "The House of Yes"). The summer before the
quartet of friends venture off to college to pursue their respective
dreams, they're out celebrating the July 4th holiday on the
beach. Barry becomes too intoxicated to drive his new BMW back to
their Southport, North Carolina fishing village hometown, so Ray takes
over for him. But along the way, Barry's drunken rantings distract the
rest of the party, and they accidentally hit a passer-by while quickly
cruising up a windy mountain road. Their semi-reluctant decision to
dump the body off a nearby pier leads to an impulsive crime of passion
of which the less divulged, the more terrifying the sequence is.
Fast forward a year later and the gang are all husks of their former
promising selves, driven to personal failure by remorse. As if 12
months of guilt weren't enough, it also appears that someone knows
their secret after Julie receives an ominous note bearing the titular
sentence and the group begins being stalked by a psycho clad in
Gorton's Fisherman getup -- a rain slicker and hat that mask his
identity. Is it the creepy class nerd (Johnny Galecki) who possibly
witnessed the initial mishap? The victim's backwoods sister (very good
Anne Heche)? One of the four overcome with grief? Or someone different
altogether?
"I Know What You Did Last Summer" generates a strong undercurrent of
tension from this setup, but its problem area is its anti-climactic
boat chase finale. After doing so well on so many levels, it turns
into a "Scooby-Doo" episode without the hippie and the talking dog --
once unmasked, you half expect the killer to cry, "And I would have
gotten away with it too if it weren't for you meddling kids!" The
actual identity of the villain and how it is revealed is another flaw
-- a character who's remained an enigma for 85 minutes starts rattling
off one-liners ("Welcome aboard!") like he's Bruce Willis or
something. And the movie's concluding scene is illogical; it seems
tacked-on to generate one last scare, but only in that sense does it
succeed.
It's a sad send-off, because there's much to appreciate about the
build-up. Williamson's strong point is in creating interesting
protagonists, even if these kids aren't as educated in slasher cinema
as the "Scream" gang. The four leads have charisma to spare,
especially Prinze as the loner whose actions cast most of the
suspicion his way. Hewitt, who is probably supposed to be the main
character (she gets the most screen time), has an appealing, low-key
presence, even though I found myself wishing she'd do something with
her hair. All of them holler with gusto, and maybe that's what matters
most. Williamson is also inventive with death scenes; when the
Fisherman meat hooks one person in the jugular and yanks them across a
stove that's boiling crabs, you'll never look at seafood in quite the
same way again.
The movie looks beautifully downbeat, shot in somber hues of blue and
gray that fast establish a notably grim tone. I don't know if horror
flicks are Oscar fodder, but it'd be nice if director of photography
Denis Crossan got a nod. Then again, all of the technical credits are
first-rate -- production-wise, this movie excels. "I Know What You Did
Last Summer"'s undoings restrain it from attaining the level of
"Scream," but, that icky conclusion aside, it's still pretty much a
scream.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)

AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
This inspired silliness carries into and throughout the entire film, which
finds '60s nemeses Austin Powers (Myers), the swinging sleuth with a
ghastly Shirley Partridge-'do and ghastlier Nehru jackets, and Dr. Evil
(Myers again), the wicked mastermind with a kooky affinity for his
hairless kitty and kookier plans for world domination, again clashing in
the '90s. Evil's nonsensical schemes involve using time-travel to steal
Powers' mojo (or, for those not in the know, his libido), though in the
funnier self-referential bits, Myers and Co. draw attention to plot holes
and suggest that overlooking them is in full enjoyment's best interest.
But do people really care if the story adds up? Far more pressing matters
involve whether or not Myers, both as scribe and performer, is at his
cheekiest. The answer -- a strong "don't worry" -- comes long before he
debuts yet a third role, that of a slobbering, Scottish Dr. Evil henchman
called Fat Bastard. Giving life to this loathsome brute enables Myers to
not only hide under what looks like a ton of latex, it permits the kind of
kilts-and-haggis humor he mined so effectively in "So I Married an Axe
Murderer." He'd be guilty of spotlight-hogging were he not so dead-on in
all three parts, each of which could probably occupy their own farce
alone.
Like Myers' hats, the film fuses cast members old and new. Showing up from
the former "Austin" are familiar favorites such as Number Two (Robert
Wagner), Frau Farbissina (Mindy Sterling) and Scott Evil (Seth Green).
Misunderstood Scott, the bad Dr.'s son, partakes in clashes with dad that
are utterly priceless, leading the elder Evil to instead play
father-figure to his 28-inch-tall clone (Verne Troyer), a malevolent
munchkin he affectionately dubs Mini-Me. This "Island of Dr.
Moreau"-inspired character gets used and abused frequently, reaffirming
how "Spy" shuns political-correctness in its search for a quick giggle
fix. But the jokes are never offensive, even if they spend a majority of
the time in and around the toilet.
As with all spoofs, misfires occur -- how not original to cut to an
erupting volcano following suggested sexual activity -- and every single
punchline doesn't quite hit a home run; "The Spy Who Shagged Me" has a
tendency to drag a few shenanigans out to the point of overkill, though
that's less of a stumbling block here than it was for its predecessor
(remember the interminable urination bit?). One area done better by the
previous installment, however, would be the female lead: Elizabeth Hurley
brought her an appealing mix of sensuality and sportsmanship. Hurley gets
explained away in a nifty prologue, thus opening the door for Heather
Graham, who looks fetching in mesh but seems out-of-sync with the groovy
goings-on.
No matter. With Myers, Mini-Me and more delightfully gag-worthy gags than
"There's Something About Mary" -- a naughty shadow show and a coffee
pitcher full of feces blow low and lower -- these flaws hardly register.
"Austin" 1 did about $50 million at the box-office and then found an
audience of avid devotees upon its video release. With those folks now
foaming at the mouth over the prospect of future films, "Austin" 2 is
practically guaranteed to destroy the notion of diminishing returns. In
fact, from the wit, love and craft on display here, another "Austin"
adventure promises to generate the same solid hype and eager anticipation.
"Goldswinger," anyone?

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
SIMPLY IRRESISTIBLE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Gellar's Amanda finds herself falling for harried Henri Bendel exec Tom 
(Sean Patrick Flannery of Powder) around the same time she discovers an 
uncanny ability to mystically manifest emotions in her cooking, a secret 
ingredient that arouses both his interest in her and the public's in her 
tiny TriBeCa eatery. All this love and sorcery have a lot to do with the 
telekinetic crab that also figures into the story, a tale that at times 
plays like an American spin on 1993's Mexican classic "Like Water for 
Chocolate." Several differences: One, "Like Water" didn't have a 
telekinetic crab, and two, "Like Water" was a good film. 
"Simply Irresistible," on the other hand, is about as challenging as an 
Easy-Bake Oven. Amateurishly staged scenes cancel each other out in 
their badness, from an embarrassing seduction in a literal vanilla fog 
to an impromptu dance sequence where Tom and Amanda do their best Fred 
and Ginger - though Fred and Ginger never took part in anything this 
garish. The intrusive musical score distracts from the flat dialogue at 
regular intervals, but it's not like you're were going to miss much. In 
fact, take away the few instances of salty language and this has 
made-for-Disney Channel written all over it. 
But a majority of "Simply Irresistible"'s resistibility factor has less 
to do with the afore-mentioned overkill than the bland leads - Tom and 
Amanda are so thin and ambiguously defined that there's just no fun 
rooting for their inevitable "happily ever after." Nor do the 
otherworldly powers that serve to bring them together make sense, so 
we're left with a ho-hum relationship based on enchanted eclairs; it's 
not going to last long, people. Perhaps sensing this, the filmmakers 
have piled on weird supporting characters for acting vets like Betty 
Buckley, Dylan Baker and Patricia Clarkson, but they don't go anywhere 
either. 
In fact, nothing in "Simply Irresistible" goes anywhere save for Gellar, 
and she doesn't go somewhere so much as you wish she'd go _somewhere_ - 
like to a better movie. Already proving major talent with relatively few 
big- and small-screen roles, she's the sole reason this overcooked 
souffle isn't completely fit for the garbage disposal, looking smashing 
in her Todd Oldham-designed duds and investing much more in her 
perfunctory part than she ever gets in return. It's certainly a dish 
best not served in it's current condition, but one can only guess that, 
without Gellar, "Simply Irresistible" would be strictly unwatchable.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
GODZILLA
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
"Godzilla"'s creative team is that of director/co-writer Roland Emmerich 
and producer/co-writer Dean Devlin, the duo who gave us "Independence 
Day" only two years ago. I was in the small clique of those who did not 
appreciate that film (I hated it, actually), having felt that its every 
aspect was blatantly forced -- a cardboard cast of stereotyped 
personalities use a jingoistic tone to cover up a story that refuses to 
admit how infuriatingly silly it is. "Godzilla," while oh so very far 
from being a good movie, is much more grounded than "ID4"; it only 
momentarily masquerades as something it isn't. Sure, both films offer 
ineffective, one-dimensional characterization (though, judging from 
"Godzilla"'s press notes, the filmmakers would argue otherwise), but 
mostly gone here is the clunky, laughable human drama and conflict that, 
for me, sank "ID4" to a surprising low.
A plot summary is largely superfluous, but I shall proceed for those few 
of you who want to know what kind of narrative thrust this baby has. 
Matthew Broderick plays Nick Tatopoulos, a biological scientist studying 
the nuclear radiation-induced mutations of creatures great and small, 
the latter being earthworms and the former a mysterious creature that's 
swimming from Polynesia to the United States, and leaving all kinds of 
havoc in its wake. This entity, of course, turns out to be the titular 
behemoth, and Nick is hot on its trail when it decides to crash -- 
literally and figuratively -- in the Big Apple. The military, having 
never before faced such a deadly adversary, isn't very helpful. 
Complicating matters further is the presence of Nick's ex-flame, plucky 
local TV journalist Audrey (Maria Pitillo), but the last thing a movie 
like this needs is a rekindled-romance subplot. 
To be fair, however, the Nick-Audrey relationship is no less silly than 
the Jeff Goldblum-Margaret Colin one in "Independence Day"; "Godzilla"'s 
"love story" is less a glaring flaw than a minor distraction. So, 
instead of copying its predecessor's flaws to a T, it invents some new 
ones. Devlin and Emmerich play down the malevolence and up the sympathy 
in "Godzilla," so much to the point where one really wonders if the king 
of all monsters can truly be called an antagonist. Gone is the sense of 
deliberate, careless destruction that characterize this movie's Japanese 
ancestors; by "humanizing" the beast, we're torn when it comes time to 
root for somebody -- or against something. Also sorely missed is the 
sense of fascination, wonder and pseudo-credibility that Steven 
Spielberg used to distinguish his "Jurassic Park," a film that 
"Godzilla" will be inevitably compared to, from just another ride. 
Yet some strong key assets keep "Godzilla" far from being a total 
downer. The special effects (the unarguable reason that this film was 
made) are fantastic, and the movie's look -- especially in the 
helicopter chase scenes -- often works on a Tim Burton-level of dazzle. 
Some of Emmerich's action sequences, like the climactic cab ride, offer 
sudden, genuine bursts of excitement. "Godzilla" even has a notable 
sense of humor (mostly courtesy of comic co-star Hank Azaria), save for 
one running joke that's funny at first but gets old fast. The gag in 
question pokes fun at film critic deities Gene Siskel and Roger Ebert, 
allegedly because Devlin and Emmerich are not too happy about the 
negative write-ups they gave "StarGate" and "ID4." The best way to get 
revenge against reviewers for disliking your previous movies isn't to 
gibe them in your current work, guys -- it's to make sure that current 
work is a great film.

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
PRACTICAL MAGIC
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
For a while, the movie is adept enough to juggle genres, but something 
wicked appears to have taken over scripting duties around its 
midsection. Not a whole lot of "Practical Magic"'s supernatural scenario 
is adequately explained, and it's a gargantuan goof-up when a film is 
given the opportunity to create its own rules and then refuses to play 
by them. Underwritten and overplotted, "Practical Magic" ultimately 
vexes more often than it hexes, culminating in supremely foolish 
business like straight-faced demonic possession and an exorcism that 
includes the neighborhood PTA. The varied light-and-dark agenda really 
clashes in moments like these. 
When all else fails, at least Bullock and Kidman make an enchanting pair 
of contemporary sorceresses. They're respectively cast as Sally and 
Gillian Owens, sisters in a bloodline of white magic-dabblers long 
plagued by a centuries-old curse - that any man who falls in love with a 
gal from their clan is guaranteed an untimely demise. Widowed Sally has 
learned this the hard way and moves in with her dotty aunts (Stockard 
Channing and Dianne Wiest); free-spirited Gillian spares herself the 
potential heartache by engaging only in quickie relationships all over 
the map. 
Gillian's latest squeeze is a studly cowboy (Goran Visnjic) who hails 
from Transylvania and drinks like a fish. A volatile encounter that 
involves him, them and some belladonna sets off an ugly chain of 
incidents that eventually gains the attention of an affable cop (Aidan 
Quinn); he may or may not be Sally's soul mate, but they fall for each 
other either way. It's here where "Practical" begins to lose the magic - 
not only does this budding romance lack both chemistry and credibility, 
it seems like a complete afterthought. And the Quinn character has other 
problems to boot: Could his ensuing detective work possibly be any 
shoddier? 
So "Practical Magic"'s strange brew never quite comes to a boil, despite 
consistently spellbinding performances and the promise of its first 
half. If the filmmakers had cleaned up the scatterbrained story threads 
and provided stronger explanations for some of their weirder tangents, 
this movie could have been an enjoyable little date flick. But the 
spells cast by the nifty premise and the adorable cast end up enchanting 
all by themselves, leaving "Practical Magic" to finish in a hazy place 
somewhere between the bewildered and the bewitched.

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
Walt Disney / 1:20 / 1999 / PG (innuendo, comic violence)
Cast: Matthew Broderick; Rupert Everett; Joely Fisher; Michelle
Trachtenberg; Dabney Coleman; Andy Dick; Michael G. Hagerty; Cheri Oteri
Disney's track record with turning past film and television concepts
into big-screen fare for the multiplex-happy family crowd hasn't been
too successful - "Mr. Magoo," anyone? - so it comes as a slight surprise
that their "Inspector Gadget" makes for a mildly amusing 80-minute
diversion. Whether or not this astonishingly hasty running time was
intentional or a result of post-test screening tampering, it certainly
serves the material: Goofy "Gadget," an overblown adaptation of the
mid-'80s cartoon, finishes before it has a chance to truly grate. This
alone is more than can be said for "George of the Jungle."
Anybody who's seen and loved the original incarnation will carp (and
probably has) that Matthew Broderick seems all wrong for the title role,
a contraption-laden crime-fighter, but the story adjusts to fit the
actor's coolly meek demeanor. In the show, Inspector Gadget was aloof -
if extremely equipped, with utensils, gizmos and doohickeys hidden in
every imaginable appendage - and constantly retrieved from the brink of
disaster by his super-smart niece Penny and dog Brain. Here, the kid
("Harriet the Spy"'s plucky Michelle Trachtenberg) and the canine get
relegated mostly to the background while a less-hapless but just as
well-armed hero takes center stage.
Not much in "Gadget" stays the same, actually. Mega-villain Claw never
allowed his face to be seen on TV, but is played in the movie by Rupert
Everett in a rare display of over-the-top fussing and mugging. He wants
to defeat his adversary with a synthetic creation called RoboGadget
(also Broderick), an Inspector doppleganger with Chiclet teeth and a
flair for destruction. Good idea: Giving the typically straight-laced
Broderick a change-of-pace chance to run wild in this part. Bad idea:
Allowing Broderick's genuine article to seem dull by comparison. Guess
it's true that bad guys have more fun.
A set-up explaining the intrepid Inspector's origins - humble security
guard suffers horrible accident - is executed quickly, all the better to
usher in Stan Winston's nifty special effects and some humdinger action
sequences. But what's up with the studio's inclusion of wisecracking
inanimate objects that children may take to but adults will find
irritating. In February's "My Favorite Martian," a suit named Zoot
failed to steal the show. "Inspector" has the Gadget Mobile, a
jive-talkin' roadster (comic D.L. Hughley does the voice) that comes
complete with its own assortment of uneven self-referential jokes and a
snack bar. Cue intrusive product-placements galore.
Easier to not mind than out-and-out like, "Inspector Gadget" finishes a
spotty endeavor. At least the picture benefits from wall-to-wall
wackiness - the vivid camera work makes bombastic Jerry Bruckheimer
films look subtle by comparison - and a pair of female performances that
further push its lively quotient: "Ellen"'s Joely Fisher as a
scatterbrained (but brainy) scientist and "Saturday Night Live"
scene-stealer Cheri Oteri as a noisy city official. David Kellogg
directs the sound and fury with confident flair. His sole other credit:
1991's Vanilla Ice vehicle "Cool as Ice." "Gadget"'s far better, but
really anything would be.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"It presents as comedy things that are not amusing. If you think this
movie is funny, that tells me things about you I don't want to know."
-Roger Ebert on "Very Bad Things"

Title
Review for Wrongfully Accused (1998)
WRONGFULLY ACCUSED
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
"Wrongfully Accused" meshes together the premises of "The Fugitive" and 
"Patriot Games," casting its always game star as Ryan Harrison (get 
it?), a master violinist who is drawn into an affair with a married 
temptress (Kelly Le Brock). She, however, sets Harrison up to take the 
rap for the murder of her husband (Michael York) - a crime actually 
committed by a one-armed, one-legged, one-eyed man (Aaron Pearl). 
Harrison is arrested, found guilty and sentenced to death, but escapes 
from a prison bus, of course, and then is pursued by a determined U.S. 
marshal named Fergus Falls (Richard Crenna, unnecessarily riffing off of 
Tommy Lee Jones' already smirky Oscar-winning role). There's also a 
mystery brunette (Melinda McGraw) and an assassination subplot involving 
the U.N. Secretary General, but like any of it matters. 
"Wrongfully Accused" gets off to an assured start, with an in-concert 
Nielsen, touted "Lord of the Violin" by bare-chested posters, pulling a 
Jimi Hendrix on his musical instrument as hundreds of tuxedo-clad mosh 
in front of the stage. Nice touch. Most of the scenes that follow, 
however, never top the opener. (Hysterical exceptions: the Mentos and 
"Baywatch" goofs.) Movie parodies are crammed in at an almost-subliminal 
rate, but most are empty. When a giant snake lunges onto the screen and 
snatches a cast member a la "Anaconda" or baseball players disappear 
into a "Field of Dreams"-esque cornfield, there's really nothing to 
laugh at. Other moments, like an interlude in a fishing shop, are so 
unfocused that you're not sure what you're supposed to be laughing at. 
There seem to be more cheap references than frenzied send-ups here, so 
it's possible that director/writer Pat Proft, by bombarding the viewer 
with a careless mixture of the two, guarantees something is sure to 
stick. And what does stick sticks well, particularly the jabs at genre 
conventions like stylized flashbacks and hard-boiled dialogue, what 
those "Naked Gun"s (which Proft collaborated on) did great; these bits 
are so on-target that they allow you to remember "Wrongfully Accused" as 
an almost-halfway-there spoof instead of a lame-brained failure. The 
movie might have been cursed to begin with, opening fast on the heels of 
"Mafia!", from Proft colleague Jim Abrahams, and "BASEketball," from 
Proft colleague David Zucker, but it's a strong possibility that nobody 
is going to be accusing "Wrongfully Accused" of being Nielsen's 
funniest.

Title
Review for Flubber (1997)
Walt Disney / 1:32 / 1997 / PG (mild innuendo, slapstick violence)
Cast: Robin Williams; Marcia Gay Harden; Christopher McDonald; Jodie 
Benson (voice); Raymond J. Barry; Clancy Brown; Ted Levine; Wil 
Wheaton; Edie McClurg 
Director: Les Mayfield 
Screenplay: John Hughes; Bill Walsh 
"Flubber" is the latest in a recent scattershot trend of Disney 
self-remakes, but despite Robin Williams in the lead role and all the 
gooey special effects money can buy, it's something a flub itself. 
Pretty much any family-oriented holiday release starring Williams is 
guaranteed to have lengthy staying power (think "Jumanji" and "Mrs. 
Doubtfire"), but this surprisingly low-energy update of Fred 
MacMurray's 1961 "The Absent-Minded Professor" never realizes its 
gooey potential. Flubber lacks the deliciously campy energy that Glenn 
Close brought last year's "101 Dalmatians," but perhaps we can all 
give thanks it's not as dreadful as spring's "That Darn Cat." 
Williams plays college professor Phillip Brainard, a foggy-minded 
genius who has twice forgotten wedding dates with his sweetheart Sara 
Jean (Marcia Gay Harden) because of his preoccupation with a possible 
scientific breakthrough. Another nuptial ceremony is going down the 
toilet as the movie opens, a disaster aided this time by Brainard's 
flying, talking, enamored laptop WEEBO. Reminiscent of those mini-UFOs 
from Steven Spielberg's "* batteries not included," WEEBO would like 
Phillip all to herself and resorts to devious trickery to keep his 
relationship with Sara Jean on the edge of disaster -- kind of a kinky 
love triangle. 
Phillip's eventual invention of flying rubber is immediately dubbed 
Flubber, a lime Jell-O ball of goo with a mind of its own and a 
penchant for all sorts of bouncy mischief -- mischief that gets it 
noticed by the hired thugs (Ted Levine and Clancy Brown) of the 
college's scheming bankroller Chester Hoenicker (Raymond J. Barry, 
doing his best Christopher Walken impersonation). Hoenicker is already 
after Phillip for flunking his son, and by stealing Flubber he can 
even capitalize off of his revenge. But Flubber isn't the most 
agreeable substance, as he will soon find out. 
A lot of "Flubber"'s troubles can be attributed to too little manic 
humor and too much physical shtick. Perhaps co-screenwriter/producer 
John Hughes deserves a large part of the finger-shaking, because 
"Flubber" contains large doses of the same lame conked-on-the-noggin 
slapstick that wasn't all that funny in "Home Alone," let alone its 
employment in most of his films since. Kids will be delighted by all 
of the comedic bodily harm to be sure, but they may roll their eyes 
when Phillip hops in his Flubber-powered '63 Thunderbird and soars 
serenely through the skies. It might have been charming in "The 
Absent-Minded Professor," but now it's rather dull seeing as how cars 
fly in every third Hollywood flick. 
Williams can be an effective semi-straight man when he's given someone 
to bounce jokes off him (see his turn as Nathan Lane's subdued better 
half in "The Birdcage"), but here he has nobody. It's rare that he's 
allowed to cut loose; funny scenes like a Flubber test session on a 
basketball court demonstrate how little life there is in the rest of 
the film. Harden is extremely pleasant, but the snoozy Sara Jean is no 
match for WEEBO; Christopher McDonald, as a potential beau for her, is 
reduced to shooting the green stuff out of his rear in a bout of 
freaky Flubber flatulence. It is nice, however, to see co-stars Edie 
McClurg and Wil Wheaton acting again after their expired stints on 
"The Hogan Family" and "Star Trek: The Next Generation," respectively. 
"Flubber" has its moments, but they are few and far between. With both 
Williams' antics and the number of magical moments severely lacking, 
the relatively brief running time of 92 minutes creaks by fairly slow. 
But at least the movie has an interesting, uh, character in WEEBO (the 
professor's sidekick was a dog in the original). Brought to life by 
the sweet voice of "The Little Mermaid"'s Jodie Benson, this robotic 
personal assistant acts effectively as both a day planner and a secret 
admirer, and is given a lot more personality than any of the human 
cast. I want a WEEBO of my own for Christmas. As far as everything 
else is concerned, somebody hand me the Goo-Be-Gone. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
JAWBREAKER
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
To further the comparison quotient, sections of the movie also veer 
dangerously close to "Clueless" and "Very Bad Things," which is ironic 
because it _is_ clueless and chock full of very bad things. Said 
deplorable act opens the film, as three members (Rose McGowan, Rebecca 
Gayheart and Julie Benz) of the afore-mentioned popular quartet surprise 
the fourth (Charlotte Roldan) on the morning of her birthday: they don 
disguises, jostle her from bed, stuff the titular candy in her mouth to 
keep her quiet, and toss her in the trunk of a car. Their intent is to 
take her out for a celebratory pancake breakfast, but the confection 
melts, and she's DOA at the IHOP. Like, whoops. 
McGowan's fearless, nasty group leader Courtney, described by somebody 
as "Satan in heels," decides to make the crime scene resemble an assault 
by a male rapist, but their cover is promptly blown by class nerd Fern 
(Judy Evans Greer). What's a psychopathic senior sexpot to do? Why, 
welcome her to the "family," of course. Courtney allows Fern to take the 
unintentional victim's place in their posse in exchange for her silence, 
and the dull meek-into-monstrous makeover subplot that follows isn't the 
slightest bit interesting. Nor is the time devoted to the defection of 
Gayheart's conflicted Julie. She turns out to have a conscience. Not 
good. 
Given "Jawbreaker"'s visual flair and deliciously mordant set-up, this 
material could have been steered into flashy, funny "I Know What You Did 
Last Marking Period" territory. But after a satisfyingly loopy first 
quarter, it's clear that this "Jawbreaker"'s center is purely sour. Once 
the body is discovered, Pam Grier shows up as a detective determined to 
crack the case, and the movie discards any humorous sensibilities it 
might have maintained up until that point for unbelievable plot holes 
and unacceptable plot twists. But if Grier seems to have come from 
another film, McGowan deserves one. Her dynamite performance as a cold, 
calculating rhymes-with-witch keeps this mess watchable. 
Much of the problem seems to stem from director Darren Stein's sloppy 
screenplay. The rules for successful dark humor state to either ground 
it in disturbing reality or drench it with cartoony meanness. It's 
immensely difficult to cater to both extremes, and that's precisely what 
"Jawbreaker" tries - and fails - to do. Take, for example, the final 
sequence, which is set at the big prom and contains obvious allusions to 
"Carrie." Are we supposed to laugh at what happens? If so, that violates 
the movie's more authentic elements and lets several characters off the 
hook just to finalize things on a cutesy, fantasy-oriented note. No 
wonder "Jawbreaker" ends up being hard to swallow.

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
200 CIGARETTES
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
What is it that makes this retro-comedy such a downer? It's certainly 
not the cast, which includes enough hot, young talent for several 
movies. There's Courtney Love, cementing her reputation as a serious 
actress; Christina Ricci, hot off her shoulda-been-nominated turn in 
"The Opposite of Sex"; Paul Rudd, who gets even more appealing with 
every role; Kate Hudson, inheriting some fine acting genes from mom 
Goldie Hawn; and Affleck brothers Ben and Casey, two of the best things 
about "Good Will Hunting." Perhaps the question is this: What drew these 
and other immensely talented actors to such a dreary project? 
Maybe it looked good on paper. "200 Cigarettes" is composed of a series 
of vignettes, as various characters make their way through New York's 
festively decorated East Village to a holiday bash thrown by a jittery 
bundle of nerves named Monica (Martha Plimpton, all dressed up in her 
best Cyndi Lauper). Among the potential guests are likeable cad Kevin 
(Rudd) and his best friend Lucy (Love), busy bickering over his recent 
break-up, and a clumsy but seemingly charming bartender (Ben Affleck) 
who opens his mouth only to spew forth bad pick-up lines. 
More subplots - _many_ more - dot the big picture, but those listed 
above are the only ones worth noting in a positive light. All the other 
story tangents are as frazzled as a cokehead trying to solve a Rubick's 
Cube. Ricci and Gaby Hoffman grate as two Ronkonkoma gals (the kind that 
have trouble pronouncing hard consonants) out to have a high time in the 
big city. Infamously acerbic comedienne Janeane Garofalo is wasted in 
what amounts to a several-scene cameo. Hudson, as a pretty-in-pink klutz 
recently devirginized by a reprehensible ladies' man (Jay Mohr), trips, 
pukes and gets smeared with dog poop. Are we laughing yet? 
The film boils down to a mixture of the good, the bad and the gaudy, 
with the latter two overtaking the former. Game performances - 
especially by Love, Rudd and Plimpton - are almost shot down by the 
bizarrely colorful parts and a constantly roving focus, here a 
combination that mostly sputters when it should crackle. Too many 
sidetracks rate as uninteresting and have little payoff until a lengthy 
final montage where we find out many of the performers served as one 
night stands for each other. If this is "200 Cigarettes," then get me 
200 nicotine patches. 

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
Warner Bros. / 2:16 / 1997 / R (language, violence, sexuality)
Cast: Guy Pearce; Russell Crowe; Kevin Spacey; James Cromwell; Danny 
DeVito; Kim Basinger; David Strathairn; Ron Rifkin 
Director: Curtis Hanson 
Screenplay: Curtis Hanson; Brian Helgeland 
In the down-and-dirty "L.A. Confidential," almost nobody is without 
blemish. The good guys are bad, the bad guys are worse and practically 
everyone's actions hide a shady hidden agenda. But don't think of the 
film's surplus of complex facets as confusing -- rather, they make "L.A. 
Confidential" a smart, intriguing synergy of film noir and crime drama, 
where most of the recent genre pictures have solely revelled in 
pretentiousness. Take, for example, last year's "Mullholland Falls," which 
only lived up to the second half of its title. 
"Confidential" chronicles the lives of three LAPD detectives in the early 
1950s: haunted strongman Bud White (Russell Crowe), prissy but ambitious 
Ed Exley (Guy Pearce) and smooth shark Jack Vincennes (Kevin Spacey). 
White and Exley's lack of common ground -- one's a hothead, the other 
quite level-headed -- results in each's hatred of the other, as the former 
relies on the brash techniques that the departmental-climbing latter 
totally abhors. Meanwhile, Vincennes serves as a technical consultant on a 
hit true-crime show and spends his evenings schmoozing with celebrities, 
reporters and assorted sleazy types, people like Sid Hudgens (Danny 
DeVito), the editor of the trashy tabloid "Hush-Hush" who never met a 
photo op he didn't like. 
A mass murder -- apparently the result of an armed robbery -- at a local 
diner called the Nite Owl throws these three men into an eventual, 
unlikely union. Upon the discovery that a recently-dismissed cop and a 
rumored prostitute are two of the victims, the Nite Owl killings suddenly 
appear to be more than a random, run-of-the-mill crime. Leads give way to 
the investigation of inter-office corruption and dealings with a pimping 
service where the girls are surgically enhanced to look like movie stars. 
One of these hookers -- a comely dead ringer for Veronica Lake named Lynn 
Bracken (Kim Basinger) -- strikes up a hot-and-heavy flirtation with White 
and, much later on, Exley. 
Conspiracy is everywhere in "L.A. Confidential" -- people scheme against 
and double cross each other on a regular basis -- but the film is smart 
enough to level out its playing field and never provide so much 
information that it never becomes too hard to take in; it's always 
mesmerizing and absorbing, frequently providing a sometimes necessary, 
sometimes not story summary. Even the character-defining subplots don't 
feel like time-filler. Those regulated to smaller roles come across with a 
fully-developed personality, and no one is lost in the shuffle of 
occurrences. 
Keen period detail and dazzling cinematography heighten the experience, as 
does DeVito's on-again, off-again narration. I usually think that 
voice-overs are unnecessary, but as he riffs about how Los Angeles is like 
"the Garden of Eden, but there's trouble in paradise," the feel, for once, 
is perfect. There are flaws -- several frayed plot strands exist by the 
time the credits roll -- but they're all insignificant and never hamper 
the enjoyment of "L.A. Confidential." The colorful cast occupies the 
picturesque setting with much gusto, character is just as important as 
plot and sharp twists and turns await every development. 
"L.A. Confidential" is based on the same-titled book by James Ellroy, a 
novel of which I have heard both things good (it's an entertaining read) 
and not-so-good (it makes absolutely no sense whatsoever). If the last 
statement is true, then that's just another reason why Brian Helgeland and 
Curtis Hanson -- who also directed -- deserve an Oscar nod for Best 
Adapted Screenplay. The whole package glistens with the utmost 
showmanship, style and verve, making "L.A. Confidential" one of the best 
bits of pulp fiction since "Chinatown." 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
That exclamation will likely be the general reaction of those massive 
throngs slowly shuffling from "Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom
Menace," regardless of whether or not they actually like the movie. This 
long-awaited premiere prequel in George Lucas' indomitable space saga 
has sumptuous sights up the wazoo: beautiful costumes, dazzling 
architecture, imaginative creature design and lush panoramas of worlds 
familiar and unfamiliar. But ogle-worthy opulence is the lone thing that 
audiences will undoubtedly herald post-"Phantom," as the early buzz from 
both critics and preview screenings has been quite mixed. 
Well, fear not, "Wars" watchers - all the iffiness merely comes as a 
side-effect of "Episode I"'s own gargantuan hype. Label any movie "the 
most anticipated event in cinema history" and the build-up is bound to 
let down some, especially those who've been waiting patiently for 
another fix of the Force ever since 1983's "Return of the Jedi." And 
since just about everybody fits into that category, a necessary bit of 
advice would be to approach "The Phantom Menace" aware of these 
king-sized expectations. Do so and you might be tickled pink to discover 
that, while not the pinnacle entry in Lucas' unfolding universe, it 
packs in wall-to-wall intrigue, spectacle and the finest special effects 
money - $115 million, reportedly - can buy.
The story still takes place in a galaxy far, far away, but even more of 
a long time ago - as in several scores before Lucas' other trilogy. The 
nifty opening introduces a younger, brasher version of Obi-Wan Kenobi 
("Trainspotting"'s Ewan McGregor), newly a Jedi Knight and apprentice to 
noble, level-headed Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson). The pair arrive 
on a Trade Federation spaceship to hopefully negotiate the end of a 
blockade that's been royally screwing over the nearby utopian planet of 
Naboo. "I have a bad feeling about this," grouses Obi-Wan, his line sure 
to draw chuckles from those keen on their "Star" lore. Turns out his 
reservations are justified.
Before you can mutter "Dagobah," lightsabers are drawn and enemy robots 
are exchanging fire with our Jedi heroes. They, wise to what's going on, 
hightail it to Naboo to rescue its pacifist teen queen (Natalie Portman) 
from certain death, but their escape envoy gets downed and they find 
themselves in a layover on the desert world of Tatooine. There, Qui-Gon 
meets and is quite taken by young slave boy Anakin Skywalker (Jake 
Lloyd) and his mother Shmi (Pernilla August, injecting emotion amid the 
grandeur), and fates are thusly sealed. This little innocent, we know 
from 1980's "The Empire Strikes Back," grows into the evil asthmatic 
known as Darth Vader.
To tip many more of the plot specifics would be oh so wrong, because 
"The Phantom Menace" provides a sense of wonder and astonishment almost 
as never-ceasing as the 1977 epic that started it all. A few old 
favorites are given tidy origin vignettes, while fascinating new beings 
- enough to fill the original's Cantina five times over - are welcomely 
trotted in front of the camera in their mostly computer-generated glory. 
All this and Lucas can still script and stage a riveting action 
sequence, as evidenced by the exhilarating pod race in which Anakin wins 
his freedom. For those who still thrill to "Ben-Hur"'s chariot chase, 
meet its overdue '90s sci-fi equivalent.
"Episode I" strays into childish territory at times (think Ewoks), 
particularly in its dealings with Jar Jar Binks, a beaked, donkey-eared 
amphibious alien whose clumsy antics and occasionally unintelligible 
island dialect might make you laugh or dig your fingernails into your 
armrest. A completely digital creation choreographed and voiced by 
Broadway performer Ahmed Best, he's this movie's comic relief - but not 
as accessible or successful as, say, bickering droids C-3PO and R2-D2 
(seen here) or growling Wookie Chewbacca (not). The wee ones, however, 
should cackle with delight every time Jar Jar flails, fumbles or fumes.
But that's not to suggest that this is strictly a kiddie flick. There's 
menace in "Menace," and a great deal of it emanates from enigmatic
villain Darth Maul. Maul, a cooler baddie than Boba Fett, is also the 
Character Most Likely to Inspire After-Viewing Discussion; as brought to 
life by famed martial artist Ray Park, he's a mass of oozing evil 
accentuated by demonic red-and-black Kabuki make-up and a dark hood that 
hides threatening horns. Many will ponder why he's given such little 
screen time, where they can learn his quick-as-lightening moves and how 
to become a member of his fan club. Maul's climactic lightsaber 
three-way with Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan is truly a brawl to behold.
Neeson and McGregor play off each other nicely, with the former lending 
all the showy showmanship gravity and the latter doing a grin-inducing 
Alec Guinness impersonation. Portman, looking lovely and Geisha-like 
under a series of bold gowns and bolder headdresses, makes a regal if 
delicate ruler - and a fine role model if any little girls wander into 
this ultimate boy fantasy. Lloyd, neither as splendid nor stinky as his 
respective supporters and detractors claim, is the sole acting weak 
link, but whether his relative inexperience or the occasionally 
tin-eared dialogue he's required to enliven are to blame is in the air 
(though he's typically strong when it counts).
Rest assured, the flaws here are minor distractions rather than gaping 
mistakes. The questionable gossip seems to stem from the unavoidable 
disappointment following a nearly decade-and-a-half wait and the 
rumblings that "The Phantom Menace" has a ton of setting-up to do. No 
matter. Once the going gets good, Lucas puts "Episode I" on hyperdrive, 
complete with four simultaneous big-risk battles, a passionate plea in a 
stunningly-realized senate chamber and a concluding montage that readies 
for "Episode II" with lip-smacking, spine-tingling foreshadowing.
It's only what ... another three years?

Title
Review for American Werewolf in Paris, An (1997)
Hollywood / 1:39 / 1997 / R (language, gore, brief nudity, muted sex)
Cast: Tom Everett Scott; Julie Delpy; Vince Vieluf; Phil Buckman; Julie 
Bowen; Pierre Cosso; Tom Novembre; Thierry Lhermitte 
Director: Anthony Waller 
Screenplay: Tim Burns; Tom Stern; Anthony Waller 
It's a sad, ironic thing when a werewolf movie lacks bite, but such is 
the case with "An American Werewolf in Paris." This pseudo-sequel's tiny 
feet fail to fill the sizeable shoes of John Landis' 1981 cult hit "An 
American Werewolf in London," and sorely missed is the original's deft 
one-two punch of dark thrills and darker humor. This effort is decent 
but could benefit from a Mike Nichols makeover -- his 1994 "Wolf" was a 
biting satire, a sizzling romance and a supernatural thriller, all of 
which "Paris" obviously aspires to be. The film dangerously courts 
disaster, but a few weirdly charming elements keep things watchable. 
The movie opens as a trio of horny college grads arrive in Paris, the 
latest destination in their "daredevil tour of Europe." Andy (Tom 
Everett Scott) plans to show buddies Brad (Vince Vieluf) and Chris (Phil 
Buckman) up by climbing to the top of the Eiffel Tower and swan-diving 
off -- bungee cord tied tight, of course. But Andy's stunt is 
interrupted by the presence of a beautiful, distraught French beauty 
(Jule Delpy) also prepared to pounce from the landmark, but with 
suicidal intent. He saves her, much to her chagrin, and escapes the 
ordeal with a couple of nasty bruises and one of the girl's shoes. 
Cinderella she's definitely not, though. Her name is Serafine, and when 
the moon is full ... let's just say she sprouts hair in more places than 
the armpits. But the recovering Andy thinks he has seen the love of his 
life, and devotes his vacation to tracking her down. The pursuit leads 
him into the underground of a Paris club -- actually a lycanthrope-run 
front to lure scum like American tourists to their snack-food doom -- 
where he is chased and attacked by a werewolf, and thus becomes one 
himself. Brad is killed in the ensuing havoc, and is doomed to follow 
Andy in the form of a decomposing nag, whose only release is the murder 
of the creature that mauled him. Andy, on the other hand, must eat the 
heart of his attacker to reverse his curse. 
The first half-hour or so is pretty solid silliness, but things take a 
turn for the worse once Andy begins his induction into the wereworld. 
"Paris"' agenda quickly becomes overstuffed; everybody's either a wolf 
or a zombie, and the movie seems so intent on delivering the bloody 
goods that it forgets to step back occasionally and let its audience 
breathe. It's good when a film moves fast, but not this fast -- it's all 
too easy to lose track of what's going on, who's after who, how 
character motivation relates to the unfolding action, etc. The hyper 
editing doesn't help, turning already-sloppy sequences into visual 
disasters (watch how abruptly and haplessly a particular bedroom 
interlude segues into an all-out chase through the streets). 
"American Werewolf"'s computer-generated creatures aren't as polished as 
those of recent fare like, say, "Starship Troopers," but I rather liked 
their design. These and other generally modest effects shots somehow 
manage to work despite being released in the year of "Titanic"; the 
afore-mentioned Eiffel Tower plummet (scored, by the way, to an 
excellent remix of Better Than Ezra's "Normal Town") isn't by any means 
spectacular, but is a nice, ludicrous scene nonetheless. Despite that 
famous Paris landmark's cameo, though, the movie utilizes none of the 
city's swank ambiance. If the natives didn't keep speaking with French 
accents, this might as well have been "An American Werewolf in Peoria." 
Also unwisely nixed is a stunner of a transformation scene -- "Paris"' 
prequel showcased both colorful London locale and creepy mutation 
effects that bagged it an Oscar. 
Tom Everett Scott (so wonderful in "That Thing You Do!") and Julie Delpy 
(ditto for "Before Sunrise") have a nice chemistry and are genuinely 
appealing performers. Vince Vieluf stands out among the supporting cast, 
displaying a goofy charm that will hopefully lead to future projects. 
There are some priceless sight gags (one involving a flying condom, 
another with a discharged eyeball) caught up in the middle of this mess, 
but their effect is muted by lengthy stretches of inane exposition. "An 
American Werewolf in Paris" isn't as horrid as last fall's forgettable 
"Bad Moon," but it's no howl either. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
20th Century Fox / 1:23 / 1999 / R (language, violence/gore)
Cast: Bridget Fonda; Bill Pullman; Oliver Platt; Brendan Gleeson; Betty
White; Meredith Salinger
Director: Steve Miner
Screenplay: David E. Kelley
The biggest mystery in "Lake Placid" doesn't concern how a 30-foot Asian
crocodile migrated from its native continent to a seaside New England
community, but rather if the David E. Kelley credited with the
screenplay is the same David E. Kelley behind current TV lawyer hits
like "Ally McBeal" and "The Practice." The answer: a surprising yes. If
Kelley's trying to broaden his range and/or media success with this
sassy monster mish-mash, then mission partially accomplished.
While "McBeal"'s skinny Calista Flockhart fends off charges of anorexia
and bulimia, Kelley's Lake lead visibly noshes just fine - on anything
and everything in mouth's reach, in fact. He's the aforementioned
centerpiece of this clownish creature feature, a gargantuan reptile that
attracts the attention of provincial authorities and big city scientists
after leaving one of his chompers in a partially-consumed scuba snack.
All of the diver goes into the water, but only half comes up. This
casualty happens in the opening sequence, which makes obvious the
movie's sly agenda.
Enter "Lake Placid"'s human cast, an attractive crew of underdeveloped
but engaging personalities. Chief among them are Bridget Fonda, a
recently-dumped paleontologist with some amusing neurotic tics, and Bill
Pullman, a fish and game warden not given much in the way of interesting
traits. They team up with the local sheriff ("The General"'s Brendan
Gleeson) and an eccentric mythology expert (the wonderful Oliver Platt)
to investigate their surroundings, and this latter pair's ongoing
rivalry constitutes a great deal of "Lake Placid"'s offbeat enjoyment
factor.
Also present for potential animal nourishment is none other than Betty
White, and the ex-Golden Girl cusses a blue streak as a batty town
resident who isn't afraid to let loose some hilariously profane barbs
when provoked. The mere inclusion of this character further proves that
"Lake Placid" shouldn't be taken at horror-flick face value, but instead
relished as Kelley's mostly successful attempt to invest his trademark
wit and sarcasm in a genre typically associated with only unintentional
humor.
Unfortunately, Kelley doesn't seem to want to script the whole show with
a wink, as evidenced by a throwaway budding romance between Fonda and
Pullman and several other serious sidetracks. "Lake Placid" runs a tight
83 minutes, hardly allowing time for any genuine lulls, but there are
some jarringly uncomfortable tone shifts. Good thing the movie moves at
a clip under the direction of Steve Miner, who, as evidenced in his
"Halloween: H20" last summer, still knows how to both keep tongue firmly
in cheek and stage an effective decapitation.
Of course, the audiences that will turn out for "Lake Placid" could
probably care less about the levels of irony found in this
"Jaws"-with-jokes. They'll want their fill of the film's cold-blooded
main attraction, of which they'll get a satisfying dose: This Stan
Winston-masterminded special effect - all imposing girth, teeth and
stare - is such a nifty sight that many will exit heralding, "What a
croc!" Those unenamored of "Lake Placid" might utter the same - only
with a K on the end of the last word.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"'20 Dates' tells the story of Myles Berkowitz, a man who wants to make
a film, and to fall in love. These areas are his two greatest failures,
professional and personal,' so he decides to make a film about going out
on 20 dates. By the film's end, he has won the love of the lovely
Elisabeth - maybe - but his professional life is obviously still a
failure." -Roger Ebert on "20 Dates"

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Columbia / 1:38 / 1997 / PG-13 (violence, language, crude humor)
Cast: Cast: Tommy Lee Jones; Will Smith; Linda Fiorentino; Rip Torn; 
Vincent D'Onofrio; Siobhan Fallon; Tony Shalhoub 
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld 
Screenplay: Ed Solomon 
A July 4 weekend opening date. Will Smith battling aliens. A moniker 
alias composed of three characters. It must be the gospel truth to say 
that Columbia Pictures is hoping their "Men in Black" conjures up 
memories of last summer's mega-hit "Independence Day." Alas, it does, 
but in an unexpected way -- both films bear the mark of being vastly 
disappointing, although "MiB" doesn't ever come close to the 
mind-numbing awfulness of "ID4." 
So hip it practically demands that you like it, "Men in Black" fails to 
surprise -- probably due to its heavily-pushed ad campaign. If you've 
seen the trailers, you've also seen most of the movie, a sad 
miscalculation that makes "MiB" feel less like a film than a 98-minute 
commercial for itself. But it's still no bore -- occasionally, there's 
wicked whimsy to be found, most of it likely spun from the hand of 
director and black comedy maestro Barry Sonnenfeld. 
Tommy Lee Jones exercises his bravura deadpan skill here as Agent K, a 
member of the top secret titular government sect whose job it is to 
monitor and regulate the on-Earth presence of intergalactic visitors. 
While K is showing the ropes to recently-recruited Agent J (Will Smith, 
displaying the same matter-of-fact cockiness that was the best thing 
about "ID4"), a terrorist bug crashes by a rural farmhouse, inhabits the 
body of nasty redneck Edgar (Vincent D'Onofrio) and sets into motion a 
diabolical plan that involves the theft of a golf ball-sized galaxy and 
the slaughter of an alien ambassador presently on the planet in human 
trappings. 
"Men in Black" is most fun when it expands on the events unfolding 
between J and K. Smith's training session (where it is revealed that Al 
Roker, Dionne Warwick and Dennis Rodman are, uh, not of this world) is a 
subtle, jokey riot. The sequences where J and K talk to Edgar's 
understandably distraught wife (Siobhan Fallon) -- and afterwards, erase 
her mind of the preceding events with a neat little gadget called a 
neuralyzer -- and interrogate an extraterrestrial informant in a very 
unusual disguise bring on the few belly laughs that "MiB" offers. The 
rest of the movie is definitely watchable, but could have achieved much 
higher ground had the ensuing development not been delivered with such a 
strong feeling of deja vu. 
The capable cast does what they can whenever Ed Solomon's screenplay -- 
based on a cult comic, by the way -- lags. It's great fun to see Jones 
interacting with other species with the same kind of laid-back serenity 
with which your typical person greets the mailman. Also effective is Rip 
Torn as the MiB overseer, but Linda Fiorentino is a tad underused as a 
mortician -- you can predict her character's inevitable destination as 
soon as she's been introduced. D'Onofrio, a little-known actor usually 
cast in small, independent films, gets suitably weirder as his carcass 
decomposes. 
Had "Men in Black" kept secretive some of its strange creatures, then 
it'd be worth talking about. But as it stands, everything is foolishly 
foreshadowed, including a cadaver whose noggin pops open to reveal a 
mini alien and J's finale boxing match with a giant cockroach (which 
makes little sense). In the long run, the snappy dialogue ("The cab 
drivers on this planet are terrible," laments one weary space traveler) 
is far spiffier than any of the sights. "Men in Black" is more 
dissatisfying in immediate afterthought than in week-old retrospect, but 
relish what's good about it while you can -- as other big summer 
attractions pop up, you'll feel like someone flashed a neuralyzer at 
you. What color were they again? 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Money Talks (1997)
New Line / 1:30 / 1997 / R (language, violence)
Cast: Chris Tucker; Charlie Sheen; Paul Sorvino; Heather Locklear; 
Gerard Ismael; Paul Gleason; Elise Neal; Veronica Cartwright; David 
Warner 
Director: Brett Ratner 
Screenplay: Joel Cohen; Alec Sokolow 
Chris Tucker is one of those guys you immediately get a reaction from -- 
you either find his helium voice, crazy eyes and jerky mannerisms funny 
or annoying. I think I fall into the former category (I'm one of the few 
who thought his turn in "The Fifth Element" as a prancing, Prince-like 
deejay was complete inspired lunacy and not the least bit aggravating), 
but his new vehicle "Money Talks" just doesn't do him service. Tucker is 
good in the movie -- and this is the kind of film that, if people see 
it, could make him a big star -- but he's also really the only thing 
good about the movie. In fact, if you see "Money Talks," it should shock 
you beyond recognition that two of "Toy Story"'s writers penned the 
sloppy script. 
Tucker's role here is that of Franklin Hatchett, a petty Los Angeles con 
artist whose carwash scams get him dogged by investigative reporter 
James Russell (Charlie Sheen). After being busted on the job for some 
illegal business involving counterfeit passports, Franklin finds himself 
on a bus to the county jail and handcuffed to slick international jewel 
smuggler Raymond Villard (Gerard Ismael). But Villard's thugs blow up 
the bus in an attempt to free their leader (never mind that the 
explosion could have instead killed him), and because he and Franklin 
are joined at the wrist, Franklin is allowed to escape as well, but not 
before overhearing some important information regarding a diamond stash 
that -- for some reason or another -- is being hidden in a vintage 
roadster waiting to be auctioned off at an upcoming auto expo. 
The local media mistakenly puts the prison break-out blame on Franklin, 
which is where James comes back into the picture. He makes a deal to 
protect Franklin if, in turn, Franklin gives him an exclusive interview. 
This means James must present his new "friend" in the stickiest of 
situations -- a formal dinner party for he and fiancee Grace (Heather 
Locklear), also attended by her uber-rich parents (Veronica Cartwright 
and nicely game Paul Sorvino). And of course the bad guys track Franklin 
down and try to knock him off, all the while he spars and forms an 
unlikely bond with James. "This ain't no buddy movie," claim the print 
ads. Yeah, right. 
Actually, for the better part of, oh, 20 minutes, it appears "Money 
Talks" has the momentum to cover entertaining ground, and this is mostly 
due to the presence of spastic motormouth Tucker. This is Tucker's first 
leading role, and if you imagine a slightly lankier, African-American 
Jim Carrey with a reliance on wild R-rated raunch rather than PG-13 
physical comedy, you have a good idea of the conviction with which he 
assaults the role. But you realize all too quickly that Tucker's 
overstated liveliness is the only thing "Money Talks" has going for it. 
And a lively actor alone does not a successful movie make. 
It's all too easy to pick out everything wrong with "Money Talks." The 
plot is recycled buddy-buddy comedy-thriller tripe that seemed overused 
even when "Nothing to Lose" employed it last month. Everything is 
paint-by-numbers, especially the Los Angeles Coliseum finale, which 
finds not one, not two, but three separate enemy factions firing at 
Franklin as they pursue him through the bleachers. The villains, as many 
as there are, are dull. Certain story elements are too coincidental. And 
too much of the film's dramatic agenda is played too straight. A scene 
where Grace confronts James after learning Franklin's true identity 
("You brought a killer into my parents' house!") is extremely silly. You 
get the picture. 
Obviously, I did not have a pleasant experience at "Money Talks." But 
the people around me appeared to be having a rip-roaring good time (one 
gentleman several rows behind me chortled with such expressive 
conviction I began fearing for his health). But Tucker, at least for me, 
is a pretty funny guy, and aces the movie's best scene, where Franklin 
passes himself off as Vic Damone's son at James and Grace's engagement 
bash and toasts the couple with Barry White lyrics. Tucker's audience -- 
and he does have one -- will probably like "Money Talks." Those who he 
irritates, however, will have a more productive day staying home and 
scraping the gook out from under their toenails. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
SPECIES II
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The story, such as it is, casts Henstridge as a good guy, a docile clone 
of her "Species" character that helps out fellow original cast members 
Marg Helgenberger, as a brainy biologist, and Michael Madsen, a stoic 
hitman. They're pitted against a heroic astronaut (Justin Lazard) that 
returns from America's first Mars mission with a little something extra 
in the bloodstream. When the mood strikes him -- and the mood strikes 
him often, considering his alien urge to procreate -- he turns into a 
sex-crazed, slimy monster whose demon semen produce instant toddlers 
that cause his bedmates' bellies to graphically swell and pop right open 
post-coitus. So much for the afterglow, I guess. 
There's little imagination or creativity at work here, but those things 
aren't what "Species II"'s core audience will be looking for anyway; 
presumably, nobody's going to see this movie expecting anything more 
than gore, sex and special effects, so the character and story holes and 
lack of coherent plotting aren't really going to be enjoyment 
roadblocks. "Species II" is at least competently assembled, with slick 
production design, a few interesting moments and a couple of 
particularly puzzling celeb cameos (Richard Belzer as the president?). 
Take away the antagonist gender-reversal and this is essentially the 
very same movie as "Species." It even ends, not unlike its prequel, with 
the promise of another installment. Any takers? 
Recurring attempts to lend the film some emotional weight, as the 
antagonist is fully aware and occasionally horrified of the bloodshed 
he's causing, distract from the rest of the mostly campy proceedings, 
and even render certain scenes somewhat distasteful. Patches of "Species 
II" are genuinely, pleasantly goofy (particularly a scene where Lazard's 
brood demonstrates an inventive use for snot), but the film as a whole 
is highly inconsistent, and bouts of hilarity -- be they intentional or 
not -- don't justify a slight, needless sequel. The makers of "Species 
II" should have left the alien resurrections (and alien franchise 
resurrections) to Sigourney Weaver.

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
Rating: ***1/2 (out of four)
Miramax / 1:36 / 1999 / PG-13 (brief, out-of-focus nudity, steamy
romantic clinches)
Cast: Rupert Everett; Julianne Moore; Jeremy Northam; Cate Blanchett;
Minnie Driver; John Wood; Peter Vaughn
Director: Oliver Parker
Screenplay: Oliver Parker
Shameful pasts. Secret affairs. Astonishing revelations. Political
intrigue. No, "An Ideal Husband" isn't a depiction of recent turmoil in
our nation's capital - though the title would take on an ironic new
meaning were that the case. Instead, it's a handsome adaptation of the
beloved Oscar Wilde play, and the story, with all of its aforementioned
scandalous components, couldn't render it timelier. Or funnier: Wilde's
penchant for epigrams and one-liners remains despite some necessary
cinematic tinkering on the part of director/writer Oliver Parker.
Parker, who helmed the fiery Laurence Fishburne "Othello" a few years
back, takes liberties here just like he did there. His "Othello" lopped
off about half of the source text and modified the rest in favor of mass
audience appeal, but Wilde purists will be happy to know that no such
sacrilegious bombshells are dropped with "Husband." The biggest changes
involve expanding beyond the original's mere four scenes in terms of
action and setting, modifications which serve its cinematic status while
staying faithful to the genius of Wilde. A series of potentially stuffy
high-society gatherings, both public and personal, are now broken up
with sequences in lush countrysides and conservatories.
Complain about this restructuring if you must, but please speak fondly
of the cast. "An Ideal Husband" lays claim to an A-list of performers in
its featured quintet of roles, and each has delicious things to do and
say - especially Rupert Everett. Somehow snubbed by the Academy for his
savory supporting turn in 1997's "My Best Friend's Wedding," Everett
could see Oscar rebound for his delightfully droll turn as Sir Arthur
Goring, an idle bachelor with little on his to-do list and even less to
say. "I love talking about nothing," he deadpans on the subject of
upper-crust chit-chat in a typically wry bit of Wilde wit. "It's the
only thing I know anything about."
Well, there'll be plenty to discuss soon enough. Devilish debutante Miss
Cheveley (Julianne Moore), Goring's ex-fiancee, surfaces in his
late-1800s London province to discuss marriage while secretly
blackmailing Sir Robert Chiltern (class act Jeremy Northam, making his
dilemma palpable), Goring's best friend and an up-and-coming figure in
parliament, with a skeleton long buried in his closet. Chiltern's loyal
wife (Cate Blanchett) and siren sister (Minnie Driver, never better)
also poke their way into this tremendously tangled character-woven web;
the former finds herself at a crossroads after learning her hubby's
secret, the latter rivals Miss Cheveley for Goring's affections.
"An Ideal Husband" probably sounds more complex than it is. Though
classics aren't usually associated with accessibility, Parker, taking a
cue from his "Othello" work, keeps his multi-layered people and plots
remarkably straight - even when motivation gets a little murky and
certain strands don't quite hit the highs of others. But since this is
mostly an actors' movie, those flaws seem more minute than they already
are. Aside from Everett's show-stealing, there's Aussie Blanchett again
proving chameleonic range after her robust ruler in "Elizabeth" and
Joisey gal in "Pushing Tin" and American Moore flaunting a Gwyneth-class
Brit accent, her devilish mouth curling around every suggestive word.
With Jane Austen's library-to-screen craze gone but not forgotten and
the Bard nearing the end of his "Shakespeare in Love"-induced hot
streak, "Husband"'s sparkling, irresistible and gentle comedy of manners
could be just the art-house draw to give Wilde his due in the mainstream
spotlight. It's not likely that this forecast will need much luck: In a
summer full of lightsabers, mojo and glossy star vehicles, the film
already ranks as a smallish but rewarding breath of fresh air. Throw in
special effects that are 100 percent human, and "An Ideal Husband" makes
for a movie bet that's beyond ideal.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. 'Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
New Line / 1997 / 1:37 / PG-13 (language, violence, disturbing
religious overtones, crude sex humor)
Cast: John Leguizamo; Michael Jai White; Martin Sheen; Theresa Randle;
Melinda Clarke; Miko Hughes; Sydni Beaudoin; Nicol Williamson;
D.B. Sweeney
Director: Mark A.Z. Dippe 
Screenplay: Alan McElroy 
"Spawn" features good guys, bad guys, lots of fighting, bloody
violence, a leather-clad machine gun chick, gooey, self-healing bullet
holes, scatological humor and a man-eating monster. It not only
appears to have been tailor made for a swarm of 12- and 13-year-old
boys, it appears to have been made by them.
In a classic example of telling and not showing, "Spawn" opens with a
truckload of mumbo jumbo about forces of darkness, forces of light and
how "men are the ones who create evil on earth." So much for a
message. The movie then lurches forward into the plight of Al Simmons
(Michael Jai White), a government assassin/operative who is murdered
by diabolical boss Jason Wynn (Martin Sheen, who plays all of his
scenes like an Oscar clip) while on a top secret mission in a North
Korean biological weapons plant. Simmons goes to hell and back, after
making a deal with Satan himself -- if he agrees to command the
Devil's army to overtake the world, he'll be allowed to return to
Earth to see his wife Wanda (underused Theresa Randle) and little girl
Cyan (Sydni Beaudoin).
Of course, seeing as how five years has passed, Wanda has fallen for
-- and married -- Simmons' partner (D.B. Sweeney). His, uh, shoulder
to cry on comes in the form of Clown (John Leguizamo), a disgustingly
disproportioned minion of Satan's. Clown manipulates Simmons, now in
superhuman Spawn form, into a stand off with Wynn. Wynn, who thinks he
is in league with the double-dealing Clown, recognizes Spawn as a
threat and undergoes an operation where a bomb is placed on his heart
-- when it stops beating, major cities around the world will detonate,
causing the leak of a disease that "makes the ebola virus look like a
skin rash."
It would be easy to dismiss "Spawn" as just another one of those
heavy-on-FX, short-on-substance action pics, but it doesn't even work
on that level. The computer-generated sequences are often and plenty,
and the problem is that they look too computer-generated. The several
scenes set in hell present a Devil that looks and acts like a video
game graphic -- with the movie's healthy budget you'd think they could
have afforded to make his mouth move when he talks. Other elements of
the movie are so-so; Spawn's enormous red, flowing cape is a wonderful
sight, but it's too obvious when he's being played by a costumed actor
or an image. In movies like "Contact," the special effects serve the
story. In "Spawn," they are the story.
And Spawn himself isn't even an interesting character. The film's
reliance on razzle-dazzle would be acceptable if we were given
somebody to root for, but both Simmons and his funky alter-ego are
completely underdeveloped. What we need is a Batman, a Luke
Skywalker. Even watching the adventures of Kleenex Man would be more
interesting than Spawn.
Poor Leguizamo. He starred in February's "The Pest," a movie that I
still think is the year's worst so far, although this one does give it
a run for its money. As Clown, he overacts to the extreme, never
missing an opportunity for a poor-taste punchline.  Leguizamo farts
green mist, munches a pizza slice covered with maggots and even dons a
mini-skirt and performs a cheerleader routine, all before turning into
a giant grey demon. The guy was brilliant in "To Wong Foo, Thanks for
Everything! Julie Newmar."  What is he doing wasting his talent in
this and "The Pest"?
I'm one of the few people that liked "Batman & Robin," this summer's
other big-budget comic book film. Yet after catching this movie and
making the inevitable comparison, I can only hope people will change
their minds and think of "Batman" as the superior adaptation. There's
a compelling story somewhere in "Spawn" -- including strong religious
overtones and the debut of the first African-American superhero ever
-- but it's just not found anywhere near here. As it is, "Spawn" is
just awful -- it stinks worse than a dead trout.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Universal / 2:02 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, sexuality)
Cast: Matthew McConaughey; Jenna Elfman; Ellen DeGeneres; Woody
Harrelson; Rob Reiner; Sally Kirkland; Martin Landau; Viveka Davis;
Dennis Hopper
Director: Ron Howard
Screenplay: Lowell Ganz; Babaloo Mandel
The Andy Warhol-professed notion of 15 minutes of fame seems to have
been invented for people like Monica Lewinsky, today's hot pop act du
jour, and now Ed Pekurny, the centerpiece of Ron Howard's new comedy
"EDtv." As played by Matthew McConaughey, last seen brandishing
six-shooters in "The Newton Boys" about a year ago, Ed's an easygoing
San Francisco video store clerk whose Southern twang, down-home charm
and almost soothing presence make him the sort of average Joe you'd like
to see good things happen to. In short, he's the perfect tour guide
through Howard's giddily twisted take on celebrity status.
Sad to say, but such niceties don't exactly befall our hero, who is
hand-picked by a struggling cable network to be the focus of a live,
24-hour-a-day television show that follows and broadcasts his every move
- think of it as a non-stop version of "The Real World" without the
gloomy roomies and cautious censors. Oh, sure, things start off on the
right foot, as Ed's without-warning popularity sends him on the fast
track to becoming a household name. He gets the ratings, the autograph
hounds and even the sweet fiancee (Jenna Elfman) of his loutish brother
(Woody Harrelson), after the omnipresent camera crews catch the latter
inflagrante.
But the luster begins to fade, the media is soon taking national polls
regarding the personal life of this public man, and the Nielsen-minded
producers are going to disturbing lengths to rake in the numbers - as
far as arranging Ed to have a session of on-air lovin' with a alluring
model (Elizabeth Hurley). These wild ups and downs, while not
necessarily grounded in reality, provide a generous helping of yuks and
yucks - the latter when Ed partakes in lovely chores like
toenail-clipping and the reliable early-morn crotch adjustment on the
idiot box. "EDtv" ultimately shuns a few of the questions it poses, but
a movie this infectiously genial need not be concerned with the big
picture.
So fast do the laughs, spoofs and assorted gags come that there's little
time to take in how low-key the romantic angle is - McConaughey and
Elfman click but hardly combust, a hindrance which may actually aid the
couple's ultimate dilemma - or that a subplot revealing some aired dirty
laundry in the Pekurny family past cuts an unfortunate path into soapy
melodrama; if I were a watcher, I'd probably use these parts for
bathroom breaks and nacho runs. Also, the finale, as Ed turns the tables
on the station monsters who exploit his should-be-private crises, lacks
the early zip and zest, ending up like a really long joke that almost
blows its punchline.
Luckily, a superlative cast of supporting oddballs as endearing as
McConaughey make even the weakest passages something to sit through.
Martin Landau gets choice one-liners as Ed's decrepit, wheelchair-bound
stepdad ("I've gotta pee. Wish me luck."), while Sally Kirkland -
where's she been, by the way? - does nice work as his white-trash mom,
the kind that fancies KFC as quality dining. Dennis Hopper shows up
briefly as Ed's biological father, and Howard wisely gives ex-sitcom
stars Ellen DeGeneres and Rob Reiner plum roles as program honchos,
respectively conflicted and conscience-challenged. DeGeneres, for one,
has never been brighter.
So chalk up a hit for "EDtv," and let's hope it gets renewed for next
season. Something so fresh, sneaky and entertaining certainly deserves
its share of the viewership, but don't go expecting the wisdom of "The
Truman Show" or face dire disappointment. Comparisons are inevitable -
and maybe just a little inappropriate given the two movies' varied
agendas - but here goes anyway: Think of "The Truman Show" as the
deeper, smarter and more thought-provoking classy cousin to "EDtv"'s
silly, rude and quick-to-please country bumpkin. Ed himself may put the
boob back into boob tube, but it's hard not to like what you see.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"20 Dates' tells the story of Myles Berkowitz, a man who wants to make
a film, and to fall in love. These areas are his two greatest failures,
professional and personal,' so he decides to make a film about going out
on 20 dates. By the film's end, he has won the love of the lovely
Elisabeth - maybe - but his professional life is obviously still a
failure." -Roger Ebert on "20 Dates"

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
Hollywood / 1:46 / 1998 / R (gore, language, gore, gore, gore)
Cast: Treat Williams; Famke Janssen; Anthony Heald; Kevin J. O'Connor; Wes Studi; 
Derrick O'Connor; Jason Flemyng; Djimon Honsou 
Director: Stephen Sommers 
Screenplay: Stephen Sommers 
"Deep Rising" gives you that sinking feeling both literally and figuratively: Not 
only does the movie take place on a cruise ship slowly being immersed into the 
middle of the ocean by a squid-like menace, but the unfolding story is artificial, 
silly and almost completely derivative of countless other (and, for the most part, 
better) films. While dumb monster movies can at least be decent guilty pleasures -- 
take, for example, the schlocky mountain highs of last spring's "Anaconda" -- "Deep 
Rising" has no tongue to put in its cheek. Folks, we're only a month into the new 
year, and already here's a candidate for one of its stinkiest releases. 
Most of the action takes place on the Argonautica, a luxury liner in the middle of 
its maiden voyage (uh-oh -- if these people had seen "Titanic," then maybe they'd 
have known to stay home) when it's attacked by a giant, tentacled sea creature . The
only survivors are slinky jewel thief Trilian (Famke Janssen), Argonautica owner 
Canton (Anthony Heald) and a few other crew members. A mercenary team, lead by 
resourceful captain John Finnegan (Treat Williams), board the Argonautica looking 
for assistance after their own boat breaks down nearby. But what their search of the 
ship uncovers is something blood-soaked, hungry and not very helpful. 
The main problem with "Deep Rising" is its overt familiarity; the movie makes 
absolutely no attempt to differentiate itself from most sci-fi/horror films in 
recent memory. The concept is "Leviathan" meets "Titanic," with a dash of "Speed 2" 
thrown in for good (or is that bad?) measure. This monster is equal parts "20,000 
Leagues Under the Sea" and "The Relic," knows how to open doors like the Raptors 
from "Jurassic Park" and even gets to expel a half-digested victim (a neat effect, 
admittedly) a la the giant snake in "Anaconda." Some of the attack sequences are 
straight out of "Jaws" and "Alien." A scene where the remaining survivors have to 
travel under water to escape death is right out of "Alien Resurrection." There's 
even a jet ski chase like "Hard Rain." And the list goes on. 
Watching "Deep Rising"'s cast battle the beast is a murky chore in itself, because 
none of them have well-developed characters, nor do they seem to project even the 
slightest sense of fear when facing their enemy. Williams is affable enough, but his 
Finnegan just isn't believable. An interesting supporting cast is thoroughly wasted; 
pretty Famke Janssen, best known as "GoldenEye"'s killer thighs, is trapped in a 
forced romantic interest with Williams, while Kevin J. O'Connor, as Finnegan's 
mechanic, provides comic relief with screechy manic shtick that gets old fast. 
Djimon Honsou, who received raves for his performance as a noble slave in December's 
"Amistad," pops up in a brief part. He needs to stay away from the water. 
The movie's final shot is a groaner, as is the 11th-hour regurgitation of a subplot 
involving an on-ship saboteur. As if a cast deserving of their snack food-fate isn't 
bad enough (when you taunt the monster, you're really asking for it), "Deep Rising" 
is a slow, stupid slog through a story without a single bright spot. And since we 
all know that the higher the casualty rate is, the closer we are to the end of the 
movie, rooting for this overgrown squid to swallow the whole ship isn't out of the 
question. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Warner Bros. / 2:14 / 1997 / R (language, violence, nudity, sex)
Cast: Keanu Reeves; Al Pacino; Charlize Theron; Jeffery Jones; Judith Ivey; Craig T. 
Nelson; Delroy Lindo 
Director: Taylor Hackford 
Screenplay: Tony Gilroy; Jonathan Lemkin 
Al Pacino plays none other than Satan himself in "The Devil's Advocate," but as 
insidiously campy as the resulting premise might sound, the movie is a cunning treasure 
rather than a guilty pleasure. Here's a black comedy-thriller that succeeds in earning 
both hearty laughs and jolting shocks, a probable crowd-pleasing synergy that should 
keep audiences packed into theater seats well into late autumn. 
"The Devil's Advocate" is Pacino's movie even if it does cast Keanu Reeves in the lead 
role. Reeves plays Florida lawyer Kevin Lomax, whose in-court prowess is proved when he 
single-handedly turns the tables on a young witness who is accusing his creep 
schoolteacher defendant of sexually molesting her. We get the feeling the guy did it, 
but Kevin gets him off regardless. Among the courtroom audience is an attorney from a 
powerful New York firm who has heard of Kevin's no-miss acquittal record and would very 
much like to recruit him. Kevin succumbs to the promise of financial solvency, and 
heads up north with his pretty wife Mary Ann (Charlize Theron of "2 Days in the Valley" 
and "That Thing You Do!") despite the objections of his Bible-thumping mother (dowdy 
Judith Ivey). 
Upon his arrival, Kevin quickly bonds with the firm's president, a rich, enigmatic man 
named John Milton (Pacino). Kevin is easily seduced into his new friend's world of 
wealth and power, but things are different for Mary Ann. After seeing frightening,
supernatural occurrences she can't explain (including glimpses of some of the partners' 
wives' faces changing briefly to something altogether sinister), she begins to doubt 
that everything is as perfect as it seems. Kevin dismisses her paranoia as anxiety over 
their lack of time to start a family and instead, focuses on a high-profile murder 
defense for a probably-guilty client (Craig T. Nelson) that could win him even more 
acclamation. 
Given that both the previews and the title give away the movie's central twist -- 
obviously that Milton is really the devil -- I had feared that the movie would fail at 
creating suspense and pretty much be a one-joke yarn. But what's so great about The
Devil's Advocate is how dramatic the material is. It matters less that Milton is Satan 
than what will happen to the two protagonists -- Kevin's temptation and redemption and 
Mary Ann's dilapidating stability take center stage here. The resulting mental 
tug-of-war between the three is scary, sexy and altogether superb, allowing a 
two-and-a-quarter-hour running time to speed by faster than the 93-minute "Playing 
God." 
Of course, the Ira Levin-esque story ("Rosemary's Attorney," perhaps?) is only made 
stronger by extremely lavish production values. The cinematography and set design, 
particularly Milton's sacrificial chamber-like office and the erotic mural that hangs
behind his desk, are dark, creepy and effective in establishing mood. James Newton 
Howard's score always teases upcoming surprises but never becomes manipulative. The 
movie even surprises in limiting its reliance on showy special effects, notwithstanding 
a spectacular end 20 minutes that caps off with one of the best closing scenes ever put 
to film. As things are playing out, you keep wondering how on earth a satisfying finale 
will be possible. Not only does it sate expectation, but it's also loaded with the 
genius downbeat-but-upbeat deviousness that sent "The Usual Suspects" into the send-off 
stratosphere. 
The acting from Pacino is exactly as suspected -- stellar. He eats (or burns) the 
scenery up, playing each horrific scene with a devilish smile that you can't help 
nodding at. He's got a number of great scenes, the best of which is probably when he 
calmly subdues a pair of vicious subway hoodlums. With this and "Donnie Brasco" under 
his belt this year, he's got two chances at Oscar gold. Theron is award-worthy too, 
fleshing out a character that a lesser movie would have employed as window dressing. 
She's beautiful and strong, and holds her own in scenes with Pacino. Reeves is the true 
surprise here. His on-again, off-again accent is a tad distracting, but Reeves 
accomplishes his best dramatic role to date. When the movie spins a nasty surprise past 
the three-quarter mark, he emotes beautifully. The directing by Taylor Hackford is 
seamless, as well as a fantastic follow-up to his exceptional 1995 thriller "Dolores 
Claiborne."
Like John Milton, "The Devil's Advocate" can be called so many things. It's Faust meets 
John Grisham. It's "Rosemary's Baby" for the age of legal extremes. It's a morality 
tale with one heckuva moral. "The Devil's Advocate" is all of these and more, rolled up 
into one fascinating, near-flawless movie. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)

THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
An occasionally seedy, always adult-oriented agenda is announced the
precise moment "Daughter"'s ball gets rolling, following an unnecessarily
lengthy intro that allows viewers to meet and greet John Travolta in
another sterling dramatic turn. He plays top warrant officer Paul Brenner,
assigned by the army's Criminal Investigation Division to sort through
some sticky business involving an arms buyer on a Georgia base. During his
stay there, the general's daughter (Leslie Stefanson), a captain herself,
turns up dead -- and naked, spread-eagle, tent-staked to the ground and
apparently sexually assaulted. You can probably wager a guess as to
whether or not this movie is your cup of tea already. 
To help him look for leads, Brenner gets paired with a rape specialist
(Madeleine Stowe) with whom he shares a romantic history. The resulting
rekindled-relationship subplot takes up less time than initially
suspected, but still feels tacked-on -- especially while rushing to a
happy resolution over the closing credits. Perhaps it stems from a need to
make sure viewers exit "The General's Daughter" reassured that the world
ain't such a bad place after all, because the material that constitutes a
majority of the preceding two hours certainly suggests the opposite. It's
a monstrously depressing story, really. 
Our protagonists' sleuthing unearths a slew of unsavory revelations from
the victim's past, as well as many shady supporting types. James Woods
clashes masterfully with Travolta as the deceased's enigmatic mentor,
their scenes more explosive than those that contain actual firearms.
Ex-"Mod Squad"-er Clarence Williams III is weird and sweaty as a colonel
intensely loyal to his superiors. Even the notion that the girl's
decorated father (James Cromwell) isn't beyond suspicion won't be news to
fans of the twisty genre. But unsettling shocks are delivered in the
ultimate disclosures of this supremely unusual parent-child bond -- and
it's probably not what you're thinking. 
Sure, "The General's Daughter" is messy in ways most thrillers are: logic
holes, ill-used actors (here, the horribly underrated Timothy Hutton as a
helpful MP) and a weak send-off that botches the actual perp's identity
and motive. But the movie still resonates strongly, particularly the
potent posthumous development of the title character and the solid acting
from Travolta, Woods and Stowe. Stowe overcomes her female-tagalong role
by commanding one of Daughter's most attention-capturing moments: her
shrewd locker-room grilling of a cadet who's concealing important
case-related secrets. 
Director Simon West cut his teeth on 1997's "Con Air," a
testosterone-heavy Simpson-Bruckheimer actioner, and brings similar
stylized visuals to "The General's Daughter" -- meaning that chopper
blades spin in glorious slow-motion and nary an edit lasts longer than 10
seconds. This odd choice pays off, making edgier scenes seem less
exploitative. But why does West plop a statistic over the ending
fade-to-black that estimates the number of women in the armed forces at an
empowering high? Uh, if "Daughter" was supposed to inspire females to be
all they can be, it needs major rewrite.

Title
Review for Quest for Camelot (1998)
QUEST FOR CAMELOT
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The story revolves around the adventures of free-spirited Kayley (voiced 
by Jessalyn Gilsig), the early-teen daughter of a belated knight from 
King Arthur's Round Table. Kayley's only dream is to follow in her 
father's footsteps, and she gets her chance when evil warlord Ruber 
(Gary Oldman), an ex-Round Table member-gone-bad, steals Arthur's 
magical sword Excalibur and accidentally loses it in a dangerous, 
booby-trapped forest. With the help of hunky, blind timberland-dweller 
Garrett (Carey Elwes) and a two-headed dragon (Eric Idle and Don 
Rickles) that's always arguing with itself, Kayley just might be able to 
break the medieval sexist mold and prove her worth as a fighter on 
Arthur's side. 
"Quest for Camelot" is missing pure showmanship, an essential element if 
it's ever expected to climb to the high ranks of Disney. There's nothing 
here that differentiates "Quest" from something you'd see on any given 
Saturday morning cartoon -- subpar animation, instantly forgettable 
songs, poorly-integrated computerized footage. (Compare Kayley and 
Garrett's run-in with the angry ogre to Herc's battle with the Hydra. I 
rest my case.) Even the characters stink -- none of them are remotely 
interesting, so much that the film becomes a race to see which one can 
out-bland the others. In the end, it's a tie -- they all win.
That dragon's comedy shtick is awfully cloying, but at least it shows 
signs of a pulse. 
At least fans of the early-'90s TGIF television line-up will be thrilled 
to find Jaleel "Urkel" White and Bronson "Balki" Pinchot sharing the 
same footage. A few scenes are nicely realized (though I'm at a loss to 
recall enough to be specific), and the actors providing the voice talent 
are enthusiastic (though most are paired up with singers who don't sound 
a thing like them for their big musical moments -- Jane Seymour and 
Celine Dion???). But one must strain through too much of this mess to 
find the good. Aside from the fact that children will probably be as 
bored watching this as adults, "Quest for Camelot"'s most grievous error 
is its complete lack of personality. And personality, we learn from this 
mess, goes a very long way. 

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
20th Century Fox / 1:43 / 1997 / R (language, violence, sexual 
material)
Cast: Ewan McGregor; Cameron Diaz; Holly Hunter; Delroy Lindo; 
Ian Holm; Stanley Tucci; Maury Chaykin; Ian McNeice; Dan Hedaya
Director: Danny Boyle 
Screenwriter: John Hodge 
The opening scene of "A Life Less Ordinary," the new comedy from 
the creative team behind "Trainspotting" and "Shallow Grave," 
takes place in heaven, and although eventually messy plotting in 
the last half-hour almost sends the film to script hell, it's 
still quite an enjoyable, fast-paced romp. Sturdy acting, 
splendid visuals and warped originality amount to much in the 
long run and act as a steering wheel to jerk the movie back on 
track whenever it veers off course -- which is more often than 
you'd think. 
The film's afore-mentioned kickoff finds bumbling celestial cops 
O'Reilly (Holly Hunter, who's never looked more luminous) and 
Jackson (Delroy Lindo) receiving an ultimatum from Chief of 
Police Garbiel (Dan Hedaya), who is under pressure from God to 
"unite men and women" -- they must successfully play matchmaker 
for a pair of humans, or spend the rest of their existence 
walking on earth. But uniting target couple Celine (Cameron Diaz) 
and Robert (Ewan McGregor) isn't as easy a task as it sounds -- 
she's a pampered heiress who passes the time by shooting apples 
off the top of the hired help's heads, he's a janitor for her 
wealthy businessman dad (Ian Holm) who dreams of writing the 
"great American trash novel." 
Their lives collide right away -- when Robert loses both his job 
and his apartment, he storms into the office of his boss, who 
happens to be in the midst of scolding Celine for a recent pistol 
and fruit-related accident. Operating on impulse, Robert takes 
Celine hostage, but her general willingness and lack of 
resistance throws him off. She dislikes her father just enough to 
work with Robert on a kidnapping scheme -- they'll hit him up for 
a hefty ransom for her safe return, then take the money and run. 
O'Reilly and Jackson trail Robert and Celine the whole way, 
staging wild tricks that give them little choice but to fall in 
love. 
Less is certainly not more in "Ordinary"'s case. It takes pride 
in its overabundances, and for the most part, so do we. The 
characters are quirky, the story is interesting and the movie's 
funky visuals are not to be denied. Considering the cheeky 
material that's being performed, it's a blessing that "A Life 
Less Ordinary" never sprouts an overtly serious edge, even when 
the first hour's fascinating execution is traded in for a 
send-off that grows progressively non-sensical, including a corny 
bit of Divine Intervention and a Claymation ending sequence (go 
ahead -- scratch your heads with me). But even when the movie 
begins to fall apart, it's still pretty much a blast to watch. 
The setup is almost exactly similar to August's awful Alicia 
Silverstone vehicle "Excess Baggage," but "A Life Less Ordinary" 
livens up the convoluted territory with some really inventive (if 
flawed) material. For example, take the plight of the angels. 
Conceptually, they're a great idea, and Hunter steals the picture 
with her twitchy mannerisms and oft-changing accents. But 
screenwriter John Hodge limits their imagination by placing them 
in too-absurd situations. Why do they masquerade as bounty 
hunters for Celine's dad? And why, if they're supposed to be 
getting the pair together, are they constantly endangering their 
lives? These questions are never answered, but they make for some 
clever scenes (it's a funny running gag how violently Hunter's 
O'Reilly is knocked around). 
"A Life Less Ordinary" doesn't fully realize its potential (a 
slightly angering flaw), but there is still enough solid material 
to keep you entertained and enchanted. McGregor and Diaz exhibit 
a strong chemistry; their sequences together -- one where she 
trains him on how to make a ransom call and another where they 
perform a surreal, rollicking karaoke version of "Somewhere 
Beyond the Sea" -- rank as the movie's brightest. And director 
Danny Boyle keeps things spinning with "Trainspotting"-like 
camera angles and even a subtle reference to McGregor's upcoming 
role as Ben Kenobi in George Lucas' new "Star Wars" trilogy. "A 
Life Less Ordinary" isn't ordinary in the least, and it proves 
that that's not necessarily a bad thing. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
20th Century Fox / 1:51 / 1998 / R (langauge, violence, muted sex)
Cast: Ethan Hawke; Gwyneth Paltrow; Anne Bancroft; Robert De Niro; Chris 
Cooper; Hank Azaria; Josh Mostel; Jeremy James Kissner; Raquel Beaudene 
Director: Alfonso Cuaron 
Screenplay: Mitch Glazer 
Studio expectations must not have been high for "Great Expectations" -- 
the film's release date was pushed from late December to late January at 
what appeared to be the last minute, therefore putting any Academy 
Awards chances it has off until this time in 1999. It's actually a smart 
move, because while this updated take on the Charles Dickens tale isn't 
quite Oscar fodder, it *is* strong enough to be distinguished from the 
cinematic dumping ground that usually makes up the first five or six 
weeks of any given year. "Great Expectations" also demonstrates how to 
modernize a classic story right, especially after the excruciatingly 
wretched excesses of Baz Luhrmann's "William Shakespeare's Romeo + 
Juliet." 
"Great Expectations" opens somewhere in 1970s Florida (the original 
story is set in 19th-century England), as eight-year-old Finn (Jeremy 
James Kissner) meets a trio of people who will have a profound effect on 
his life in the future. There's icy, 11-year-old Estella (Raquel 
Beaudene), a pseudo-playmate of Finn's; Ms. Dinsmoor (Anne Bancroft), 
Estella's auntie who's quite off-kilter over a past romance that never 
took off; and a mysterious prisoner (Robert De Niro) whom Finn saves the 
life of. Finn, who lives with his sister's affable boyfriend (Lone 
Star's Chris Cooper), fancies himself an aspiring artist, and proves his 
prowess by whipping up an unusual portrait of Estella using only Ms. 
Dinsmoor's lipstick, eyebrow pencil and the wallpaper from her 
dilapidating mansion. 
Flash forward into the '90s (after a brief stop in the '80s), and Finn 
(now played by Ethan Hawke), despondent over a strange hot-and-cold 
relationship with the elusive Estella (Gwyneth Paltrow), receives quite 
a bit of money from an unknown benefactor; it's enough cash to send him 
to New York to focus on a career in art. There, Finn seems to gain 
everything he could ever want -- wealth, prestige and a high place in 
the glamorous art world. When Estella resurfaces -- albeit with an aloof 
fiancé (Hank Azaria) -- Finn also sees the chance to renew their mutual 
attraction. But she's not the only ghost from Finn's past that's going 
to be paying him a visit. 
Comparisons with the afore-mentioned "Romeo + Juliet" seem inevitable 
since these films are the only ones in recent memory to plop classic 
drama into a current setting. "Great Expectations" is a much better 
venture, though, because it treats its source with even-handed respect, 
where "Romeo" was never quite sure whether to be a spoof, a homage or 
both. The movie is a visual banquet thanks to Emmanuel Lubezki's sexy 
cinematography; notably, he captures a revisited fountain kiss between 
the two leads with a luscious, erotic charge that's steamier than the 
film's (surprisingly muted) love scenes. The eclectic rock soundtrack 
compliments the on-screen action beautifully, especially new songs by 
Tori Amos, Mono and Duncan Sheik. 
Acting credits are first-rate, often hiding the screenplay's occasional 
slip-ups. Hawke is sincere and solid as a leading man (something we also 
learned from "Gattaca"), and his Finn is quite a likeable guy. Paltrow's 
Estella, on the other hand, is rather underdeveloped. While the actress 
is at her icily seductive best, we're not told very much about her 
character, and as a result, it's often hard to understand why Finn would 
appreciate her beyond a physical level (but, oh, *what* a physical 
level); sometimes, we root for Finn although we don't quite understand 
why she's fueling his fire. Robert De Niro is nice and sophisticated in 
the benevolent kind of role he rarely gets to play; on the other end of 
the acting spectrum is Bancroft, a macabre, throaty delight who mambos 
and sucks down cigarettes with an eerie enthusiasm that would make Norma 
Desmond jealous. 
Alfonso Cuaron's visually elegant direction helps to distract from the 
dry moments that pop up more frequently around the movie's climax. 
Another problem is predictability; you can guess your way through the 
plot even if you aren't familiar with the story. Despite its script 
flaws, though, "Great Expectations" is undeniably romantic without being 
corny or gloppy. And frankly, it's nice to see a film that embraces 
softened sensuality other than explicit sexuality. Perhaps that 
renovated release date, awfully close to Valentine's Day, will end up 
helping "Great Expectations"' seemingly average box office chances after 
all. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for No Looking Back (1998)
NO LOOKING BACK
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The movie takes place in a cold, grey, working-class New York town, 
beautifully photographed (especially in the opening sequence, set to 
Sheryl Crow's "Home") by Frank Prinzi. Claudia (Lauren Holly) has a 
simple life that seems to suit her well -- she spends days waiting 
tables at a local greasy spoon and nights with her live-in boyfriend 
Michael (rocker Jon Bon Jovi). But Claudia's ex Charlie (Burns), who 
upped and left her with a broken heart some time ago, suddenly 
resurfaces with hopes to pick up where they left off. It certainly 
doesn't help that Charlie and Michael were once best friends, and that 
the former's presence awakens an urge in Claudia to realize her dreams 
and follow them -- even if they include neither man. 
While Burns the director and actor are fine, Burns the screenwriter is 
to blame for the movie's lack of ignition. Even though some of the 
dialogue is vintage Burns, No Looking Back truly goes nowhere; watching 
it is like listening to a piano player strike the same key over and over 
again. The skinny stories of "The Brothers McMullen" and "She's the One" 
look like "L.A. Confidential" by comparison. With the possible exception 
of Charlie (who's a regular S.O.B.), none of these characters are very 
interesting, so it's hard to get deeply involved in Claudia's dilemma, 
and we really need to for the movie to work. And at a slim 96 minutes, 
the movie feels too long, probably due to that distinct lack of 
involvement and the umpteen musical montages that interrupt the film 
every five minutes or so. 
"No Looking Back" is, at the very least, an admirable performance piece. 
Holly gives a quiet, realistic spark to her first lead role; she is the 
truly is the "babe" that the entire cast always seems to refer to her 
as. Burns, who's cast himself as likeable cads in his other two films, 
shows range with the charmingly egotistic Charlie. Blythe Danner and 
"Spin City" co-stars Connie Britton and Jennifer Esposito do good work 
in various supporting parts. But perhaps most surprising of all is Bon 
Jovi, who has an acting career ahead of him if the music gig ever falls 
through. Speaking of which, his latest album is titled "Destination 
Anywhere," and anywhere is a better destination than the wasteland that 
"No Looking Back" finally occupies.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
BULWORTH
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Beatty plays Jay Billington Bulworth, an incumbent California senator 
who finds himself fed up with the glaring falsehoods of his personal and 
professional life -- his political agenda is full of empty promises, his 
marriage is a sham and his re-election TV spots are so phony that they 
move him to tears. Before hitting the weekend campaign trail through 
South Central L.A., Bulworth secretly makes his teenage daughter the 
sole beneficiary of a $10 million life insurance policy and orders a hit 
on himself to be carried out sometime within the several-day time frame. 
But the knowledge that he doesn't have much longer to live allows him, 
for once, to tell it like it is free of consequence. Bulworth finally 
has a reason to live, yet he could die at any given moment. 
Although the hitman storyline acts as a plot catalyst and even throws a 
little intrigue into "Bulworth"'s ripe comedic agenda, it ends up 
largely distracting, mostly due to a related, uninspired twist that pops 
out of nowhere late in the film. Come to think of it, "Bulworth"'s whole 
last quarter could use a little touch-up, since it is here where quite a 
strong movie begins to encounter its share of problems. In particular, 
the African-American characters are underdeveloped, and Bulworth's 
interaction with them in the film's final passages is rather hazy. The 
ending -- especially the sermonizing last scene where "Bulworth"'s 
message is explicitly spelled out for the audience -- has a good chance 
at leaving a bad taste in many viewer's mouths. 
But because Beatty is on the screen during these troubled chapters, 
"Bulworth" is all the more hard to discredit. He gives an electrifying 
performance, maintaining dignity and strength even when Bulworth crudely 
raps his exchanges with a CNN interviewer or giddily searches for his 
favorite expletives in the record collection of an urban nightclub; 
Beatty never turns Jay Bulworth into the walking punchline that he very 
easily could have been. Gorgeous Halle Berry fares very well in an 
ambiguous supporting role as a homegirl whose growing loyalty to the 
senator might lead to something more, but Oliver Platt steals scenes 
from everyone -- except Beatty, who even steals scenes from himself -- 
as Bulworth's chronically distressed aide. 
So while "Bulworth" may grow uneven as it quickly heads toward its iffy 
destination, the trip there is assuredly rewarding, mixing mirth and 
morals in the flawless way that eventually (and sadly) eludes the 
screenplay. Among the fun to be had is a number of crowd-pleasing scenes 
where the game as ever Beatty raps the truth, a gag that threatens to 
both grow old and grate but surprisingly does neither. I'm sorta partial 
to the movie's first big production number, set at a large political 
rally, but a brief luncheon with Hollywood's elite also hits the 
bullseye. There, Beatty criticizes the gathered filmmakers for churning 
out large doses of "crap." Were "Bulworth" a lesser movie, it would be 
guilty of hypocrisy. But thankfully, it isn't.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
THE WATERBOY
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
So if these raucous antics will remind audiences of vintage Sandler, 
it's a pity that the star himself doesn't make it to the endzone. The 
crude comic is at his best when he's rough and abrasive, qualities that 
made his turn in "Gilmore" a vulgar delight; his "Waterboy" role, a 
bayou man-child named Bobby Boucher and pronounced Bobby Boo_shay_, is 
naive, soft-spoken and genuinely sweet. What's worse, the movie can't 
seem to make up its mind whether he should be laughed at or felt sorry 
for. Bobby's not the kind of character you'd care to kick while he's 
down. 
Thank goodness for some genuinely funny supporting actors, or "The 
Waterboy" would have drowned fast. Kathy Bates, a farce MVP based on her 
stellar work here, is a delight as Bobby's no-nonsense mama, whether 
she's whipping up an extravagant snake dinner (complete with an apple in 
its mouth) or constantly referring to all influences in the world 
outside their swamp-shack home as "the debil" - even Dick Clark. Henry 
Winkler also racks up a hefty laugh quotient as the coach of the Mud 
Dogs, a low-rent college football team on a seemingly non-stop losing 
streak. 
Coach recruits Bobby as the Dogs' "water distribution engineer" after 
he's fired from doing the same job for the University of Louisiana's 
oft-winning Cougars. It is then when Bobby reveals a bang-up talent for 
tackling; imagining his opponents are the assorted hecklers and jerks 
who have taunted him all his life is all he needs to flaunt his on-field 
prowess. The plot mechanics are painfully obvious from there, but 
Sandler and Tim Herlihy's screenplay sometimes coats them with a 
deliciously naughty sheen. What they insert into the climactic, 
slow-motion victory montage is a base keeper. It has to do with pierced 
nipples. 
The one-joke "Waterboy" almost falters under the same sloppy sentiment 
that crippled "The Wedding Singer," but the amusing combination of 
throwaway lines and outlandish sight gags may prove that Sandler's more 
clever than his creative detractors might claim. That "Happy Gilmore" 
and this diversion are career highs in a career that also lays claim to 
the dreadful "Billy Madison" and "Airheads" might not be saying much, 
but maybe it's not without payoff to hope that Sandler ventures back to 
the recreational arena for his next funny flick. Badminton, anyone?

Title
Review for Dead Man on Campus (1998)
DEAD MAN ON CAMPUS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The movie spins its story around a widely-known urban legend of sorts -- 
should your roommate kill himself during the semester, you'll get 
automatic straight-As for the grief and trauma. This "dead man's clause" 
(as it's called here) is spelled out in the charter -- yeah, right -- of 
the prestigious Daleman University, and it becomes the only way for 
mismatched freshmen dormies Josh (Tom Everett Scott), a diligent 
straight-arrow on scholarship, and Cooper (Mark-Paul Gosselaar), a 
blue-blooded, careless party boy, to stay in school once the former is 
lead astray by the latter. They begin a campus-wide search for the most 
suicidal person at Daleman, planning to move him in and push him over 
the edge as soon as possible. You know, so his death won't entirely be 
in vain.
"Dead Man" takes about half of its 92-minute running time before Josh 
and Cooper narrow their focus to a trio of fragile students and start 
the auditioning process. In a lesser film, waiting around for this to 
happen might have been painful postponement, but Scott and Gosselaar 
turn their typical odd couple pairing into something special for the 
stretch. Scott, whose ultra-charismatic work in "That Thing You Do!" is 
still one of this decade's most engaging debuts, is a joy to watch, 
gleaming with appeal in every scene. On the other hand, "Dead Man on 
Campus" could very well be Gosselaar's breakthrough. Here, he proves his 
acting chops go beyond his "Saved by the Bell" upbringing, and has a lot 
of fun with the debonair, jaunty Cooper. Love how he uses a martini 
shaker as a subtle comedic prop.
That's not to say the set-up couldn't have been prodded along at a 
faster clip, but, thanks to the antics of this harried pair, it is quite 
amusing. The following passages are even better, largely because of the 
potentially self-destructive candidates whom Josh and Cooper get to know 
and hate. Each one is a basket case in their own right, but newcomer 
Lochlyn Munro's perpetually-horny frat boy Cliff is easily the best -- 
and the scariest -- of the bunch. Munro's work here is one of those 
rare, everything-and-the-kitchen-sink performances that never grates, 
gets tired or works against him; his couch-humping scene and reaction 
when a lady friend catches her hair on fire are coarse delights, 
probably worth the price of admission alone.
The often pitch-black humor unfortunately gives way to a too-pat finale 
that cries out for a fiendish rewrite; it's nice, but niceness is one 
area this movie should have steered clear of. A romantic subplot between 
Josh and a pretty coed (Poppy Montgomery) provides the film with one of 
its most memorable moments -- repeated dialogue when Scott returns from 
an all-night bedroom romp -- but never really goes anywhere despite the 
two actors' sweet chemistry. Yet even miscellaneous imperfection is 
forgivable when the movie in question provides a good time, and such is 
the silly case here. "Dead Man on Campus" is by no means a classic or 
even remotely classy, but as crude little college flicks go, it pulls a 
solid grade-point-average without committing many crimes.

Title
Review for Glimmer Man, The (1996)
Warner Bros. / 1:32 / 1996 / R (violence, gore, language, Steven Seagal, 
corpse nudity)
Cast: Steven Seagal; Keenan Ivory Wayans; Brian Cox; Bob Gunton; Michelle 
Johnson; John Jackson; Stephen Tobolowsky
Director: John Gray 
Screenplay: Kevin Brodbin 
Steven Seagal's last few movies have actually bore the distinction of being 
not too bad, with the exception of his 1994 botched directorial debut, "On 
Deadly Ground." Both "Under Siege" movies were, I suppose, mildly amusing, 
and his brief turn in last spring's "Executive Decision" was actually -- 
gasp! -- something of a welcome. (That could be because he was killed off so 
quickly.) But whoever he's recently pleased will be unhappy now, because 
"The Glimmer Man," Seagal's latest action flick, is an ugly return to form 
for the star, a horrid invoking of nearly every cop movie cliche that 
results in one of the dumbest films of the year. 
Seagal plays Jack Cole, a governmental special operative-turned-Buddhist 
homicide detective. Cole dons prayer beads and silk jackets, chants, speaks 
Chinese and refuses to engage in combat unless he's goaded -- and because 
people go to a Steven Seagal movie to see the him mop the floor with 
assorted baddies, it's a safe bet that he will be provoked plenty of times 
before "The Glimmer Man" is over. 
Cole is on a case to catch the mysterious killer known as "The Family Man" 
(Stephen Tobolowsky), called thus due to his penchant for murdering Catholic 
households through crucifixion. He is reluctantly teamed up in his 
investigation with a partner by the name of Jim Campbell (Keenan Ivory 
Wayans). It's the first time Seagal is allowed a sidekick, and maybe the 
last. The faux-comedic banter between the two covers cheap, juvenile 
territory -- Campbell tries to mask his sad tears as he views
"Casablanca" with his new pal. He watches in amazement as Cole dispatches a 
couple villains with a credit card (don't ask). And as if all this weren't 
enough, Cole introduces Campbell to a Chinese allergy cure ... which turns 
out to be powdered deer penis! Oh, please stop, guys! My sides are hurting, 
I'm laughing so hard! 
Still, however lame the buddy-buddy gags are in "The Glimmer Man," the plot 
is always one step worse. What starts out in shades of "Seven" ends up 
veering off in a strange direction after Cole becomes the  investigation's 
prime suspect when his ex-wife falls victim to "The Family Man." All of a 
sudden, the movie's about powerful political figures -- one of whom is 
Cole's old boss (Brian Cox) -- who are trying to pull off a smuggled 
chemical weapons deal involving the Russian mob. This, of course, after a 
ludicrous scene where Seagal claims a nude female corpse on an autopsy table 
is from said country -- and then cuts open her breast and pulls out the 
implant to prove so. 
By the way, this movie is called "The Glimmer Man" because Seagal's 
character is allegedly so skilled at sudden death that you only catch a 
"glimmer" of him before he kills you. Of course, I'm praying the title takes 
on a double meaning, as "The Glimmer Man" should hopefully run through 
theaters faster than diahrea. 
Š 1996 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Playing God (1997)
Touchstone / 1:33 / 1997 / R 
Cast: David Duchovny; Timothy Hutton; Angelina Jolie; Michael Masse; 
Peter Stormare; Gary Dourdan; John Hawkes 
Director: Andy Wilson 
Screenplay: Mark Haskell Smith 
A weak star vehicle for an otherwise strong star, "Playing God" will 
probably spend several weeks competing in the autumn box office before 
being remembered only as David Duchovny's iffy first lead in a motion 
picture. It's a bloody good thing he's got the likely sting-erasing 
"X-Files" film slated for release this upcoming summer, because "Playing 
God" is as frivolous and forgettable as movies come. 
Duchovny plays Eugene Sands, a pill-popping Los Angeles surgeon who 
loses his licence after operating on a patient while high on 
amphetamines. After flaunting his medical valor on a dying bar patron, 
he attracts the attention of violent crime boss Raymond Blossom (Timothy 
Hutton), a bleached blonde bad boy with a decidedly non-bad boy name. 
The two reach an agreement -- Eugene will be sated financially (and 
habitually) in turn for providing his services as a "gunshot doctor" for
Raymond, treating his wounded associates when a hospital stay would be 
too risky. But Eugene takes some risks of his own when he become's 
enamored with his new employer's girlfriend Claire (Angelina Jolie). 
Even though most post-"Pulp Fiction" 1990s crime thrillers are hip to a 
fault, they can still attain memorable levels by at least being superior 
in flash and fashion. The surprising thing about "Playing God" is how it 
never seems to try to achieve much in either of those departments -- 
it's empty in both style and substance. Not only is the story totally 
predictable and cliched, but so are the devices through which it's told. 
"Playing God" utilizes such overworked genre staples as slow-motion and
hard-boiled narration ("On the way home tonight, I will not get high," 
laments Eugene about trying to end his drug problem). 
Because "Playing God" often alternates unsuccessfully between the 
serious and the silly, you're left wishing it would have been explicitly 
one or the other. The dramatic scenes don't work because the movie fails 
to deal with Eugene's habit in a satisfying way -- it's a plot device -- 
and ends up offering little in the way of a resolution. The funny stuff 
sometimes gels better (including a pointless episode where Duchovny 
hangs out with the crowd at a redneck country bar), but ultimately, 
"Playing God" is as campy as an episode of the Adam West "Batman" series 
-- and just about as compelling, too. 
The performers are what save the show from being a total wash-out, 
though. Duchovny demonstrates the charisma and canny sex appeal that 
serve him so well on "The X-Files." Hutton, one of the most underrated 
-- and underused -- actors working today, has a considerable amount of 
fun as the escalatingly psychotic villain. Jolie, the daughter of Jon 
Voight, serves frustratingly little purpose other than to get the two 
men fighting, but sports a seductive, pleasant screen presence anyway. 
"Playing God" isn't distinguished in the least, but that shortcoming is 
to be expected when a movie sets out on the wrong foot from virtually 
the first frame on. Not much else can be said for a serio-comedy that 
has you chuckling when you're not supposed to and groaning when you are. 
"Playing God" isn't awful by most means, but it's not at all special, 
either. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Columbia / 1:46 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, thematic material)
Cast: Michelle Pfeiffer; Treat Williams; Jonathan Jackson; Ryan
Merriman; Whoopi Goldberg; John Kapelos; Alexa Vega; Lucinda Jenney;
Brenda Strong; Cory Buck; Michael McElroy
Director: Ulu Grosbard
Screenplay: Steven Schiff
The meaning behind the mysterious title of "The Deep End of the Ocean" -
which remains unexplained even as the closing credits crawl up the
screen - may have something to do with the nearly bottomless mass of
troubled waters it covers. There's no bridge to cross over them here;
the movie immerses you directly into every parent's worst nightmare
within minutes of its opening. The result is an intriguing exploration
of familial bonds that, even in its missteps, avoids the manipulative,
tear-jerking techniques that would seem to come with the territory.
Credit restrained work by director Ulu Grosbard, screenwriter Steven
Schiff and their cast for the blessed idiosyncrasy.
This adaptation of the best-selling, hot-button novel by Jacqueline
Mitchard (also Oprah Winfrey's first book club selection) wisely casts
Michelle Pfeiffer in the lead role, a happy suburban Wisconsin mom who
drags her three young kids to a high school reunion - and loses track of
the middle child, a three-year-old boy, somewhere in the thick crowds of
the hotel lobby. He vanishes without a trace, much like the premise of a
1983 drama called "Without a Trace," leaving her and her husband (Treat
Williams) crushed with blame and grief. A helpful, matter-of-fact
detective (Whoopi Goldberg) aids them, but to no avail.
Nine years, countless tears and a move to Chicago later, a neighborhood
kid (Ryan Merriman) shows up on their doorstep offering to mow the lawn,
and Pfeiffer's maternal and/or gut feelings lead her to believe he's her
long-lost child. Whether that's true or not will have to be divulged by
watching the actual film or its coming attraction, which inappropriately
spills those beans as well as a few others. A surprise not given away
within those very detailed two-and-a-half-minutes, however, is that
"Deep End" goes long on its wrenching set-up, meaning that said plot
revelation doesn't occur until the movie's latter half. That's great for
developmental purposes.
Audiences spend a precious chunk of the running time submerged in
Pfeiffer's weeping and teeth-gnashing histrionics (Williams gets to do a
little lamenting as well), but none of it feels forced, staged or fueled
by a vain quest for an Oscar nomination - one of the biggest compliments
you can pay a film like this. If Pfeiffer's awesome portrayal of
emotional devastation is the key to "Deep End"'s success - and, very
likely, among her best work ever - then co-star Jonathan Jackson rates a
close second on the asset scale. Jackson, an Emmy-winner for his work on
"General Hospital," plays the older version of her eldest son, and
dignifies a rebellious teen-cliche in doing so.
To trump Pfeiffer and Jackson is not to take away from two other
noteworthy turns, nor does it suggest that performances are the only
thing going for "Deep End" - though they do provide a fine selling
point. Merriman, occasionally seen on the NBC series "The Pretender,"
conveys conflicted conscience at a remarkably early age, while Williams
acquits himself memorably in a role destined to be overlooked next to
his co-star's showier part. A lesser film might use this collective
acting showcase as its sole claim to justify cinematic treatment for a
story that sounds very TV-movie-ish, but rarely are TV-movies so
balanced in their portrayal of character and crisis.
Well, for a good, long while at least. The dynamite first hour gives way
to a problematic lead-up to a problematic conclusion, where resolutions
are too pat and dealings with the dilemma's flip side are shaky at best
- not to mention the existence of a _huge_ plot convenience that you
must accept in order for the movie to click. That last weakness can be
easily overlooked on the merits of the film's strong build-up alone, but
diminishing "The Deep End of the Ocean"'s powerful perspective is how it
fully details the early goings-on and moves through later passages like
an abridged Cliffs Notes summary. Final cut-tamperings have been
rumored, which would seem to be the case.
Still, it's difficult to come down very hard on a film that accomplishes
most of what it sets out to do, and even more so one that provides a
plethora of perfect small moments along the way: Pfeiffer breaking down
over Christmas presents that will never be opened, Jackson providing an
old stuffed animal as a silent peace offering, Merriman bonding with his
potential parents through a Greek folkdance. Missteps may be amassed as
"The Deep End of the Ocean" nears its hopeful whimper of a final scene,
but it's too late - lingering in the memory already are striking imagery
and some very intriguing food for thought.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Maybe another 200 cigarettes would have helped; coughing would be
better than some of this dialogue." -Roger Ebert on "200 Cigarettes"

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
Rating: * (out of ****)
MGM / 1:33 / 1999 / R (language, violence, fleeting nudity, drug use)
Cast: Claire Danes; Giovanni Ribisi; Omar Epps; Josh Brolin; Dennis
Farina; Richard Jenkins; Steve Harris; Michael Lerner
Director: Scott Silver
Screenplay: Stephen T. Kay; Scott Silver; Kate Lanier
There have been Merchant-Ivory costume dramas with more of a pulse than
"The Mod Squad," a self-consciously "hip" cinematic rendering of the old
TV series still looked upon fondly by so many baby-boomers. Well, said
"Squad" certainly won't be a pleasant viewing experience for them or
anybody else, maybe even the teen target audience the movie has been
geared towards. A contemporary take on this decidedly '70s show doesn't
exactly seem unwarranted, but one wonders if the mold it accumulated
while waiting on the shelf didn't transform into a full-blown case of
botulism.
How curious that the film begins by defining both mod and squad,
insisting that the latter is a group of people working together and then
contradicting this definition by keeping its titular trio apart for a
sizeable chunk of the running time. They are Julie, Pete and Linc,
reformed delinquents working undercover for the LAPD (exposition put out
of the way so fast that you're likely to be lost from the opening
moments on), and they are respectively played by Claire Danes, Giovanni
Ribisi and Omar Epps, talented actors each deserving of better than
this.
Their plight involves standard cop-corruption stuff, as our would-be
protagonists catch wind of an internal cover-up after their superior
(reliable Dennis Farina, one of the best things here and gone so
quickly) gets killed and framed for drug trafficking. They pout a lot
and eventually get cracking to expose this convoluted conspiracy using
surveillance tactics that would impress the Hardy boys and Linda Tripp
but few others. When you're supposed to be asking, "What's going to
happen next?", you'll instead entertain thoughts like "Who are these
people and why should I care?" or "Aren't thrillers supposed to contain
thrills?"
Not that Danes, Epps and Ribisi don't give it a shot. Danes can do the
troubled teen thing in her sleep, as evidenced by "My So-Called Life,"
but she's saddled with a mysterious-boyfriend (Josh Brolin) subplot so
see-through you begin to seriously question her so-called intelligence.
Ditto for Ribisi's ("Saving Private Ryan") looney loose cannon, though
at least he performs with a wild-and-crazy vigor that occasionally
demands attention. But Epps - poor Epps. Epps ("Higher Learning") is so
short-changed he's reduced to literally waiting around for a bad guy to
chase him.
All this sloppiness can be attributed to the screenwriters, one of whom,
Scott Silver, is also the director. They must think that if they dress
up their stupid story in such spiffy trappings (the look of the film is
really quite impressive), it'll somehow pay off, but this "Mod Squad"
plods anyway. Characters are non-existent; present are just some
good-looking young things modeling cool Levis and cooler attitudes. Plot
hardly escapes confusing convention. And the one genre element you'd
think would be show up in generous portions - a few nifty explosions,
some fights, any kind of action whatsoever - only rarely makes it to
this dull gabfest.
All those quick to put down last month's inept but serviceable "My
Favorite Martian" update need to take a step back. Here's a
small-to-big-screen translation that really should've stayed in its
former incarnation, "Mod" or not.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"It presents as comedy things that are not amusing. If you think this
movie is funny, that tells me things about you I don't want to know."
-Roger Ebert on "Very Bad Things"

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)

CAN'T HARDLY WAIT
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Most of the action takes place at a big bash to celebrate Huntington High
School's graduation day. Attending the beer- and sex-soaked festivities
are our six main teenagers -- requisite nice guy Preston (Ethan Embry),
prom queen Amanda (Jennifer Love Hewitt), star jock Mike (Peter
Facinelli), acerbic wit Denise (Lauren Ambrose), white "homeboy" Kenny
(Seth Green) and unpopular brainiac William (Charlie Korsmo). Kenny,
hoping to hook up with a girl and lose his virginity, ends up bonding with
Denise, who's present out of emotional support for Preston, who wants tell
Amanda of his longtime crush on her. Amanda has just broken up with Mike,
who's been tormenting William, who will seek revenge against Mike before
the night is over. Did you get all that? 
Actually, the gossipy character interaction that composes "Can't Hardly
Wait"'s various story threads ring true for the most part. (Gosh, I was
there only two years ago!) It's within the characters themselves where the
movie begins to falter. That they're walking, talking stereotypes really
doesn't matter; this seems like a deliberate effort on the part of
co-directors and -writers Harry Elfont and Deborah Kaplan to emanate such
"classics" as "The Breakfast Club." But they fail to make their entire
contemporary cross-section of young people completely interesting. Both
Michael and William are crudely rendered, and their conflict, particularly
how it ends, is pretty revolting. The Preston-Amanda romance (or lack
thereof) is supposed to be Wait's main event, but it's hard to care much
about either person. 
Preston is solely defined by his affection for Amanda, while, in turn, all
she does throughout the film is mope and pout. The would-be relationship
somehow manages to click despite the strange, hindering oversight that
we're never allowed to see why she's so special to him. This is not
because we root for Preston, but because we root for Ethan Embry, whose
endearing, natural and occasionally goofy charm makes up for his
alter-ego's lack of distinction. Embry ("That Thing You Do!") does a fine
job of getting the audience to identify with the anxiety, longing,
hesitancy and heartbreak of first love; if only his Preston were fully
fleshed-out, he'd be worth following into a "Can't Hardly Wait" spin-off
feature. 
On the other hand, Denise and Kenny already are; when the film eventually
breaks up into several superimposing stories, it is only theirs that
crackles with the completely realized good-time vibe that Elfont and
Kaplan were probably going for -- and that's very likely because Lauren
Ambrose and Seth Green have a great deal of fun bringing to life the most
comedically vibrant party patrons here. So, while the material is
distinctly uneven, these winning performers, their occasionally winning
characters and smattering of winning moments make the whole package not
much of a chore to endure. "Can't Hardly Wait" is a decent attempt to make
a film that definitively encapsulates a decade's worth of teen fads and
attitudes. It's just too bad the far more successful "Clueless" beat it to
the punch three summers ago.

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
U.S. MARSHALS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
As the unstoppable, cocksure Chief Deputy U.S. Marshal Sam Gerard, Tommy Lee 
Jones reprises the his role from the first movie. This time around, Gerard and 
his team of tagalongs (including Joe Pantoliano and Latanya Richardson) are on 
the trail of a completely different fugitive -- a mysterious ex-Marine Special 
Forces and -CIA operative named Sheridan (Wesley Snipes), on the run after 
somebody frames him for the murders of two Secret Service attaches who were 
trying to crack a Chinese spy ring within the United Nations. Also on Gerard's 
side as he trails Sheridan from the muddy banks of the Ohio River to the chaotic 
streets of New York City is smug, smart Federal Agent John Royce (Robert Downey, 
Jr.). Gerard doesn't completely trust Royce, and possibly for good reason. 
Many of "U.S. Marshals"' problems lie within the character of Sheridan -- even 
Snipes' noble demeanor can't hide the fact that he's horribly developed. We 
cared about Harrison Ford's "Fugitive" everyman because we believed in and 
identified with him. Ford had to use instinct, medical know-how and even blind 
luck to uncover the conspiracy against him; he was, quite simply, no action 
hero. Snipes, on the other hand, is -- thanks to his assassin background, he's a 
fighter, a weapons expert and a pro with surveillance equipment. It's just no 
fun rooting for him. That gives a lot of the later action sequences an empty, 
lifeless feel, however well-staged they may be. Compared to "The Fugitive"'s 
richly satisfying four-course dinner, "U.S. Marshals" is half-eaten, day-old, 
microwaved leftovers. 
At least Jones' Gerard is still fascinating. His presence deems the film 
watchable even in its many weak passages. Take, for example, the completely 
unnecessary opening sequence that only serves as a way to get cat and mouse 
acquainted down the road. Here, Gerard and company, hidden under various 
disguises, stakeout the home of a wanted criminal who, when caught, will be put 
on the same prisoner transport plane as Sheridan. It's useless stuff that could 
have made the two-and-a-quarter hours "Marshals" tighter by being cut, but Jones 
is a droll delight to watch in any situation. And that prisoner transport plane 
ride, by the way, is the movie's best visceral asset. Director Stuart Baird 
knows a thing or two about in-flight tension -- his 1996 thriller "Executive 
Decision" was an unjustly underrated sweat-popper. 
One of the smaller crimes "U.S. Marshals" commits is casting luminous French 
actress Irene Jacob ("Red") in a throwaway role as Sheridan's Starbucks waitress 
girlfriend, but misusing time and talent is something the movie does best. To 
its middling credit, "U.S. Marshals" provides a few decent bangs for the buck, 
an occasionally witty one-liner and a chance for Jones to strut his 
Oscar-winning stuff all over again, but that's about it. A lot of the film is 
spent watching boring people do boring things -- it's too dull to be much fun. 
Don't go expecting another "Fugitive" or you'll find that "U.S. Marshals" is 
decidedly unarresting. 

Title
Review for Smile Like Yours, A (1997)
Paramount / 1:39 / 1997 / R (language, sex-related material) 
Cast: Greg Kinnear; Lauren Holly; Joan Cusack; Jay Thomas; Jillian
Hennessy; Christopher McDonald; Shirley MacLaine 
Director: Keith Samples 
Screenplay: Kevin Meyer; Keith Samples 
        Romantic comedies centering around fertility aren't made very often,
and it's easy to see why. Gene Wilder's "Funny About Love" was
absolutely excruciating to watch. And anybody remember the Shelly
Long-Corbin Bernsen sperm bank vehicle "Frozen Assets"? You likely
answered in the negative, which proves my point exactly. Keith Samples'
"A Smile Like Yours" isn't a terrible movie, but it's also not a good
one, proving this rarely-filmed subgenre can't do much except shoot
blanks. 
        "A Smile Like Yours" centers around photogenic San Francisco yuppie
couple Danny and Jennifer Robertson (Greg Kinnear and Lauren Holly);
he's a successful building contractor, she's the successful entrepreneur
of an aromatherapy shop. Jennifer's latest concoction is a kind of 
aphrodisiac, called "Seventh Scent," that she's always "testing" on her
husband in extremely inconvenient places (i.e., the freight elevator at
his work). But little does Danny know that she's really using her new
scent for another purpose -- she's also trying to get pregnant, but
their ever-so-frequent intercourse sessions yield little but stiff
joints. 
        After getting it on for the umpteenth time -- and still getting her
period shortly thereafter -- Jennifer has herself checked for
infertility. The doc assures her she's fine. So, she sneaks a semen
sample from Danny (and, for some reason, hides it in their tub of
Country Crock) and has that analyzed at the clinic. Turns out he's got
what they call "lazy swimmers," a condition that his frequent trips to
the Masturbatorium ("You might wanna check out that new video --
'Romancing the Bone,'" taunts the attending specialist) and her
just-as-frequent in-vitro fertilization try to alleviate. 
        There's not much new territory covered in "A Smile Like Yours," but the
movie's lack of originality could have been remedied if the material was
juicy, funny or entertaining. But it's rarely any one of those three,
and thus the film plays out like "Look Who's Talking" with a truckload
of jack-off jokes in place of the gabby newborn. Occasionally, there's a
good scene you'll catch yourself smiling at -- and many of them involve
the Robertson's trips to the clinic and Danny's dealings with a surly
nurse -- but your facial expression fades almost as quickly as it got
there. 
        "A Smile Like Yours" exhibits disaster warnings early on. It's not a
good sign when the main characters visit a kareoke bar and a significant
portion of screen time is devoted to the performances of others, nor
does it bode well that musical montages are employed numerously. The
plot veers off in a silly dramatic direction when it's got about a
half-hour to go, and involves such unbelievably gooey situations as
Danny's explained need to have Jennifer present in the Masturbatorium
while he's making his "deposit." And the ending is an unsatisfyingly
pat, fast resolution that makes a mockery of its own premise. 
        As far as the characters go, Kinnear's Danny is imbued with the star's
effortless charm, but Holly's Jennifer comes across as a whiny wimp.
It's baffling, then, that the subplot devoted to him -- he is tempted by
his "Disclosure"-esque man-eating corporate boss, the only kind of
female overseer that movies seem to use these days -- is far less
interesting than her quest to market her new fragrance along with work
pal/scene-stealer Joan Cusack. But baffle is what "A Smile Like Yours"
appears to do best, placing two appealing stars and a handfull of clever
material in service of a stuffy, synthetic story. 

Title
Review for Feiying gaiwak (1990)
Dimension / 1:28 / 1991/1997 / PG-13 (comic violence, glimpses of nudity)
Players: Jackie Chan; Carol Cheng; Eva Cobo de Garcia; Shoko Ikeda; Alfred 
Brel Sanchez; Jonathan Isgar 
Director: Jackie Chan 
Screenplay: Jackie Chan; Edward Tang 
Two givens for any Jackie Chan import: The star is amiable and the action is 
big. But all the charisma and dynamo in the world couldn't save "Operation 
Condor" from mediocrity. Chan's fourth stateside theatrical release 
(following "Rumble in the Bronx," "Supercop" and "Jackie Chan's First 
Strike") sports a storyline that sinks and stinks where those of his previous 
trio were at least enjoyably silly. When the star isn't kicking enemy butt, 
the film flounders so much that it's not out of the question to hope "Condor" 
meets a quick extinction. 
"Operation Condor," originally released in Hong Kong in 1991 under the title 
"Armor of God II," casts Chan as Jackie (no stretch there), a secret agent 
employed by the United Nations to uncover 240 tons of Nazi gold buried 
somewhere in the Sahara before a group of nasty terrorists get there first. 
Every hero needs a sidekick, and Jackie has three -- a trio of shapely 
lasses, each solely identified by hairstyle and all annoying. None of them 
come even close to rivalling Michelle Yeoh, Chan's "Supercop" sidekick. 
Chan's best U.S. release thus far is arguably "First Strike," an 
affectionate, if not terribly solid, tweaking of James Bond standards. Condor 
starts out on a similar, much more obvious foot, complete with a detached, 
pre-credits action sequence (where Jackie rolls down hills and off a cliff in 
what appears to be a giant hamster ball!) and flashy opening titles. But once 
the head-scratcher of a plot kicks into gear, "Operation Condor" turns into 
something akin to an Indiana Jones adventure only without the bullwhip, 
fedora and fear of snakes -- or the charm, for that matter. Thanks to a story 
that acts as sluggish, uninspired padding between the action scenes, 
"Condor"'s running time doesn't exactly fly by. 
Because Chan pulls acting, directing and co-writing duties, "Condor" holds a 
promise of wall-to-wall fun -- if he's so much fun in front of the camera, 
imagine what he's like behind it. Sure, his physical feats are impressive, 
but the number of biggies is strictly limited. Every good, funny sequence, 
like a hotel room brawl where a towel-clad woman is as effective a weapon as 
either of Chan's appendages, only makes the rest of the movie seem dreadfully 
dull by comparison. Even the climax -- a doozy of a high point in "Strike" 
and "Supercop" -- falters; as powerful fans send Chan and his enemies through 
the air with the greatest of ease, gone is the no-strings-attached riskiness 
of his usual shtick. 
Even if "Operation Condor" flops, there still might be a future for Chan's 
oldies in American -- because studios put up little more than dubbing fees, 
they likely turn a quick profit. But if the trend continues, more care ought 
to be taken in the selection process. Take away the martial arts maestro's 
trademark stuntwork and you've got the makings of a straight-to-video vehicle 
for any given wrestler-cum-actor. "Operation Condor" with Rowdy Roddy Piper, 
anyone? 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
HOME FRIES
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The dark, mischievous tone will therefore jar viewers expecting what 
they've been promised by TV spots and theatrical trailers, but fans of 
films like "Grosse Pointe Blank" should have a terrific time eating up 
the many offbeat pleasures "Home Fries" has to offer. Chief among them 
is seeing Luke Wilson, star of the indie great "Bottle Rocket," finally 
nail a lead role in a major studio picture; other charms include a plum 
role for Catherine O'Hara and a keen screenplay that combines 
disarmingly sweet characters with murder, mayhem and a few helicopter 
chases. 
One such action sequence kicks off the movie, as a chopper navigated by 
two National Guardsmen (Wilson and Jake Busey) ends up scaring a 
middle-aged man to death. Turns out the pilots are the dead guy's 
stepsons, ordered by their domineering mom (O'Hara) to do away with him. 
To give away much else would risk ruining the increasingly surprising 
story, but a later destination worth noting is that Wilson's Dorian 
takes a part-time job at the local Burger-Matic, where he works 
alongside pregnant drive-thru cashier Sally (Barrymore). Sally, of 
course, has a more sinister connection to Dorian than she first 
suspects. 
"Home Fries" eventually rushes towards an uncanny courtship between 
Sally and Dorian, and due to the adorably passive charisma of the 
actors, the sparks don't fly as much as they hover. A lesser movie might 
have run into a problem area there, but this low-key, fast-food romance 
seems perfectly rational in such a warped universe. Only helping matters 
is that Barrymore and Wilson are eternally likeable performers; how they 
turn a Lamaze class interlude into subtle, grin-inducing physical comedy 
without a gag-inducing sap factor is remarkable. 
Though the ending fails to tie up the loose ends of some of the more 
convoluted story threads, "Home Fries" still ranks as an oddball 
delight, one that perhaps seems less askew given that the script was 
penned by "X-Files" producer Vince Gilligan. Credit him for creating an 
atypical combination of person and place that's worth a repeat visit, 
and credit debut director Dean Parisot for handling the material just 
right. Some may arguably carp that these collective efforts have 
produced the textbook definition of a "smallish film," but even so, 
"Home Fries" is still a side order that satisfies on its own.

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
Live / 1:30 / 1997 / R (gore, gore, gore, gore, gore, language)
Cast: Tammy Lauren; Andrew Divoff; Robert Englund; Tony Todd; Wendy 
Benson; Tony Crane; Jenny O'Hara; Kane Hodder 
Director: Robert Kurtzman 
Screenplay: Peter Atkins 
The horror ... the horror. The horror of a horror film with no sense of 
horror. That statement would perfectly sum up "Wishmaster" were it not 
for one thing -- the movie's so laughably ludicrous that sitting through 
it is almost no chore at all. Don't go expecting legitimate thrills and 
chills, or you'll be quite disappointed; the words "Wes Craven Presents" 
have been plopped over the title in an attempt to get people buzzing 
about this hammy howler. The "Scream" director only serves as an 
executive producer here, but his reputation should remain intact after 
"Wishmaster" flops -- Craven has "Scream 2" scheduled for release this 
winter. 
"Wishmaster" tells what happens when the gem-imprisoned Djinn (Andrew 
Divoff), sort of like Barbara Eden's evil mutant uncle, gets unwittingly 
released into modern society by a geologist named Alexandra (Tammy 
Lauren). Djinn gets his kicks by manipulating mortals to wish for all 
the usual stuff (everlasting life, vengeance against one's enemies), and 
then turning their requests against them in devious ways. An example: 
Djinn transforms a Structure salesgirl into a mannequin after she 
requests eternal beauty. If he can get three wishes out of Alexandra, 
then an army of Djinns will be released to take over the world. Or 
something like that. 
If "Wishmaster" wasn't so unintentionally hilarious, it'd probably be a 
long, wooden bore. But there are so many scenes, situations and scares 
with the exact opposite effect than intended that the viewing experience 
is packed with many a hearty laugh. The gore is so frequent and macabre 
that it's downright hysterical -- one guy takes a mace in the head, and 
his cranium bears a large indent that'd be completely believable were he 
in a Warner Bros. cartoon. A jewel appraiser asks the Djinn to make him 
rich, so the plane carrying his wealthy mother explodes in take-off. And 
when an Ancient Persian party-thrower wishes for things to kick into 
high gear in the movie's grisly prologue, the guests begin tearing their 
own flesh off! Talk about killing the livelihood. Sheesh. 
In the movie's production notes, the filmmakers guess that Djinn "could 
very well be one of the greatest horror figures of our time." Um, I 
don't think so -- he's not particularly frightening, but he is annoying. 
For some reason, Divoff insists on pronouncing his wannabe-scary lines 
phonetically ("Lis-ten to the mu-sic of their souls, Al-ex-an-dra!"). 
After you laugh and laugh and laugh at Wishmaster, you realize something 
sad -- the ideas here ain't half bad. If Djinn was a truly horrifying 
monster, if we were given a better protagonist than the annoying 
Alexandra, if there was a real story amidst the massive blood-letting, 
"Wishmaster" could have been a success. As it stands, it's strictly for 
bad movie buffs who couldn't get enough involuntary guy-puking from 
"Event Horizon."
Š 1997 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
ONE TRUE THING
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Ellen's very much the child of her father, an esteemed English professor 
named George (William Hurt), and has followed in his footsteps since she 
was a young child. Now, she's a career-driven reporter for "New York" 
magazine, and when she travels to her Pennsylvania hometown to celebrate 
George's birthday, she hangs on every word of his somewhat too-harsh 
criticism of her writing. But Ellen appears to be at a loss when it 
comes to handling the double-whammy that Kate has developed cancer, and 
her dad, too busy with his job, wants her to leave the city life to help 
out. She reluctantly complies, and begins to see her mother in a whole 
different light as a result. 
The story might sound like fodder for a TV-movie-of-the-week, but "One 
True Thing" really couldn't be further removed from mawkish sentiment. 
Director Carl Franklin, taking a break from gritty crime-dramas like 
"One False Move" and "Devil in a Blue Dress," shows admirable restraint 
in his handling of the Guldens' crisis. It would be far too easy to turn 
the film into a scene after scene of button-pushing manipulation, but 
Franklin and screenwriter Karen Croner, adapting Anna Quindlen's novel, 
don't linger over the devastating details of the disease. Instead, their 
concentration is on the bond between parent and child, more specifically 
how little the latter truly knows about the former. 
Of course, the one-two acting punch of Streep and Zellweger only 
enhances Thing's thoughtful, universal focus. Streep could play this 
type of role in her sleep, but that doesn't make her performance any 
less special - you really see her as this strong, admirable maternal 
whirlwind and not some 10-time Oscar nominee who deserves another award 
for her work here. Zellweger plays off Streep's sing-songy tones 
perfectly; her ultimate transformation is a heart-breaking one because 
she makes the loss of this woman she's just beginning to deeply 
understand painfully palpable. A sequence where Ellen grapples with a 
monumental decision while preparing Kate's dinner is an emotional doozy. 
Happy stuff it's not, but neither does "One True Thing" wallow in somber 
unpleasantness. Even with Bette Midler tunes and maudlin piano chords 
dotting the soundtrack, this is one classy tearjerker, gentle and ever 
so undemanding the way it finally reduces you to a state of disquieted 
calm. And though the film might send audiences away questioning the 
manner in which they live their lives and inhabit their relationships, 
it ends on a hopeful, uplifting note, imploring all within earshot to 
cherish those who love you before they're gone forever. As soon as the 
credits hit the screen, there's no doubt that "One True Thing" is the 
run-home-from-the-theatre-and-hug-your-mom movie of the year.

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
DR. DOLITTLE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Murphy's John Dolittle is an esteemed doctor (of course) whose 
relationship with his wife (Kristen Wilson) and daughters (Kyla Pratt 
and Raven-Symone) needs a little work, though much of his recent 
distraction can probably be attributed to the big financial deal he's 
about to sign at the office. Matters are complicated one night when he 
whacks his head during a car crash and is suddenly revisited by his 
childhood ability to communicate with all creatures great and small, 
namely the down-on-luck pooch (voiced by Norm Macdonald) that caused the 
accident and a brazen guinea pig (Chris Rock) belonging to his youngest 
child. There's also a subplot about evil HMOs and a greedy hospital 
colleague ("Bulworth"'s Oliver Platt), but they're largely dispensable. 
Before Dolittle knows it, word of his talent spreads to the entire 
animal kingdom and he's performing marriage counseling on pigeons and 
giving advice to an alcoholic monkey (one of the best bits). 
"Dr. Dolittle" veers off course as it nears its end, when the tone 
abruptly shifts and the film asks us to emote over an ailing tiger 
(Albert Brooks) whose neurotic ramblings, up until then, have provided 
some of the movie's funniest moments. These climactic scenes blatantly 
attempt to tug at the heartstrings, but "Dolittle" is far more 
successful when it masks its moral ("You be who you are, and you love 
who you are") behind the guise of Murphy and his chatty critters. For 
the record, there's nothing wrong with positive messages, and the one 
here is particularly worthwhile, but it clashes with everything else 
when it's forced to the front of the film. Still, that's not as big a 
flaw as it might seem given that A) it's only apparent during "Dr. 
Dolittle"'s last reel, and B) the movie is a pretty irresistible romp 
beforehand. 
Murphy, effective and genuine as a family man, holds his own against his 
furry, feathered co-stars; though they get all the best lines, he plays 
off them good enough to remain the real star of the show. The special 
effects that allow the menagerie to speak and the celebrities who 
provide their voices are a lot of fun as well; while much of what they 
have to say will be appreciated by the youngest audience members, "Dr. 
Dolittle" throws more than a few jokes the way of grown-ups. (A 
conversation between two rats: "If he dies, I don't know what I'll do!" 
"You'll take me outside and eat me!" "Only out of respect.") There are 
even punchlines that kids will guffaw at without really getting. ("Our 
butts hurt," a group of sheep complain to Dolittle.) While nothing 
incredible even as comedies come, the movie does its job and does it 
well, all inside of a running time that barely fills up 90 minutes. If 
laughter is the best medicine, then "Dr. Dolittle" should come in pill 
form.

Title
Review for Replacement Killers, The (1998)
Columbia / 1:28 / 1998 / R (language, violence)
Cast: Chow Yun-Fat; Mira Sorvino; Michael Rooker; Jurgen Prochnow; Carlos 
Gomez; Frank Medrano; Kenneth Tsang; Danny Trejo 
Director: Antoine Fuqua 
Screenplay: Ken Sanzel 
Whether you love or hate "The Replacement Killers," you've got to respect 
it's running time -- at a slim hour-and-28-minutes, the film speeds by 
faster than the ammo discharged from star Chow Yun-Fat's endless supply of 
firearms. Unfortunately, "The Replacement Killers" also boasts more story 
and character holes than he puts in his opponents, a drawback that keeps the 
movie from being both truly enjoyable and involving. It's certainly nothing 
new to find a action movie riddled with flaws, but at least this one has a 
must-see attraction in its leading man -- Yun-Fat, a Hong Kong idol making 
his American debut here, radiates absolute cool. 
He plays John Lee, an assassin with (yes, folks, say it with me) a heart of 
gold. Lee is hired by underworld kingpin Mr. Wei (Kenneth Tsang) to perform 
a hit in L.A. -- Wei's criminal son was killed in self-defense by stateside 
cop Stan Zedkov (Michael Rooker), and Wei would like Lee to shoot Zedkov's 
own seven-year-old in retaliation. Even though Wei will dispatch people to 
murder Lee's family if the job isn't completed, Lee just can't bring himself 
to pull the trigger. He then hooks up with a document-forger named Meg (Mira 
Sorvino), his only hope to get back to his home in time, and together they 
become marked targets from a new pair of professionals dispatched by Wei. 
Director Antoine Fuqua, the man behind Coolio's "Gangsta's Paradise" music 
video, does what he can with Ken Sanzel's paint-by-numbers script; in 
particular, he's got style to spare, and demonstrates it from the first 
scene on. The loud, humdinger action makes up a large part of the movie, 
turning everyday locations like car washes, parking garages and theaters 
into dangerous, violent places (and that last one's quite a doozy). "The 
Replacement Killers" doesn't waste much time between them, and thus is over 
with quickly. The film is a dazzler for the eyes and ears, and that's about 
it. 
Chow Yun-Fat, who learned English for the movie, has an undeniable screen 
presence. He's also a strong actor, and so it's puzzling -- and even 
disappointing -- that John Lee has few scenes where he can project emotional 
depth (could it be that Yun-Fat was still a little too stiff with his 
newly-acquired dialect?). Mira Sorvino offers game support as a sidekick and 
pseudo-romantic interest; she's given more to do than just tagalong, and 
ends up owning the movie's best scene and line ("Are you gonna put a bullet 
in your head now that our positions are reversed?"). The villains, however, 
are too underdeveloped or silly to be much fun, especially the replacement 
killers of the title; when they strut in slo-mo into an airport decked out 
in black leather, greasy hair, facial scars and nasty scowls, you wonder why 
customs doesn't just snatch them up right there. 
While "The Replacement Killers" isn't challenging or even remotely 
thrilling, it sure isn't boring. Terrific visuals, a smooth color palette, a 
handful of strong sequences and the performances of Yun-Fat and Sorvino make 
the movie far from a dull sit. And that super-fast 88 minutes (you could fit 
two showings of this into one of "The Postman," and still have a couple 
seconds for a bathroom stop) earns "The Replacement Killers" a fraction of a 
star alone. The movie is a tiny blessing in disguise -- underneath the 
imperfect trappings lies a film that knows it's just about the ride and 
doesn't throw in any needless padding. When looking for a mild diversion, 
who could ask for anything more? 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
New Line / 1:43 / 1998 / R (violence, language, nudity, muted sex)
Cast: Rufus Sewell; Kiefer Sutherland; Jennifer Connelly; William Hurt; 
Richard O'Brien; Ian Richardson; Colin Friels; Mitchell Butel 
Director: Alex Proyas 
Screenplay: Lem Dobbs; David S. Goyer; Alex Proyas 
What's worse: a movie that glows with unfulfilled promise, or one that 
shows no promise at all? Alex Proyas' "Dark City" falls into the former 
category without a doubt, and it's a shortcoming that should leave its 
viewers with quite a bad aftertaste. But the operative word here is 
"should," especially seeing as how "Dark City" is one of those cinematic 
experiences that sticks with and grows on you. It's still a wildly uneven 
film, full of ham, cheese and more than a few bouts of sporadic silliness, 
but it's got immense style to spare and a screenplay that's quite 
intriguing. I hesitate to call "Dark City" solid, or even really *good,* 
but if ever a two-and-a-half star film bordered so very close to mild 
success, it's this one. 
"Dark City" takes place in, well, a dark city -- a swirling vortex of 
menacing ambiance, kind of like a sinister New York with all of the lights 
turned out. The residents of this place appear to be unaware that it always 
seems to be nighttime, and they move about their surroundings in an oddly 
detached way. Also adding to the province's sky-high weird quotient is an 
underworld group of beings known only as the Strangers. The Strangers are 
death-pale, capable of flying and possess a strange psychic power called 
Tuning -- they can alter physical environment just by focusing on any given 
object or location. 
One random night, a man (Rufus Sewell) wakes up naked in a seedy motel 
bathtub and finds a prostitute stabbed to death in the adjoining bedroom. 
He has no idea who he is, how he got there or what exactly is going on, so 
he flees the scene promptly. The man -- who later learns his name is John 
Murdoch and that he's married to an estranged nightclub singer (Jennifer 
Connelly) -- is put at the top of a wanted list by a determined detective 
(William Hurt). While on the run and trying to uncover answers about his 
seemingly altered state, he discovers that he's a master of Tuning as well, 
and is also targeted by the Strangers and their human lackey (Kiefer 
Sutherland) who likely see Murdoch as a kink in their shady plans. 
"Dark City" doesn't quite get off to a stable start, as it takes some time 
to adjust to the prattling manner in which Proyas introduces his cast of 
warped characters. The funky narrative eventually draws you in; while 
you're waiting, pay attention to the movie's dazzling visual flair, which 
emanates both film noir and science-fiction sensibilities. "Dark City" 
looks fantastic thanks to behind-the-scenes work from production designers 
George Liddle and Patrick Tatopoulos and cinematographer Dariusz Wolski; 
these Oscar-worthy attributes hold up even when the movie degenerates into 
all-out craziness towards its end, as Murdoch battles a plethora of enemies 
that look like they just walked off of the "Hellraiser" set. 
The assembled cast is curious, to say the very least. Sewell (most widely 
seen in "Cold Comfort Farm") fares best in the lead, creating a protagonist 
who's engaging and likeable. You root for him, even though at times you're 
not quite sure what you're rooting for him to do. Luscious bombshell 
Connelly ("Inventing the Abbotts") isn't given much to do, but looks so 
very fine in her pseudo-period duds. While Sutherland overacts with halting 
speech enunciation, Hurt counteracts by deadpanning a little too dull -- 
these guys are interesting, but not very well played out. And as one of the 
more prominent Strangers, Richard O'Brien seems to have found another role 
destined for instant cult success; he played Riff-Raff in 1973's "The Rocky 
Horror Picture Show." 
The middle segments of "Dark City" work fantastically, overcoming some 
opening and closing missteps. For the most part, the film marks a more 
mature, assured effort from Proyas, whose 1994 hit "The Crow" was a 
one-note revenge thriller that captured Brandon Lee's soulful swan song. 
There are some great ideas at work here (for instance, a series of final 
denouements that are actually quite engrossing in their explanation), but 
they're executed in a movie that sometimes just doesn't click. Is "Dark 
City" a great film? No. But does it attempt to be something more than comic 
book-eye candy? Yes, and it almost works. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8MM (EIGHT MILLIMETER)
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Like a recipe assembled from scraps of other dishes, "8mm" is less than 
the sum of its parts, delicious to fans of the dark and brooding though 
they may be. But, oh, does this two-hour-plus ode to unpleasantness make 
good on its engaging creative pairing, while a further boost is given by 
the casting of Nicolas Cage in the lead, one of those progressively 
unhinged roles the Oscar-winner excels at playing. The hot-button 
subject matter - pornography - should determine whether uncertain 
potential viewers will love it or leave it early, though you can 
probably already tell from this description alone if this is your kind 
of movie. 
That Cage stars as a private dick in a film that heavily incorporates 
the adult entertainment industry is worth a small chuckle, but this 
possible in-joke is close to the extent of "8mm"'s humor quotient. Like 
"Seven," the story is played with almost no comic relief, yet another 
cause of probable diminishing audience appreciation. (Then again, that 
didn't stop "Seven" from being a $100 million hit, but that movie only 
fleetingly relied on sexual violence.) Those seeking cheap, explicit 
thrills are better off visiting a seedy video store somewhere, however, 
because Schumacher knows that the unseen is far more terrifying than 
what's in plain view. 
Cage's professional sleuth goes by the name Tom Welles and has just 
accepted a case from the widow (Myra Carter) of a recently deceased and 
immensely wealthy steel tycoon. While going through his private things, 
she located a reel of eight millimeter stock on which a young girl is 
raped and murdered by a creep wearing a leather mask. Yowza. But is it 
an actual snuff film or something feigned to give perverts their 
jollies? And how did it come to be in this rich guy's belongings? Those 
are the questions Welles gets bankrolled to answer, and he starts by 
identifying the alleged victim and tracing her back to her hometown. 
There, he meets her mother (Amy Morton) but not her, and these scenes, 
perfectly handled by Schumacher, are a powerful reminder that every 
missing child is more than just a statistic. This'll have to do - and it 
does - for "8mm"'s emotional content, because Welles' relationship with 
his wife (nice work from Catherine Keener) and his new baby are somewhat 
ill-defined. That flaw hardly matters, though, because "8mm" devotes 
much of its attention on Welles' unfolding, engrossing search for the 
truth, and if you can make it through some of the early scenes without 
the need to exit the theatre, you'll be OK for the long run. 
Without giving away too much, Welles' trail leads him into the seamy 
world of underground sleaze, and needless to say, it isn't a pretty 
place. The seedy ground he covers with a porn clerk (game Joaquin 
Phoenix), his only ally, begins to transform him, though it's no fair to 
say in what ways. Plot twists are guaranteed; some are predictable, some 
are not, and an example of the latter is a disturbing climax (one of 
several) that takes place in a rain-soaked graveyard, complete with 
vivid flashes of lightning. Perhaps Schumacher's gorgeously gaudy 
"Batman" takes prove he isn't one for restraint, but the stylish 
overkill of "8mm" works more often than it doesn't. 
He does, however, treat the whole porn/snuff area with moderation - and 
thankfully so. We're treated only to fleeting glimpses (the worst 
depicts a "nurse" preparing to do something to a "patient" that probably 
isn't covered on his HMO), but we get a strong enough reading of their 
explicit content from Cage's bountiful terrified - but eventually 
desensitized - reaction shots. Those who appreciate this dissection of 
humanity's dark side can wonder what sort of dreams Andrew Kevin Walker 
has while they wait for his next screenplay. This much appears to be a 
given: It'll be solemn, it'll be somber, and it'll have some form of the 
number nine in its title.

Title
Review for Hush (1998)
HUSH
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Paltrow and Johnathon Schaech play Helen and Jackson, a photogenic New York 
couple on their way to spend Christmas vacation at his wealthy, well-to-do 
family's horse farm/estate Kilronan. Jackson's mother Martha (Lange) runs 
Kilronan all by herself, and her genteel Southern hospitality makes Helen feel 
welcome immediately -- even if her first meeting with Martha takes place while 
Helen is in the altogether, caught red-handed after a bedroom romp with her 
husband-to-be. But it seems that Martha's friendly smile masks a much more 
threatening demeanor; she's what you'd call someone who loves too much. Martha 
eagerly, deviously wants a grandchild, and then Helen will be expendable, as far 
as she's concerned. 
If there's one reason to catch "Hush," it's Lange. She treats the pedestrian 
screenplay better than it deserves to be treated, injecting Martha (poorly 
written though she may be) with a little empathy to level out the psycho-playing 
field. When she delves into Martha's dark side, predictable cliches -- 
chain-smoking, staring in mirrors, praying in a confessional to a priest who 
isn't there, poking a hole in Helen's diaphragm so she'll become pregnant (and 
she does) -- abound, but it's moderately entertaining junk because Lange is such 
an interesting actress to watch. Veteran performer Nina Foch is smart and tart 
as Jackson's wheelchair-bound paternal grandmother. The rest of the cast looks 
ill and uncomfortable, especially Paltrow. But can you really blame them? 
The character relationships in "Hush" hold a certain amount of promise, at least 
until their psychological impact is blown out of the water by sheer stupidity. 
Idiotic situations (Martha yells at a nearby horse so it will bolt up and knock 
Helen over) compliment idiotic dialogue ("Why did you yell?" Helen yells back at 
Martha), and the film takes the form of one of the shoddier fill in the 
blank-from-hell flicks ever made. You can see through a great deal of Martha's 
actions and lies from their conception; why do people who have known this woman 
for years longer than we have never figure things out? Does nobody communicate 
or read the newspaper in this town? If any of her potential victims thought, 
acted or behaved like normal people,"Hush" would be a really short movie. 
And then there's the climax and ending, which abruptly come when Helen starts 
having contractions after eating some pound cake spiked with a labor-inducing 
drug normally used on horses. After a really weird chase scene, Martha calmly 
knits in a rocking chair while forcing Helen to give birth in a bed all by 
herself. I won't spoil what happens next except to say that it's contradictory, 
illogical and (probably, since I'm no doctor) medically impossible. The final 
scene offers no closure, no resolution, no confrontation whatsoever. It's just 
there, dangling amidst silent displeasure. No one should like this ending, 
regardless of their feelings on the preceding material. Perhaps "Hush"'s title 
is a plea to silence its audience's likely bitter word of mouth while exiting 
the theater. 

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
KRIPPENDORF'S TRIBE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Dreyfuss plays James Krippendorf, a recently-widowed, esteemed anthropology 
professor stuck in a dire dilemma -- he's been providing therapy sessions, food 
and other necessities for his three kids with the grant money he was given to 
study an undiscovered tribe in New Guinea. When new faculty member Veronica 
Micelli (Jenna Elfman) shows up on Krippendorf's doorstep to remind him of a 
same-day lecture he's slated to give on his discoveries, he harriedly makes up a 
fictional tribe called the Shelmikedmu (a combination of his children's names). 
To cement his rather outlandish claims, he sets up a village in his backyard and 
films his sons and daughter dressed up and acting in alleged Shelmikedmu 
rituals. But a fellow anthropologist (Lily Tomlin) doubts Krippendorf's claims, 
and sets off to New Guinea to prove him wrong. 
Parents who take their little ones to see "Krippendorf's Tribe" expecting a nice 
little family movie -- what it's been marketed as -- will be in for an 
unpleasant awakening, because there are more than a few moments where the 
material pushes bawdy limits. In fact, take away all the menstruation, 
circumcision and sexual jokes, the conversation about a "neolithic dildo" and 
the frequent appearance of Krippendorf's penis sheath (part of his Shelmikedmu 
costume), and there's really not much substance left to chew on. Don't get me 
wrong; some of this stuff is funny in a "Dumb and Dumber" kind of way, but did 
"Krippendorf's Tribe" really have to go so low for laughs? 
For a while, Dreyfuss is likeable enough to get us past the fact that James 
Krippendorf is a cowardly jerk. Then, however, his character starts doing some 
pretty nasty, undefendable things that he never seems to have to answer for. 
"Krippendorf's Tribe" might leave a bad taste in your mouth, since it's message 
appears to be that lying is just fine if you can get away with it. Elfman, the 
adorable star of TV's "Dharma and Greg," fares just as well as Veronica; that 
is, she's a lot of fun until the movie turns her into an annoying shrew. Of all 
the cast, only Lily Tomlin offers a consistent performance, probably because she 
appears to be aware of the film's farcical tendencies and her role doesn't take 
a 180-degree turn. 
"Krippendorf's Tribe" isn't a bad movie, but it is a terribly misguided one. It 
gets off to a promising, comfortable start with a few good laughs as the story 
sets itself up. But things start to go downhill fast after Krippendorf gets 
Veronica drunk, dresses her up in Shelmikedmu duds and has wild sex with her 
solely for the purpose of getting some footage of the tribe's "mating rituals." 
We later learn that his actions are forgivable because she's really in love with 
him the whole time, but up until this cop-out, the whole situation comes across 
with undertones of rape. Last I checked, rape is no laughing matter. Neither is 
too much of "Krippendorf's Tribe." 

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
20th Century Fox / 1:33 / 1997 / G (off-screen killings)
Vocal Cast: Meg Ryan; John Cusack; Kelsey Grammar; Christopher Lloyd; Hank 
Azaria; Bernadette Peters; Angela Lansbury; Kirsten Dunst 
Directors: Don Bluth; Gary Goldman 
Screenplay: Susan Gauthier; Bruce Graham; Bob Tzudiker; Noni White 
"Anastasia" marks 20th Century Fox's first feature-length foray into 
animated filmmaking, and while Disney still owns the field, they now have 
a reason to watch their backs. Quite an accomplished opus, "Anastasia" 
gets Fox off to a solid start despite its occasional flaws. The credit is 
probably due to the creative mind of Don Bluth, who with "The Land Before 
Time" and "An American Tail" has shown himself to be the most innovative 
non-Disney cartoon film-creator working today ... tankers like 
"Rock-a-Doodle" and "The Pebble and the Penguin" aside, of course. 
"Anastasia" opens in 1916 St. Petersburg, where the Romanov dynasty is 
celebrating the 300th anniversary of its Russian rule. The party is 
crashed by evil sorcerer Rasputin (voiced by Christopher Lloyd), who has 
doomed his own soul for the power to destroy the family and returned from 
exile in order to use it. With the help of courageous servant boy Dimitri, 
young Princess Anastasia ("Interview With the Vampire"'s Kirsten Dunst) 
and her grandmother, the Dowager Empress Marie (Angela Lansbury), escape; 
Rasputin offers chase but ends up drowning in the icy waters of the Volga 
River. Anastasia and Marie make it to a train station, but the confusing 
mob scene tears them apart and leaves Anastasia lying on the boarding 
platform, unconscious and alone. 
Jump forward into the 1920s, and Anastasia is now headstrong 18-year-old 
Anya (Meg Ryan) and has no idea of her true legacy. As fate would have it, 
she runs into an older version of Dimitri (John Cusack), now a con artist 
scanning the countryside for an Anastasia-lookalike that he can bring to 
Paris to appease Marie, who is still alive and consumed with a passion to 
find her long-lost granddaughter. Anya fits the bill perfectly -- although 
neither party realizes how perfectly. All of this Romanov commotion causes 
Rasputin's resurfacing; sure, he's literally in hell, but his spiritual 
state doesn't keep him from a connection with the outside world thanks to 
his batty bat sidekick Bartok (Hank Azaria). 
As a history lesson, "Anastasia" is spotty and scant. An intriguing back 
story is paired with somewhat head-scratching development, mostly the 
fault of the film's villain -- Rasputin might be an entertaining guy to 
watch, but when it comes to supplying motivation, the movie is clueless. 
Why does he hate the Romanovs so much? The question is never adequately 
answered, and therefore we're spared a truly hissable bad guy. But let the 
record show that it's a risky venture for any studio to embrace fact-based 
occurrences in an animated film ("Pocahontus" certainly *is* Disney's 
dullest toon flick yet); when doing so, you run the risk of altering 
chronology so much that it becomes distracting. 
But whatever "Anastasia" lacks in historical departments is made up for in 
sheer, splendid showmanship. This is one gorgeous movie, even when the 
animation is just a tad under the level established by Disney. The 
occasionally stiff look could be attributed to the animators' dedication 
to realism -- these characters are drawn to look somewhat more "human" 
than the Mouse's many curvy Prince Erics and Princess Jasmines. There are 
dazzling set pieces aplenty, including a dangerous dalliance on a runaway 
train and a ghostly ballroom dance sequence that's a true breath-taker. 
The songs are very adequate; while the number of true showstoppers is 
limited, the tunes that really work here are the more subtle ones. Marie 
and Anastasia's gentle ballad "Once Upon a December" is beautiful while 
Rasputin's anti-good rant "In the Dark of the Night" (with slimy 
cockroaches singing backup!) strains a little. Impressive vocal 
performances by the likes of Ryan and Cusack are an added treat; so's the 
Bartok-provided comic relief, which is funnier than it first seems. 
Even if "Anastasia" is missing the emotional draw that Disney's 
semi-serious features ("Beauty and the Beast" and "The Hunchback of Notre 
Dame") have pulled off without a hitch, it's still got some powerful 
moments. And even if it's never as roaringly comic or colorful as Disney's 
lighter films ("Aladdin" and "Hercules"), it does have its bright spots. 
There's a little room for improvement, but not so much that really matters 
(although some children will likely be bored with its heavy dramatics) -- 
"Anastasia" is a beautiful, potent, graceful film. Unlike the 
leprosy-stricken Rasputin, it hardly ever loses its footing. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
OFFICE SPACE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The hero of "Office Space" is Peter Gibbons (Ron Livingston), a 
stressed-out software engineer at a fairly ambiguous corporation called 
Initech. Aggravated by performing insipid tasks, omnipresent 
middle-management and the looming threat of downsizing, he seeks help 
from a hypnotherapist. But when the doctor keels over mid-session, 
leaving his patient in a calm, Zen-like trance, Peter suddenly finds 
himself trapped in an agreeable state of perpetual relaxation. 
Irritation and hatred are replaced by ease and indifference. When the 
boss ("The Brady Bunch Movie"'s Gary Cole) steps in his way to chat 
about his recent apathetic streak, Peter just zips around him and keeps 
on walking. You go, boy. 
Needless to say, much of this white-collar comedy is going to elicit 
smiles, chortles and even cheers from viewers who can say, "Been there, 
wish I'd done that." "Office Space" paints such an amusingly dead-on 
portrait of office life that many of the jokes and sight-gags - ranging 
from en-route rush hour to hungry fax machines to cramping cubicles - 
are irresistible in a unanticipatedly honest way. (Incidents of mass 
exaggeration number surprisingly few.) OK, so maybe poking laughs at the 
workplace isn't the most original idea, what with the comic strip 
Dilbert and the sitcoms "Working" and "The Drew Carey Show," but the 
numerous bullseyes here are innovative even if the target is not. 
Though Judge's clever writing and appropriately understated direction 
are key factors in making "Office Space" the success that it is, a 
terrific cast also contributes undeniable strength to the final product. 
Livingston, whose sole noteworthy credit was back in 1996's "Swingers," 
makes a perfectly unfazed leading man, his delightfully deadpan facade 
ranking as the movie's main attraction. Cole has a lot of fun as Peter's 
evil overseer, peppering his lines with hilariously absent-minded 
"yeeeeahs" and "mm-hms," while "Friends"' Jennifer Aniston is adorable 
as the object of Peter's affection, an oft-scolded waitress at a T.G.I. 
Friday's-like eatery. Their romance is largely superfluous, but "Office 
Space" does use the Aniston role to observe the parallel travails of 
those in the service industry. 
Also giving their all are David Herman, Ajay Naidu and Stephen Root as 
assorted colorful "Office" lackeys, and this last actor gets to steal 
scenes as the real-life version of Judge's Milton character, the 
frequently put-down black sheep of Initech. These subordinates, along 
with Livingston, attempt to strike back at their superiors in wildly 
different ways (steering towards a pitch-perfect, if slightly 
disappointing, ending), but it's Peter Gibbons who gets the ball 
rolling. Watching "Office Space" may cause a stirring in the hearts of 
many viewers experiencing job-related ruts similar to Peter's. If they 
follow suit, expect the unemployment rate to skyrocket, but darn - if it 
won't be empowering!

Title
Review for Mouse Hunt (1997)
DreamWorks SKG / 1:37 / 1997 / PG (language, slapstick violence, comic
 sensuality)
Cast: Nathan Lane; Lee Evans; Christopher Walken; Vicki Lewis; Eric Christmas; 
Maury Chaykin; William Hickey 
Director: Gore Verbinski 
Screenplay: Adam Rifkin 
Mickey Mouse had better watch his back -- there's a new critter in
town, and he's the nameless animal attraction of "Mouse Hunt,"
DreamWorks SKG's clever first foray into family fare. Although it runs
out of steam towards its end, this live-action comedy still boasts
enough energized slapstick and inventive set pieces to best Disney's
entire 1997 non-animated, kiddie-oriented catalog ... but consider
that list includes dismal tripe like "Air Bud," "Flubber" and "That
Darn Cat," and it's really not such a difficult feat to pull
off. Still, throw the two rodents in a boxing arena, and I'll be
hoping that the mouse from "Mouse Hunt" knocks some sense back into
Mickey.
Nathan Lane (Robin Williams' significant other from "The Birdcage")
and Lee Evans (last seen as a nervous bellhop in "The Fifth Element")
play Ernie and Lars Smuntz, befuddled brothers who have just inherited
two unwanted assets from their late father (William Hickey, in his
last role) -- a dilapidated old string factory and a dilapidated old
mansion. Although Lars made a deathbed promise to upkeep the former,
he and Ernie decide to sell the latter for big bucks after learning it
was designed by a famed architect. But there's a lone obstacle in
their way -- a single mouse lives within the walls of the house, and
he's not about to give up his place of residence without a fight.
Movies aimed at young audiences are rarely this visually
exquisite. The effects blending the talents of 60-some live mice, one
animatronic mouse and one computer-generated mouse are pretty
seamless. The splendid production design seems to be straight out of
Tim Burton's mind; the Smuntz's architecturally-unsound mansion is
like something straight out of "The Nightmare Before Christmas," and
the vortex of bizarre machinery in their factory resembles some of
Vincent Price's warped contraptions from "Edward Scissorhands." "Mouse
Hunt" is a pretty dark movie -- even some of the humor can be grim --
but it's hardly ever mean-spirited.
The star of the show is neither the top-billed Lane nor the titular
mouse. It's lanky British comedian Evans, whose hysterical bodily
antics suggest a cleaned-up Jim Carrey without the obnoxious overkill
(note a toned-down but nonetheless outrageous impromptu striptease);
Evans' banter with the ever-affable Lane is funny stuff, too, and
holds its own against the movie's more flashy physical shtick. Vicki
Lewis (Beth from "NewsRadio") is solid in a supporting role as Lars'
money-grubbing wife. And in a nifty bit of novelty casting,
Christopher Walken is a macabre delight as a spooky exterminator who
takes his job a little too seriously, popping a dropping into his
mouth and noting to his tape recorder that the mouse has a "calcium
deficiency." Blech.
A basically one-joke idea -- a mouse outsmarts a couple of bumbling
humans -- is given a rather engaging execution. Their sparring is
imaginatively realized (I don't think I'll ever forget the sight of
that tiny little mouse making his getaway on a rolling wheel of
Gouda), and although you really never fully root for either side,
that's okay -- a warm-and-fuzzy union between the two parties is
practically promised from the first frame they share. "Mouse Hunt" may
take a while to get going (the rather lengthy set-up could test the
patience of some of the younger children, although I rather liked it,
much in part to Lane and Evans), and the climactic sequence is allowed
to play out for a bit too long, but this appears to be one family
movie that most members of the family will be able to find agreeable,
not unlike the original "Home Alone."
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Aniston plays Nina Borowski, a New York social worker who strikes up an 
immediate friendship with gay schoolteacher George Hanson (Paul Rudd) 
when they meet at a dinner party one night. During the course of the 
evening, George's self-centered college professor lover (Tim Daly) dumps 
him for a student, so Nina offers the spare bedroom in her Brooklyn 
apartment to George. He graciously accepts, and the living situation 
seems ideal; even Nina's lawyer boyfriend Vince ("Mad About You"'s John 
Pankow) takes a liking to George. But before long, Nina unexpectedly 
finds herself amorously attracted to her roommate, and makes a surprise 
decision that puts a kink in her dilapidating relationship with Vince. 
A large part of "Object"'s success is due to the performances of and 
chemistry between Jennifer Aniston and Paul Rudd. Because there's quite 
a bit of emotional weight in the story, Aniston's required to show 
range, and that she does; those who think of her only as her indecisive 
"Friends" alter-ego might be surprised. Rudd ("Clueless") exudes 
bonafide charm -- he plays George as a three-dimensional person, not a 
two-dimensional stereotype. Director Nicholas Hytner, best known for 
"The Madness of King George" and "The Crucible," also deserves some of 
the credit. His genuine knack for depicting character dynamics -- watch 
"The Crucible"'s Daniel Day-Lewis and Joan Allen and take notes -- 
certainly doesn't hinder either actor, letting "The Object of My 
Affection" come off with a central relationship that's downright 
electric. 
Despite these strengths, the story sometimes becomes a little hard to 
swallow in its dealings with vaguely-rendered Vince. Though ably 
performed by Pankow, Vince never quite turns into the superficial jerk 
that he at first seems to be, but, since he is a major participant in 
the film's conflict-heavy plot, matters would have improved if we were 
allowed to get to know him a little better; I questioned a few of his 
actions and reactions because I wasn't quite sure what was going on in 
his head. Some could also dismiss "The Object of My Affection" as too 
pat and sunny, but I think it's less that than the movie never loses 
sight -- even in its heavier moments -- of its upbeat cheerfulness. Pat, 
perhaps, but it's not contrived or manipulative like most romantic 
comedies. 
A happy ending (but not the one you might expect) allows a few 
reassuring answers to those tough questions posed by the movie, thus 
capping off its satisfying meditation on the obstacles -- be they sexual 
orientation, heartfelt emotion or whatever -- that can affect platonic 
companionship for better or worse. And to further illustrate the 
importance of having friends, the filmmakers have gone one step further 
than just hiring one; they've widened their playing field to incorporate 
several priceless supporting roles, the apex of which is a sad theatre 
critic (Nigel Hawthorne, whom Hytner directed in "King George") who acts 
as a world-weary foil for Nina. Due in part to this nifty, 
character-emphasized focus, "Object" is more than worthy of its 
audience's affection.

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
RUSH HOUR
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
For the record, I don't mind Tucker much at all. Sure, he can be as 
irksome as fingernails on a blackboard at times, but so could Jim Carrey 
back in his pre-"Truman Show" days. Rather, the problem with him in 
"Rush Hour" is that his squealy self and frantic antics just don't sit 
well with the role he's playing - a rogue LAPD detective named James 
Carter. Check out the opening scene (which genre fans know has 
ultimately _very_little_ to do with the rest of the film), in which 
Carter takes part in a sting operation to trap an explosives dealer. Um, 
could he or his cop-endangering shtick be any harder to swallow?
"Rush Hour" becomes a little more palatable once Jackie Chan enters the 
picture, cast as a Hong Kong inspector who teams up with Carter to crack 
the kidnaping of the Chinese Consul's 11-year-old daughter, a case that 
spans their respective countries. Chan fans might be disappointed by how 
little the master martial artist gets to simultaneously display his 
flair for physical comedy and killer moves; a scene where he battles bad 
guys while protecting the priceless exhibits in an art museum is classic 
Chan, a scene where his Carter-inspired use of a racial epithet gets him 
in trouble in a bar full of African-Americans is not. 
That bit aside, "Rush Hour"'s humor of choice seems to be disparaging 
quips directed at Asians ("I've been lookin' for your sweet-and-sour 
chicken a--!" Carter screeches to a Chinese bad guy); it wouldn't be 
funny if it were the other way around, and it's not funny the way it is. 
Much more successful is the film's comedy when it plays up the culture 
clash between Chan and Tucker; this star and star-on-the-rise have a 
nice rapport both on-screen and off, the latter evidenced by the 
now-notorious Chan tradition of showing outtakes over the end credits. 
Here, it's good stuff worth sticking around for, especially when the two 
slip up together. 
The title must refer to a gridlock of cliches instead of cars -- not 
only do we get the mismatched-buddy-cop story, we also get the 
fish-out-of-water and renegade-man-of-the-law angles and a climactic 
red-wire-or-blue-wire moment to top everything off. Though nobody will 
presumably accuse "Rush Hour" of breaking new cinematic ground, it's a 
tad on the disheartening side that this match made in odd couple heaven 
fails to enhance the familiar plot motions to memorable lengths. If 
you're a praying person, get on your knees - then, maybe Chan and Tucker 
will get a screenplay that's up to their collective speed in the 
inevitable "Rush Hour 2."

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
Rating: ** (out of ****)
Columbia / 1:45 / 1999 / R
Cast: Craig Bierko; Gretchen Mol; Armin Mueller-Stahl; Vincent
D'Onofrio; Dennis Haysbert
Director: Josef Rusnak
Screenplay: Josef Rusnak; Ravel Centeno-Rodriguez
Take a trip to "The Thirteenth Floor" and enter an empty room with a
fantastic view. The see-worthy sights are courtesy of this sci-fi
thriller's dazzling recreation of the glitz and glamour of 1930s Los
Angeles, but even opulent backdrops like elegant nightclubs and posh
hotel lobbies can't make up for a lack of soul or any real suspense. And
those are the least of its problems - another one of those
alternate-plane-of-reality flicks, "Thirteenth" reeks of beamed-there,
theorized-that coming so fast on the heels of like genre fare including
the hit "The Matrix," David Cronenberg's artsy "eXistenZ" and the
Spanish import "Open Your Eyes."
Moviegoers may be closing their eyes and dozing off after such an
interesting prologue sequence pulls them from the aforementioned setting
to a futuristic-looking but contemporary version of the same metropolis,
where the film makes its familiar agenda quite clear. Apparently, a
group of '90s programmers (Craig Bierko, Vincent D'Onofrio and Armin
Mueller-Stahl) have been fiddling around with a computer simulation of
Jazz Age L.A. Mueller-Stahl ("Shine"), the project leader, gets wind of
a major bombshell regarding the experiment but is killed before he can
pass the information along to lackeys Bierko ("Sour Grapes"), the
straight-arrow, and D'Onofrio ("The Newton Boys"), the wild-card.
Thanks to evidence stacked against him, Bierko becomes suspected of the
murder and frantically searches for clues to prove otherwise using the
time-travel contraption. This intrigue coincides with yet another - the
sudden appearance of the deceased's globe-trotting daughter ("Rounders"'
Gretchen Mol). She shows up to claim her old man's business and property
upon learning of his demise, demonstrating that this is the kind of
movie where characters gasp lines akin to "He never mentioned a
daughter!" Matters begin to grow confusing here, what with all of the
trips between surrogate L.A.s and each of the main acting quartet
playing two versions - if not eventually more - of his or her initial
role.
Still, "The Thirteenth Floor"'s collision of past and present is no less
perplexing than "The Matrix," a similar techno-mystery it faces
inevitable comparisons to. In fact, people not among "The Matrix"'s mass
of avid supporters - this critic included - might note how "Thirteenth"
offers grander scenic dazzle, a tighter edit and nil in the way of
mumbo-jumbo regarding Chosen Ones or Oracles. But at least that movie
packed in some taut kinetic thrills. "Thirteenth"'s idea of sensory
explosion is to throw Bierko and Moll, both fine in past work but not
cast to their strengths here, late passionate professions that don't
rate the slightest pulse.
>From this unlikely coupling on, it's all downhill - as in runaway and
unrecoverable. Already stopped dead in its tracks by a superfluous
romance, "The Thirteenth Floor" proceeds with a denouement and climax so
sudden, wrong and noodle-headed that they'll polish off whatever mild
interest - and patience - remains in most viewers. The finale, an
unequivocal high point in "The Matrix," sputters with absurdity,
predictability, plot holes and a confrontation worthy of a "Fatal
Attraction"-esque potboiler. Even those who thus far have enjoyed
themselves need to heed this advisory: Exit "The Thirteenth Floor" a few
floors early.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
HILARY AND JACKIE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
That'd be Emily Watson, whose staggeringly brilliant work as the tragic 
Jackie is pretty much everything Academy voters look for in a Best 
Actress candidate. However, the Hilary du Pré character, played by 
Rachel Griffiths ("My Best Friend's Wedding"), doesn't get top title 
mention for nothing, and it'd be a shame if her subtle - but every bit 
as moving - acting was overshadowed by Watson's far showier role. The 
jury's currently out on whether or not that will happen, but already 
assured is that these lovely ladies put power and presence into a 
true-life tale filled with the kind of emotion and human drama that 
requires such treatment to really hit its heartbreaking story home. 
"Hilary and Jackie" sets up a tale of pseudo-sibling rivalry in 1950s 
England, when the du Pré sisters were young girls (nicely embodied by 
Keely Flanders and Auriol Evans, respectively) and it appeared Hilary, a 
natural on the flute, would become their family's claim to fame. But 
when Jackie reveals herself to be a cello prodigy after watching 
Hilary's gift garner much attention, their futures are altered forever; 
the former puts away her dreams for a fulfilling domesticity while the 
latter spirals into madness brought on by her musical success. For the 
second time in her life, Jackie begins to long for what Hilary 
possesses: sheer, stable normalcy with a loving husband (David 
Morrissey) and kids. 
This story is told in halves - first from Hilary's point-of-view and 
then Jackie's - a gimmick that seems initially frustrating but pays off 
beautifully in the concluding hour, when viewers are allowed to finally 
see most of the puzzling past events from both sides of the coin. There 
are a few underexplained forays into the deeper, more questionable 
branches of their relationship, especially some bed-hopping business 
after Jackie asks Hilary to help fulfill a shocking favor, but even in 
the film's weak moments, Watson and Griffiths (one or the other is 
nearly in every frame) deserve and demand attention. Simply put, these 
women work wonders. 
Also remarkable is how debut director Anand Tucker avoids the pitfalls 
of this type of picture by slathering his potentially devastating canvas 
with restraint - "Hilary and Jackie" never stoops so low as to indulge 
in blatant manipulation or false emotion. Screenwriter Frank Cotterell 
Boyce ("Welcome to Sarajevo"), who based his work on real-life Hilary 
and brother Piers' memoir "A Genius in the Family," might skimp on 
certain details that better the bond between Hilary and Jackie, but 
makes up for his shortcomings by concocting scenes that will hang in the 
memory for a long time. One such rendering is a haunting beach-set coda 
that perfectly emphasizes how unforgettable certain pieces of this movie 
are.

Title
Review for Muppets From Space (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Columbia / 1:25 / 1999 / G (but contains a strange bit of human-Muppet
flirtation)
Cast: The Great Gonzo; Kermit the Frog; Rizzo the Rat; Miss Piggy;
Fozzie Bear; Jeffrey Tambor; Pat Hingle; Andie MacDowell
Director: Tim Hill
Screenplay: Jerry Juhl; Joseph Mazzarino
Gonzo for Gonzo? Then you'll absolutely adore "Muppets From Space," this
decade's third film featuring Jim Henson's infamously accessible and
diverse puppet troupe. But unlike 1992's "The Muppet Christmas Carol" or
1996's "Muppet Treasure Island," both of which felt forced in their
attempts to mix classic lit with mad Muppet sensibilities, "Space" cooks
up a brand new - and totally timely - premise for our favorite felt
friends to joke, mug and flail their way through. It's a worthy
successor to 1979's "The Muppet Movie," 1981's "The Great Muppet Caper"
and 1985's "The Muppets Take Manhattan."
As for that blue, furry, hook-nosed whatchamacallit called Gonzo,
admiring him is mandatory in enjoying this "Space" trip. He - not
Kermit, not Miss Piggy - gets the lead role here, his dilemma grabbing
the spotlight following a rousing, if out-of-nowhere, opening production
number set to the still-hip '70s staple "Brick House." Seems Gonzo,
suffering from a huge identity crisis, has been overcome with a question
that's also been haunting fans for quite some time: We know Rolf's a
dog, Fozzie's a bear and Sam's an eagle, but into what genus and species
does the G-man fall? A word of advice: Don't think too hard about the
title if you'd like to keep all the related revelations a surprise.
His quest for answers takes him and his Muppet pals through their
patented mix of physical comedy, surprise celebrity cameos (like David
Arquette as a mad scientist) and pop culture spoofs galore. Streetwise
Rizzo the Rat, Gonzo's right-hand rodent, tags along as usual, providing
an amusingly sarcastic counterpoint to his frazzled friend's neurotic
natterings. Crave new territory? A few neophyte characters receive
memorable debuts, including affable grizzly Bobo, a distressingly Andy
Warhol-esque butler and a Latino shrimp named Pepe who makes up for his
diminutive size with an abundance of sharp barbs.
Predictably, the lone main non-Muppet player - Jeffery Tambor's hammy
villain, a shady type out to cage Gonzo for government purposes - is a
snooze. And most non-Gonzo old favorites get relegated to supporting
subplots, which is the case with one-time Muppet ringleader Kermit and
spotlight-hogger Miss Piggy. But the background suits them fine for at
least this endeavor. "Muppets From Space" creates such a lively,
diverting atmosphere that this potentially faulty switcheroo registers
only in afterthought. Any film that pulls off a
worth-the-price-of-admission "Dawson's Creek" jab, a Piggy-MacDowell
catfight and yet another big musical showstopper in the same 10 minutes
can't be too dull.
With a fine balance between mirth and message and relatively few lulls
hampering viewer merriment, kids will identify with the alienation
themes and relish the silly slapstick while adults are kept amused by
parodies of classic sci-fi and the suspicious mentality of the "X-Files"
'90s. This means that "Muppets From Space" is truly a family film that
fits the classic - but typically over-applied - commendation: Young and
old can enjoy it together. Except for those crass, curmudgeonly seniors
Statler and Waldorf. They'll heckle anything. Maybe a Muppet retirement
community should be in their future.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"'20 Dates' tells the story of Myles Berkowitz, a man who wants to make
a film, and to fall in love. These areas are his two greatest failures,
professional and personal,' so he decides to make a film about going out
on 20 dates. By the film's end, he has won the love of the lovely
Elisabeth - maybe - but his professional life is obviously still a
failure." -Roger Ebert on "20 Dates"

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
Paramount / 1:22 / 1999 / R (non-stop profanity and crude humor, comic
violence)
Cast: Trey Parker; Matt Stone; Mary Kay Bergman; Isaac Hayes
Director: Trey Parker
Screenplay: Trey Parker; Matt Stone; Pam Brady
Take a good gander at the title of "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut."
If you don't spot the naughty joke immediately, perhaps you're not in
the movie's target audience. This double entendre fittingly serves a
double purpose, barely tapping the randy humor yet to come and heralding
exactly how this "Park" will differ from the version that's seen weekly
on Comedy Central in television-sized, half-hour and censored format.
At least give credit to co-creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone for being
honest from the get-go. Their movie's definitely "Bigger," the colorful
but crude construction paper-animation a nice change of pace on the
silver screen from cutting-edge 'toons like "Tarzan." It's certainly
"Longer," more than three times the length of an average episode. And
it's undeniably "Uncut": Just look and listen as a barrage of bawdy
behavior and imaginative profanity assault the senses of all in
attendance at this ode to obscenity and eventually the first amendment
and parental responsibility.
Hijinks as usual are in store for the South Park, Colorado gang of tubby
Cartman, Jewish Kyle, lovesick Stan and cryptic Kenny (voiced by either
Parker or Stone), only their misadventures here leave behind an
especially timely message. As real-life theatres stronghold their
policies regarding admittance into R-rated films following the
entertainment industry's blame in the Columbine tragedy, Park's fearsome
foursome sneak a peek at a not-for-kids flick called "A--es of Fire,"
starring filthy Canadian comics Terrance and Phillip. These
sewer-mouthed pranksters leave an indelible impression on our
protagonists, causing them to retreat back to the schoolyard with a
shocking new vocabulary.
This is where "South" began to head south for this non-fan who's caught
only bits and pieces of the boob-tube "Park." Being "Bigger" is a
necessity. But the "Longer & Uncut" parts create a TV-to-movie
transition that depreciates from roughly the 30-minute mark on, its
anything-goes offensiveness factor zapping most of the series' crass
charm. The novelty of cartoon kids swearing in proud, full glory (this
film's main reason for existing?) gets old fast, long before Kenny gets,
yes, killed and dispatched to hell, where he meets Satan and Saddam
Hussein - portrayed, of course, as homosexual lovers in a gruesomely
dysfunctional relationship, their bedroom ballistics pure overkill.
Kenny's death is "A--es of Fire"-related, literally and figuratively,
causing mothers everywhere to band together and point fingers at our
northern neighbors. We've seen this U.S-Canada skirmish before in
"Canadian Bacon," but not with a series of never-ending musical numbers.
That's right, "South Park" is a full-blown singalong, and it's worth
noting that the crowning moment - Satan's lamenting power ballad "Up
There" - contains nary a bad word, instead milking laughs by hilariously
mocking the hero showstoppers oft found in Disney fare. Broadway,
especially "Les Misérables," also gets roasted in the film's numerous
production numbers, which grow as stale as a month-old box of Cheesy
Poofs.
Sure, some of the excessive raunch flies, particularly an early Terrance
and Phillip ditty that includes a Riverdance performed by leaky rears
instead of tap shoes. But Parker and Stone almost always hit the mark
with nasty jabs at pop culture and celebrity image - ridiculing everyone
from the news media and Bill Gates (likely targets) to Conan O'Brien and
Jar Jar Binks (not) - and thus end up concocting quite an uneven display
of demented satire. "South Park" lovers won't be as picky or
discriminating, probably embracing the whole "Bigger, Longer & Uncut"
package. But I'll take smaller, shorter and bleeped any day.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"It presents as comedy things that are not amusing. If you think this
movie is funny, that tells me things about you I don't want to know."
-Roger Ebert on "Very Bad Things"

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
Rating: * (out of four)
New Line / 1:46 / 1999 / R (language, violence, clothed sex)
Cast: Charlize Theron; Johnny Depp; Joe Morton; Clea DuVall; Donna
Murphy; Nick Cassavetes; Blair Brown
Director: Rand Ravich
Screenplay: Rand Ravich
In "The Astronaut's Wife," Charlize Theron plays a young woman with a
nervous demeanor , pixie-hairdo and demon spawn unwittingly growing in
her belly. If only her name wasn't Jillian, the makers of this
embarrassing bit of sci-fi shlock could have come up with a far more
appropriate title: "Rosemary's Species." What a shame it is to see such
a gifted actress as Theron - Oscar-worthy in "The Devil's Advocate" -
struggle with the lamest rip-off of a screendom classic in recent
memory.
OK, maybe "The Astronaut's Wife" deviates from "Rosemary's Baby" turf
for its set-up, which finds our heroine terrorized not by Satan's
minions but her possessed husband (Johnny Depp), a shuttle pilot whose
mission mishap leaves him, um, a changed man. Predictably, he and the
missus get it on in a sequence best described as unpleasant, his evil
seed impregnating her with twins and realizing that great "Bowfinger"
line about "alien love." Theron's "Advocate" character faced a similar
dilemma, the horror there resonating strongly. "Astronaut" provides only
artificial anxiety.
Last year's equally noodle-headed "Species II" spun a similar premise
about the breeding habits of an extraterrestrial on earth, but at least
that movie more or less knew it was garbage. "The Astronaut's Wife" is
grave and humor-free, passing its increasingly silly story off as
full-fledged serious, right down to an ambiguous finale that isn't even
going to satisfy those who've stayed with it thus far. Here's a hint: It
involves lots of water, electrical equipment, a special effect from "The
Abyss" and the tots who doubled up as Adam Sandler's co-star in "Big
Daddy." Draw your own conclusions.
Director/writer Rand Ravich coats the proceedings in dynamic sights
masterminded by legendary "E.T." cinematographer Allen Daviau, but too
often favors the film's visual presentation over the story he's trying
to tell. This bodes horribly for each dramatic development, like the
surfacing of a suspicious NASA official ("Speed"'s Joe Morton) to
instigate Jill's slow and stupid comprehension of the truth. His
hyper-erratic behavior is probably supposed to give Wife a paranoid
edge. Instead, he adds to the phoniness.
Theron and Depp are certainly beyond this junk and will get other
chances to prove themselves this fall - she as part of an imposing
ensemble case in the John Irving adaptation "Cider House Rules," he in
the lead of Tim Burton's eagerly-awaited "Sleepy Hollow." Undeserving of
such talent, "The Astronaut's Wife" manages to be derivative, dull and
uninvolving despite its seemingly ripe potential for unintentional
laughs. In space, no one can hear you scream. But in a movie theatre,
everyone can hear you snore.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"The best possible argument for including [a shot of Bruce] Willis'
genitals would have been that the movie, after all, contains everything
else." -Roger Ebert on "Color of Night"

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
Touchstone / 1:37 / 1997 / R (sex, language, violence)
Cast: Tim Robbins; Martin Lawrence; Kelly Preston; John C. McGinley;
Giancarlo Esposito; Michael McKean; Irma P. Hall; Rebecca Gayheart
Director: Steve Oedekerk
Screenplay: Steve Oedekerk
On-screen couples don't come any odder than "Nothing to Lose"'s Tim
Robbins and Martin Lawrence. The pairing of Robbins (coming off a career
high from directing and writing the enlightening Dead "Man Walking") and
Lawrence (coming off a career low from directing, writing and acting in
the horrible "A Thin Line Between Love and Hate") could have resulted in
a quirky good time, but "Nothing to Lose" has almost nothing on its mind
-- and the result is a 97-minute running time that feels about as long
as three viewings of "The English Patient."
Robbins is well-cast as Nick Beam, an even-tempered Los Angeles
advertising executive whose serene, routine life is interrupted through
a series of hapless coincidences. Nick's happy marriage to wife Anne
(the omnipresent Kelly Preston) is turned topsy-turvy when he returns
home from work early one day to discover what appears to be her in bed
with another man -- and the cufflinks on the downstairs endtable suggest
that it's his boss (Michael McKean). Distraught and upset, Nick hops
into his car and goes on a drive to clear his head. When he's at a
stoplight, novice hoodlum T. Paul (Lawrence) attempts to car-jack him --
but T. Paul has clearly picked the wrong guy on the wrong day.
Nick steps on the gas and doesn't let off until he and his new "friend"
are well out of the city limits. They strike up a hostile, chummy
rapport that leads to many disagreements, most of them over T. Paul's
habit of robbing from convenience stores to support his family. This
gives Nick an idea, albeit a naughty one -- why not steal from his own
boss as payback for sleeping with his wife? To top everything off,
Nothing to Lose also introduces us to another set of criminals (John C.
McGinley and Giancarlo Esposito), only these guys are hardcore into
their profession, and the local police keep on getting their exploits
confused with those of Nick and T. Paul.
Robbins is a likable guy, and Lawrence can be such when he wants, so
it's a surprise that the time they share together falls flat on its
face. The two have no chemistry whatsoever, a testament to how poorly we
get to know Nick and T. Paul as a duo. We are unwisely spared the
moments when they first meet -- the movie jumps from T. Paul's failed
hold-up to a scene where they're stopping for food many miles away.
"Nothing to Lose" never tries to explain their relationship to us, and
therefore it totally overlooks what likely could have been its best
scenes. In place of development is a long, violent sequence where Nick
and T. Paul knock each other around outside a diner. It's as if nobody
knew what else to do.
Don't get me wrong -- "Nothing to Lose" does contain its fair share of
out-loud laughs. It's just that none of them belong to either Robbins or
Lawrence -- they're given to supporting performers that are each
utilized for about one brief scene each. There's a good bit with an
elderly general store clerk who gives Nick pointers on how to be a
better criminal. Director/writer Steve Oedekirk cleverly casts himself
as a security guard who's a slave to the rhythm. Great character actress
Irma P. Hall is fine in her two bits as T. Paul's slaphappy mother. And
the film's brightest sequence is executed early on, with Nick
criticizing an employee for creating a "magical" trail of chocolate
chips that follows a cookie company's mascot -- the semi-sweet morsels
hilariously resemble excrement.
"Nothing to Lose" is never a terrible movie, but I still don't think I
could subject myself to it again. When the film is smart, it can really
catch you off guard. But that's almost a rarity, because the story takes
turns being either too silly or too socially relevant. There's even a
plot twist near the movie's midsection that's insubstantial because it
should surprise no one who observed closely and listened carefully
during the film's first 20 minutes. All these weaknesses make it clear
that there's not much to gain from watching "Nothing to Lose."

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
TriStar / 1:40 / 1998 / R (language, violence, wasted talent)
Cast: Michael Keaton; Andy Garcia; Brian Cox; Marcia Gay Harden; Joseph 
Cross; Erik King; Efrain Figueroa 
Director: Barbet Schroeder 
Screenplay: David Klass 
"Desperate Measures" is a generic title for a film that's beyond 
generic. It's also a depressing waste of talent, with the solid team of 
Michael Keaton and Andy Garcia unthankfully thrown thankless lead roles, 
not to mention once-cool director Barbet Schroeder sadly continuing his 
string of not-cool flicks -- this thriller is more "Before and After" 
than "Reversal of Fortune." The movie is a big disappointment, and yet 
it's somewhat easy to see what motivated such big names to attach 
themselves to it -- the premise is both promising and intriguing. Too 
bad the execution's all wrong, though, because the set-up of "Desperate 
Measures" boasts some rather enticing elements that deserve to be put to 
far better use. 
San Francisco cop Frank Connor (Garcia) is a single parent with a 
troubling dilemma -- his son Matt (Joseph Cross) is stricken with cancer 
which only a bone marrow transplant can push into remission. Even worse, 
the only compatible donor is violent sociopath Peter McCabe (Michael 
Keaton), currently serving a life sentence for multiple murders and 
other various crimes against society. Connor tries his best to convince 
McCabe to go along with the surgery; he's at first reluctant, but 
reconsiders after he realizes he can plan his escape at the hospital. 
When he does make a run for it, Connor offers close pursuit, but for 
different reasons than his superiors (including the crusty Brian Cox) -- 
they want to take McCabe down, while Connor needs to keep him alive, or 
all hope is lost for his little boy. 
One misstep "Desperate Measures" makes is in its underdevelopment of 
Matt's illness. What's needed are more details as to exactly why McCabe 
is the only bone marrow match that works; there would seem to be other 
possible contenders somewhere in the country, and thus many of the ways 
that Connor endangers the lives of himself and those around him by 
attempting to keep McCabe alive are just a little too hard to swallow. 
Take, for example, a scene where McCabe is trying to make a getaway by 
climbing over an elevated passage tunnel connecting two sections of the 
hospital. The police have their spotlight and guns aimed right on him, 
and what does Connor do? He shoots the spotlight out so that McCabe can 
continue his flight. Connor knows very well what dangerous deeds this 
guy is capable of, and yet never seems to think that McCabe will 
eventually get to and try to harm his son. Whatever. 
To be fair, though, the lack of story background is the least of the 
movie's problems. First and foremost is how cheaply "Desperate Measures" 
trades the potential of it's opening scenes for the routine action 
ballistics of its final hour. Once McCabe escapes, the film becomes The 
Fugitive in reverse and with no thrills. There are countless scenes 
where the good guys catch up to Keaton only to have him grab a hostage 
and get away. Also, the movie is so intent on giving you a 
hoot-inducing, lip-smacking villain (the ads have compared Peter McCabe 
to Hannibal Lechter, natch) that it completely casts Garcia's Frank 
Connor by the Dullsville wayside; "Desperate Measures" appears to like 
its antagonist so much more than its protagonist, and the movie's 
head-scratcher of a send-off confirms this. 
There is some good to be found amongst this mess, particularly in the 
acting department. Cast against type, Michael Keaton's understated 
menace is highly effective. Although he's not given much believable to 
work with, Andy Garcia plays off a taut emotional chord. Joseph Cross, 
as Garicia's ailing son, is surprisingly unsentimental, and Marcia Gay 
Harden lends solid support as a doctor who becomes a major player in the 
unfolding chaos. This cast does its best to camouflage the sorry plot as 
it chugs towards an inevitably happy ending, but most is lost. It goes 
without saying that "Desperate Measures" needs an operation of its very 
own. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
SHE'S ALL THAT
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
A familiar story is spun under a fast pace and little else, true, but at 
least award "All That" a bag of chips for exuding endless charm and 
enthusiasm out of a cast of hot up-and-comers. The particularly 
appealing lead performers here are Freddie Prinze Jr. ("I Know What You 
Did Last Summer") and Rachael Leigh Cook (the infamous "This is your 
brain on heroin" commercial), respectively well-cast as popular jock 
Zack and nerdish outcast Laney, senior schoolmates in sunny So Cal. 
Taking a cue from "My Fair Lady"'s Henry Higgins, a bet is suggested 
that Zack can't turn Laney into the class queen with just eight weeks 
left until the prom. He accepts and pursues. She scratches her head at 
the sudden attention. 
It's a given that this star-crossed twosome is going to fall in actual 
love, especially after she snips off her weird hairdo and trades in her 
frumpy overalls for a hot little red number. The source of suspense then 
hinges on whether or not Laney will learn of the unfortunate wager, and 
if so, whether or not there's still a happy ending waiting in the wings 
for our mismatched protagonists. Like, duh. The results of this 
eventually sticky dilemma is just as paint-by-numbers predictable as 
everything that comes before it, a shortcoming that wouldn't be as big 
if "She's All That" had supplanted the mechanics of its ho-hum narrative 
with more real imagination and wit. 
Still, there are plenty of lively elements discovered amongst the 
clutter, and chief among them are the deft actors. "Scream"'s Matthew 
Lillard is a scream as a pugnacious former star of MTV's "The Real 
World" who plays a central but secondary role in the Zack-Laney 
courtship; Paul Walker ("Varsity Blues") and Jodi Lyn O'Keefe 
("Halloween: H20") also have fun with their villain roles even as they 
fail to make much sense. And the unexpected tweaking of seemingly 
"ordinary" moments also provide welcome distraction, like a nicely 
choreographed dance sequence, numerous jabs at pop culture and the 
running commentary of a campus deejay (R&B star Usher Raymond) that 
seems to function as a Greek chorus. 
The eventual sum of honest goodies like these elevates "She's All That" 
to a standing more notable than, as teen entertainment goes, at least 
half of the WB's hit youth-oriented programming. (And speaking of the 
WB, "Buffy" fans will adore that the Slayer herself, Sarah Michelle 
Gellar, contributes an amusing, wordless cameo. Talk about a movie 
counting on its target viewers.) Even the film's broad attempts to 
satisfy all tastes end up creating an oddly amiable combo of fairy tale 
ambitions, coarse potty humor and quite a bit more. It's like planning 
to go to the prom with Mel Gibson, getting Mel Brooks for some of the 
evening, and wanting to stick around to see how things turn out.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
HOLY MAN
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Forgive Murphy but not the movie. The comedian's turn as a bald, 
homeless, robe-clad purveyor of peace, love and happiness is a beatific 
breath of fresh air, especially on the heels of some delightfully 
unhinged work in summer's stirring "Mulan" and scatological "Dr. 
Dolittle." His character is simply called G, and the letter might as 
well be his rating, too - waiting for Murphy to cut loose in the wild 
ways that post-"Nutty Professor" crowds crave is ultimately fruitless. 
In "Holy Man," he doesn't get to fart or cuss or crack wise about sexual 
functions. It must be that higher plain. 
A near-auto mishap puts G's spiritual pilgrimage on hold when, while 
wandering the highways of Miami, he's almost hit by a Jaguar belonging 
to harried television executive Ricky Hayman (Jeff Goldblum). Ricky, who 
works for the struggling, QVC-esque Good Buy Shopping Network, 
reluctantly allows G to convalesce at his beach-side home, and it's only 
a matter of time before the recovered prophet winds up on the small 
screen, hawking junky goods like seasonal doormats and a bidet that 
sprays its user with "a kiss of refreshing mist." 
Here's the twist: G preaches as he pitches, assuring viewers that they 
would probably be better off _not_ giving into materialistic whims, but 
people buy big time anyhow. Too bad Murphy's Zenistic life lessons are 
completely transparent and often play like long-winded set-ups for 
punchlines that never arrive. The pokes at consumer culture are dead-on, 
but too often the film brushes aside the funny stuff for surprisingly 
straight-faced subplots, the eye-rolling pinnacle of which is a romantic 
sidetrack between Ricky and a cute media analyst (Kelly Preston). 
"Holy Man" gets so loaded down with all this unnecessary bunk that it 
completely loses track of what it set out to spoof - even Murphy 
disappears for large chunks of the movie's second hour so the focus can 
be turned to heavy-handed drama, complete with a schmaltzy soundtrack 
and slow fade-outs. But all is not lost; Murphy and Goldblum make 
fantastic foils during the limited time they have together, and the film 
trots out a galaxy of self-depreciating stars to poke some sly fun at 
celebrity image as they push their products on Good Buy. 
There's Morgan Fairchild's fabulous facelift machine and James Brown's 
ambulance-alerting medical belt that screams, "Help me, help me! Good 
God!" But the best bit finds ex-Golden Girl Betty White peddling an 
aphrodisiac scent that makes her climax right there on the air. As for 
most everything else, buyer - and viewer - beware.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
20th Century Fox / 1:48 / 1997 / R (language, gore, semi-nudity, creepy images)
Cast: Sigourney Weaver; Winona Ryder; Ron Rerlman; Dominique Pinon; Gary Dourdan; 
Michael Wincott; Leland Orser; Kim Flowers; Dan Hedaya; J.E. Freeman; Brad 
Dourif; Raymond Cruz 
Director: Jean-Pierre Jeunet 
Screenplay: Joss Whedon 
There's nothing more satisfying than a film series that keeps each installment 
fresh and unique, and the movies in the "Alien" franchise are a great example of 
the innovation required in order to maintain interest. Ridley Scott's 1979 
"Alien" was an ominously chilling homage/remake of old-time creature features 
that set the stage for countless copycats and arguably redefined the contemporary 
monster movie. In 1986, James Cameron's crowd-pleaser sequel "Aliens" hit 
screens, and is still considered a classic combination of action and 
science-fiction sensibilities today. Five years ago, David Fincher's "Alien3" met 
with troubling box office performance due to a downbeat tone and depressing 
send-off, but love it or hate it, it's definitely a strong exercise in grim 
atmosphere. Now, there's "Alien Resurrection," which I'm pleased to say is 
*spectacular.* You'll have to excuse the gushing (I'm an enormous fan of the 
series and must consider this film as *the* one movie of 97 I've been looking 
forward to the most -- everyone else can subtract a half-star or so from my 
rating), but "Alien Resurrection" is an exhilarating experience, easily one of 
the most exciting motion pictures of the year. 
When we last left Lieutenant Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) in "Alien3," she had 
taken her own life in order to prevent the alien queen growing inside her from 
falling into the hands of a selfish, aloof bio-weapons division that wanted to 
create and tame a beastly army of their own. "Alien Resurrection" picks up about 
200 years later. On the space station Auriga, similar-minded scientists have used 
blood samples (taken soon before her death) to clone a Ripley with extremely 
discouraging results on seven separate occasions. But it appears the eighth 
time's the charm: the operation is a success, the queen is removed and Ripley, 
scarred but still beautiful, is cast aside while the project's supervisors can 
figure out how they're going to rid of her. 
Everything seems to be running like clockwork until the small space pirate crew 
of the Betty docks on the Auriga. Their mysterious cargo -- about a dozen live 
bodies in states of suspended animation -- is quickly used to breed a new brood 
of the otherworldly monsters, which, of course, end up escaping. As the bloodbath 
begins, Ripley reveals to Betty shipmate Analee Call (Winona Ryder), a 
seemingly-passive young grunt who may or may not have questionable motives for 
being on the Auriga, that things are not what they seem -- the cloning process 
has resulted in a DNA exchange between human and creature. As a result, Ripley is 
given alien intuition and a few other assorted bonus surprises. 
Because alien movies are such an overworked sci-fi genre, they're also one of the 
most tired. In the past two years alone, we've had entries that range from 
silly-but-enjoyable ("Starship Troopers") to plainly mediocre ("Event Horizon") 
to downright awful (yes, "Independence Day"). Most, if not all, of these films 
are completely shallow when it comes to anything other than blood, guts and the 
requisite jump scene -- there's little intrigue outside of wondering how much the 
special effects cost. Leave it up to "Alien Resurrection" to throw a lot of 
emotion and character into the mix. Thankfully, it's about more than monsters on 
a kill-quest. 
That's not to say that there's a lack of chest-bursting, face-hugging or the use 
of people as in-between meal snacks -- enthusiasts of such violence will find 
much about "Alien Resurrection" to relish, particularly some icky business I 
heard an Internet rumor panel refer to as the "human toothpaste scene" and one 
bit where a general realizes he's a goner by examining a piece of his own head. 
But aside from the gore, there are actual ideas about biological-tampering, 
genetics and loyalty that aren't just confined to a setup or back-story. In one 
particularly thought-provoking sequence, Ripley meets the seven mutated clones 
she very well could have been. The way this quasi-family reunion plays out is 
eerie, stunning and even moving. 
"Alien Resurrection" draws much of its suspense from where Ripley's final 
allegiance will lie -- which of the two species will she end up devoting herself 
to? Weaver obviously relishes the new-fangled spin on her best role ever. Her 
tricky, sly acting is done with the deliciously devious twist that Ripley is a 
savior no longer -- she's actually quite a nasty predator. Weaver's choreography, 
costuming and makeup even add to her neo-alien look. Ryder sports a surprisingly 
strong action presence, proving that she can conquer pretty much any type of 
film. Call makes a great foil for Ripley; their eventually-warm relationship is 
reminiscent of Ripley's bond with the little girl she saved in "Aliens." Other 
cast members register even if their sole purpose is to act as a food source. "The 
Crow"'s Michael Wincott is noteworthy as a semi-good guy (for once) but exits the 
film far too early. Leland Orser is "Resurrection"'s likely scene-stealer, 
playing a jittery traveler who's reluctantly carrying an alien in his own chest. 
Even the aliens themselves are given more character this time around. 
Behind-the-scenes credits are stellar. Director Jean-Pierre Jeunet ("The City of 
Lost Children") frames each and every shot as a visual showstopper, particularly 
a dizzying underwater chase that culminates in a tense vertical climb. 
Screenwriter Joss Whedon gives "Alien Resurrection" the same clever humor that 
crowded his script for "Toy Story." Herve Schneid's editing is taut, John 
Frizzell's original score is eclectic. All of the prowess both on- and off-screen 
carries "Alien Resurrection" to a supremely rousing climax, the aftermath of 
which ever-so-slightly hints at an "Alien 5." And I, for one, am already in line. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The filmmakers would have at least made sense with the shorter "I Still 
Know," the longer "I Still Know What You Did Two Summers Ago" or the 
appropriate "Stupid People Getting Hacked to Bits." That last suggestion 
is the preferable one since the characters in this film do things that 
are the polar opposite of smart. For example, if your roommate is 
plagued by terrible nightmares as a result of being stalked and nearly 
murdered not long ago, would you sneak into her room late at night and 
hide in the closet, even if it was just to locate and borrow a cute 
little dress? 
Probably not, but that's precisely what college student Karla (pop diva 
Brandy) does to best friend Julie (Jennifer Love Hewitt), resulting in 
the first in a long line of phony frights. Julie, you'll recall, was one 
of the sole survivors at the end of 1997's surprise hit "I Know What You 
Did Last Summer," after a slasher with a grudge to bear - it's a _long_ 
story - began trying to pick off her, her buddies and various others in 
their coastal Carolina village. In this installment, the plot picks up 
as Karla wins a trip to the Bahamas, and Julie, yet racked by guilt, 
decides that maybe a tropical getaway will help ease her mind. 
Yeah, right. Their island paradise has room, of course, for one more in 
the form of the still-alive killer (Muse Watson) from the first film. He 
sports the same Gorton's Fisherman get-up, a heavy hat and rain slicker 
that mask his identity, but why he's still trying to stay anonymous is a 
mystery this movie never solves ... though I suppose his hook-hand would 
look funny protruding from the sleeve of a leisure suit. In a sense, 
that's the movie's glaring flaw - everybody knows who the bad guy is, 
thus evaporating the level of paranoid tension nicely sustained by its 
prequel. 
The murders and attempted murders in that film were vivid and scary, but 
Trey Callaway's derivative "I Still Know" screenplay makes the Fisherman 
just as dumb as his pretty potential victims. When Julie lays blissfully 
unaware in a tanning bed, giving him a perfect chance to wreak vengeance 
once and for all, what does he do? He twist-ties the lid shut and cranks 
up the UV rays - you'd think he'd want her gutted now instead of a skin 
cancer victim later. Even prequel "Summer" lovers might balk at how 
little there is here beyond sporadically amusing absurdity and a few 
neat-o shots of blood flowing from toned teenage flesh. 
The innovative gallows humor that scribe (and "Scream" wunderkind) Kevin 
Williamson injected into "I Know"'s unfolding story is sorely missed, 
replaced with the grating antics of a white Rastafarian cabana boy who 
smokes weed and tosses off slang like "yo"; you'll cheer - not shriek - 
when he ends up with a pair of hedgetrimmers firmly implanted in his 
chest. If "I Know What You Did Last Summer," however effective, was just 
the kind of movie that those subversive "Scream" flicks poked fun at, 
then the deadly "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer" deserves a 
full-blown roasting on "Mystery Science Theatre 3000."

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
Rating: *1/2 (out of ****)
Touchstone / 1:44 / 1999 / R (brutal combat, monotony)
Cast: Antonio Banderas; Diane Venora; Omar Sharif; Vladimir Kulich;
Dennis Storhři; Maria Bonnevie; Mischa Hausserman; Sven Wollter; John
DeSantis; Asbjřrn Riis
Director: John McTiernan
Screenplay: William Wisher; Warren Lewis
When a pair of films from the same director gets released just three
weeks apart, it could mean one of two things: that the recently
overworked individual is due for a well-deserved rest, or that either of
these movies has been sitting in a studio safe for a while and the
timing is merely a coincidence. The latter's the case with John
McTiernan and "The Thirteenth Warrior," which finally hits theatres a
year and counting after its original spring '98 opening - and fast on
the heels of McTiernan's "The Thomas Crown Affair" remake, a flick that
got good reviews. You don't have to believe superstitions to wager a
guess that "Thirteenth" won't be so lucky.
Reportedly shelved following skirmishes between McTiernan and producer
Michael Crichton, whose "Eaters of the Dead" novel provides "Warrior"'s
source (and its initial title), this messy melange of culture-clash
drama and brutal warfare feels empty and sluggish - sorta like
"Braveheart" without any of the passion. But the bloodshed certainly
remains: There's enough carnage on display here to satisfy those in
search of purely visceral thrills, though please note that the
admittedly pungent battle sequences containing all this death and
dismemberment alternate with talky passages interminable in their
dullness.
These circa-10th century clashes involve a roving band of cannibalistic
creatures capable of decapitating opponents with their bare hands and a
dozen Norse soldiers out to stop them from terrorizing the Viking
countryside. The good guys are loud, crude, often unintelligible and -
judging from their highly icky hygiene habits -- pretty smelly to boot,
which makes them perfect foils for the dignified Arab ambassador
(Antonio Banderas) who tags along quite reluctantly. They're also so
hard to tell apart that it hardly matters when a few of them meet
violent demises. You'll wince, you'll groan, you'll grouse, "Haven't we
seen this guy killed twice before?"
Banderas stands confused amidst the chaos, partaking mostly from a
distance as savages in Darth Maul facepaint and draped in the latest
animal-skin fashion run amok. He's not the hero - his soulful eyes and
lean build don't exactly herald a champion of Shwarzenegger proportions
- and "The Thirteenth Warrior" wisely doesn't pretend he is, allowing
his foreign and physically imposing co-stars to step into the spotlight
when the going gets rough. Let the characters interaction sans swords
and shields, however, and there's still a struggle - for the audience to
follow or even care about the story.
It isn't the end until audiences have witnessed a half-baked romance,
murky political intrigue, veteran actor Omar Sharif ("Funny Girl")
dropping by in a cameo role and a climactic "Indiana Jones and the
Temple of Doom"-esque chase through the villains' underground lair. All
this clutter receives stunning visual treatment courtesy of
cinematographer Peter Menzies Jr., but the collaboration between "Die
Hard"-helmer McTiernan and "Jurrasic Park"-creator Crichton should have
yielded more than sumptuous sights, graphic action and unintentionally
telling moments. Heard during "The Thirteenth Warrior"'s final scene: a
dog whimpering. How appropriate.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"It presents as comedy things that are not amusing. If you think this
movie is funny, that tells me things about you I don't want to know."
-Roger Ebert on "Very Bad Things"

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
TriStar / 2:11 / 1997 / PG-13 (brief language, scenes of violence)
Cast: Brad Pitt; David Thewlis; B.D. Wong; Mako; Jamyang Jamtsho Wangchuk; 
Lhakpa Tsamchoe
Director: Jean-Jacques Annaud 
Screenplay: Becky Johnston 
"Seven Years in Tibet" is a very long movie that centers around the Dalai 
Lama, but Richard Gere shouldn't be the only person happy as they exit the 
theater. This surprisingly strong, beautifully shot adaptation of Austrian 
mountaineer Heinrich Harrer's autobiographical exploits in the Far East is far 
better than what it looks like -- a ponderously dull starring vehicle for Brad 
Pitt (who plays Harrer). At first, "Seven Years in Tibet" is about as 
spiritual as Pitt's nifty bleached-blonde locks, but after a bumpy start, 
things really do move to a higher plain. 
"Seven Years in Tibet" picks up Harrer's tale in 1939, when he vainly leaves 
his pregnant wife behind and sets off with companion Peter Aufschnaiter (David 
Thewlis) to climb Nanga Parbat, one of the highest mountains in the Himalayas. 
After an ugly run in with British officers, Harrer and Aufschnaiter become 
prisoners of war, and it is there where the former receives a Dear John from 
his spouse. The letter informs Harrer that she has taken up with another man 
and the son she has given birth to will look upon him as a father. 
Harrer and Aufschnaiter eventually escape and talk their way into Lhasa, 
Tibet, the holy city where the Dalai Lama (Jamyang Jamtsho Wangchuk) resides. 
The 14-year-old Dalai Lama is an inquisitive young boy who spies Harrer from a 
distance and immediately recruits the foreigner to tell him about such 
subjects as Jack the Ripper, elevators and cocktails. The two form a bond that 
parallels Harrer's non-existent relationship with his own child and carries 
over into turmoil when the Chinese army invades Tibet. 
Before production was completed, a German magazine revealed that Harrer had 
Nazi ties, and a couple of lines were added relating to this fact. There's 
been a fuss as of recent that "Seven Years in Tibet" is too sanitary a 
portrait, but the film succeeds at detailing his own transformation of the 
heart and purification of the mind, regardless of whether or not it's true. 
The filmmakers' responsibility lies with making a good film, not sticking to 
every single fact. And Pitt is pretty earnest in the role. Dealing with a 
shaky Austrian accent, he appears a bit brittle in the first couple of scenes, 
but it's a testament to his likability that he fast grows on you. The setup to 
Harrer's plight is a little funky as well, but Pitt and the story seem to find 
and compliment each other quick. 
The core of Harrer's journey from selfishness to selflessness is in his tie 
with the Dalai Lama, and the numerous sequences detailing this are strong and 
distinguished. Pitt and Wangchuk, a fine young actor making a stellar film 
debut, have wonderful chemistry, and the actors' on-screen connection glows 
with more magnetism than most movies use in their depiction of married 
couples. When a pre-closing credits epilogue tells us that the two men are 
still friends to this day, it's not a surprise -- their relationship is 
portrayed with enough powerful realism that you expect it to last for a very 
long time. 
Even if "Seven Years in Tibet" had botched its story, it still would be a 
technical marvel. Director Jean-Jacques Annaud presents some incredible 
sights, and the spectacular scenery practically becomes a character in its own 
right. Occupying the breathtaking views is a robust supporting cast that 
includes those with experienced class (Thewlis and Mako) to those fresh and 
flawless (gorgeous Lhakpa Tsamchoe, as the object of Harrer and Aufschnaiter's 
competing affection). John Williams' score is exotic and Enrico Sabbatini's 
costumes are wondrous. At almost two-and-a-quarter hours, a lesser "Seven 
Years in Tibet" could have felt like seven years in the movie theater. But 
thankfully, it's not and it doesn't. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
FALLEN
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
As the film opens, Philadelphia homicide detective John Hobbes (Washington) is 
attending the execution of Edgar Reese ("Crash"'s Elias Koteas), a serial killer 
whom he apprehended single-handed. What Hobbes doesn't know is that his 
adversary's murderous motivation has been supplied by the dark, fallen seraph 
that's inhabited his body, making Reese not your typical psychopath. This 
diabolical entity -- called Azazel -- is transferred through human hosts by 
touch, and targets Hobbes as an eventual victim. But Hobbes fights back with the 
help of a pretty theologian (Embeth Davidtz) who's actually related deeper to 
the case than she'd like to admit. Also on hand to cast interdepartmental doubt 
on Hobbes' seemingly out-there actions are his loyal partner (John Goodman) and 
suspicious lieutenant (Donald Sutherland). 
It takes a good while for "Fallen" to get moving, but when it does, things 
become quite intriguing. The film, which plays like an occasionally spooky mesh 
of "Seven" and "The Exorcist," boasts an exciting gimmick -- how Azazel can be 
transferred into just about anyone -- that leads to a handful of exciting 
sequences where Washington must cast distrustful eyes on every person in his 
surroundings. Although "Fallen" might leave you with a detached feeling, it's 
hard to not be engrossed with the story's unfolding details. What keeps the 
movie from being solid entertainment, however, is that too much of it remains 
frustratingly ambiguous, like the interaction between Hobbes and his brother and 
nephew. And "Fallen"'s alleged "surprise ending" -- a denouement that Warner 
Bros. issued requests asking the press to not spoil -- should shock no one who 
has been watching attentively. 
Washington is his usual sunny, likeable self, which contrasts nicely with the 
movie's cold, grim atmosphere. Other cast members are solid without being used 
terribly well; Davidtz ("Schindler's List"), for example, creates the beginnings 
of an interesting character, but later comes off like walking, talking 
exposition. Still, even if the good guys are an underdeveloped crew, the film 
does manage to make Azazel menacing without the use of a constant actor or even 
special effects aside from some periodic weird point-of-view shots. But "Fallen" 
is nonetheless an uneven film. Screenwriter Nicholas Kazan ("Reversal of 
Fortune") has traces of a true, terrifying tale in "Fallen" -- what could have 
possibly kept his script so lopsided? Could it be ... Satan? 

Title
Review for Air Bud (1997)
Walt Disney / 1:30 / 1997 / PG (gooey sentiment, overacting)
Cast: Kevin Zegers; Wendy Makkena; Michael Jeter; Bill Cobbs; Eric 
Christmas 
Director: Charles Martin Smith 
Screenplay: Aaron Mendelson; Paul Tamasy 
Disney's "Air Bud" tells a boy-and-his-dog story with a twist -- the 
pooch is quite an accomplished basketball player. Granted, for a family 
comedy, it's not a very funny or successful idea to begin with, but it 
doesn't seem to matter -- "Air Bud" is surprisingly solemn. Save for 
occasional moments of forced slapstick, the movie wags its tale with a 
straight face -- not a very enjoyable approach. If "Air Bud" had 
realized its own absurdity, then it possibly could have been better. 
Here, we're actually asked to cheer a moment when the dog marches out to 
save the big game, clad in two pairs of sneakers and even a jersey. Its 
number? K9. Yeah, whatever. 
The movie opens as golden retriever Buddy (as himself) escapes from his 
current owner, abusive clown-for-hire Norm Snively (Michael Jeter). He 
ends up in Fernwell, Washington, where mopey new-kid-on-the-block Josh 
(Kevin Zegers) is trying to cope with the move and the recent death of 
his father. Buddy, Kevin. Kevin, Buddy. Once the dog proves his on-court 
prowess, Kevin's self-esteem rockets. They both win places in the 
school's basketball team, with the animal as their mascot. But before 
they can make it to the finals, Snively surfaces to reclaim Buddy. 
Everything plays out just as one would think: Heavy on predictability, 
light on an actual story. The movie follows a calculated chain of events 
-- Kevin's gloom fades, Snively gets his comeuppance and Buddy contracts 
rabies and must be executed Old Yeller-style. Okay, that last one's a 
lie, but at least it would have been a quicker send-off than "Air Bud"'s 
courtroom climax -- no joke! There's even a faux-cute musical montage 
where a reluctant Buddy gets cleaned-up to "Splish Splash." Paint cans 
are spilled and newspapers are buried, all in the name of formula. 
The end credits note that "No special visual effects were used in the 
basketball sequences of this motion picture." That very well may be 
true, and although to see a dog sink shots is quite a sight, a movie 
cannot exist on feat alone. But "Air Bud" doesn't seem to be interested 
in anything else. A friend of mine insists he saw Buddy a while back on 
a segment of David Letterman's "Stupid Pet Tricks." I can't think of a 
more appropriate connection -- this movie is a stupid pet trick. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Kiss or Kill (1997)
October / 1:35 / 1997 / R (language, sexual perversion, nudity, violence)
Cast: Matt Day; Frances O'Connor; Chris Haywood; Barry Otto; Andrew S. 
Gilbert; Barry Langrishe; Max Cullen 
Director: Bill Bennett 
Screenplay: Bill Bennett 
With "Kiss or Kill," Aussie director Bill Bennett tries to fashion a hip 
film noir with attractive leads, alluring scenery and a complex plot 
involving sex and murder. Unfortunately, the results are middling at 
best. It really says a lot that the movie's best sequence -- two cops 
casually conversing over breakfast, which, by the way, is extremely 
similar to the John Travolta-Samuel L. Jackson diner dialogue near the 
end of "Pulp Fiction" -- has absolutely nothing to do with anything. 
Jackson's "Fiction" hitman character claimed that personality goes a long 
way. Well, this movie has none. 
"Love and Other Catastrophes" alums Frances O'Connor and Matt Day play 
drifting grifters Nikki and Al. She's a flirty lass who hangs out in 
bars, bats her eyes at wealthy-looking patrons and escorts them up to 
their hotel rooms where she spikes their drinks; he, brooding and 
secretive, lets himself in and helps her make off with whatever valuables 
they can steal. When one mark accidentally dies after being drugged, 
Nikki and Al panic and make off with his briefcase, which they're sure 
contains some kind of worthwhile bounty. Not quite -- its contents 
actually consist of a tape that explicitly reveals a renowned sports hero 
(Barry Langrishe) to be a pedophile. With the police and several other 
seedy types on their trail, the criminal lovebirds hit the road. 
There are many directions "Kiss or Kill" could go at this point, and the 
filmmakers attempt to cover them all with equal parts disturbing 
suspense, black comedy and romantic drama (with a couple of repressed 
flashbacks and blazing explosions thrown in for good measure). The mix 
might have worked had any of these characters been tightly-written, but 
they're not -- we don't know about them, we don't care about them. In 
similar movies, the supporting cast can be quirky enough to steal the 
stars' fire, but here they're just as dull. Incredibly strong, appealing 
performances from Day and O'Connor aside, there's little meaty enough 
here to sink your teeth into. 
Because "Kiss or Kill" utilizes the seemingly-foolproof, twisty elements 
of the crime caper, one might be tempted to call it a triumph of style 
over substance. But discounting glamorously dusty outback scenery, the 
movie's look is a headache-inducer thanks to sledgehammer editing. An 
example scene construction: Cut to Nikki opening a house door to walk to 
a car trunk, cut to Nikki at the car trunk, cut to Nikki walking back 
through the house door. I've heard of keeping things moving, but this is 
absolutely irritating. 
"Kiss or Kill" does boast a few interesting nuances -- like Nikki and 
Al's growing distrust of each other -- but overall, the more turns the 
plot takes, the more distancing and dull it becomes. Eventually, a 
particularly engaging setup is wasted to serve annoying contrivances. 
Perhaps the most telling flaw of "Kiss or Kill" is divulged in its 
production notes -- a majority of the film's dialogue and interaction 
were improvised. Maybe Bennett will use an actual script next time. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
Columbia / 1:33 / 1998 / PG (brief nudity, innuendo)
Cast: Victoria Adams; Melanie Brown; Emma Bunton; Melanie Chisholm; Geri 
Halliwell; Richard E. Grant; Alan Cumming; George Wendt; Mark McKinney; 
Naoko Mori; Roger Moore 
Director: Bob Spiers 
Screenplay: Kim Fuller 
Hello. My name is Jamie, and I'm a Spiceaholic. Well, not really. Let's 
just say I'm a casual fan of the Spice Girls; I know they're not too deep 
or challenging, but their British bubblegum bounce is good enough to keep 
me on the stairmaster for a long while. (And, a definite plus, group 
members Geri "Ginger Spice" Halliwell, Emma "Baby Spice" Bunton, Melanie 
"Sporty Spice" Chisholm, Victoria "Posh Spice" Adams and Melanie "Scary 
Spice" Brown are all easy on the eyes.) I fearlessly admit that I'm 
familiar with their music, and now I'm familiar with "Spice World," their 
feature film debut, as well. A kind of hybrid between "A Hard Day's 
Night," "Clueless" and the "Naked Gun" movies, "Spice World" isn't quite 
tasty, nor does it leave you with a bad case of indigestion. It's alright, 
but I'd probably rather be on the stairmaster listening to them than sit 
through their movie again. 
There isn't much of a story here, as "Spice World" is basically a series 
of interchangeable, scattershot skits and spoofs stuck between some 
adequately spirited musical numbers. The movie is framed around a hectic 
couple of days for the girls, as they ready themselves for a big concert 
in England. Along the way, there are dozens of potential comedic 
catastrophes -- a documentarian (Alan Cumming) trails the group endlessly, 
a pregnant pal (Naoko Mori) prepares to give birth and sleazy tabloid 
types conspire the end of the Spice Girls for good, all while a 
mysterious, T.J. Eckelberg-like figure (Roger Moore) watches from above. 
And of course Posh, Baby, Scary, Ginger and Sporty are in just about every 
scene, talking about clothes, guys and "girl power" whenever they aren't 
singing. 
Perhaps the big question mark here is regarding the Spice Girls' acting 
capabilities, but I'm not too sure of the answer. They're not thespians 
(hey, neither were the Beatles), but they boast a perky, self-depreciating 
buoyance that's sort of difficult to deny. The rest of the cast is nice 
enough to acknowledge that this isn't their show, with George Wendt and 
Mark McKinney getting the best bits as American filmmakers on a quest to 
convince the quintet to make their American movie debut. Meatloaf seems to 
be cast as their tour driver simply so he can make groan-inducing 
allusions to his album playlists, while weird Richard E. Grant ("Bram 
Stoker's Dracula"), as the Spice Girls' manager, is decked out in so many 
emerald suits he looks like a refugee from Oz. And those familiar with the 
British entertainment scene will note sometimes-clever, sometimes-not 
cameos by the likes of Bob Geldof, Stephen Fry, Bob Hoskins and Jennifer 
Saunders. 
The fundamental problem with "Spice World" is an even hit-or-miss gag 
ratio. For every moment that scores (a hilarious faux-movie trailer for an 
action flick called "Spice Force Five"), there's one that comes close to 
embarrassment (the ladies' impromptu performance of their hit "Wannabe" in 
a coffee shop-flashback). The best sequences arguably come whenever the 
Spice Girls are holed up inside their tour bus, which is modeled after the 
British flag. They poke the most fun at themselves here; watch each's 
reaction when one whines that the media has a tendency to stereotype them 
too often. Around the 45-minute mark, things seem to screech to a halt, 
certainly not helped by a dwindling sense of humor (what's up with that 
goofy labor scene?) or stuff that's just too stupid to work (what's up 
with that dopey alien encounter?). At least the film is capped-off nicely 
with a vibrant live rendition of their current tune "Spice Up Your Life." 
"Spice World" definitely isn't going to win any of the gals' detractors 
over, and it isn't likely to sway those who are neutral one way or the 
other. Those seeking a message or any kind of social relevance had better 
look elsewhere; the closest "Spice World" comes to either of those is a 
sequence that illustrates the dangers of driving a bomb-equipped bus in 
stiletto heels. It's an hour-and-a-half of brainless comedy and music, 
starring five pleasant-looking pop divas who don't seem to fear 
self-parody. And that's presumably all that die-hard Spice fans really, 
really want. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
Dreamworks SKG / 2:02 / 1997 / R (violence, profanity) 
Cast: George Clooney; Nicole Kidman; Marcel Iures; Gary Werntz; Holt 
McCallany; Rene Medvesek; Alexander Baluev; Michael Boatman; Armin 
Mueller-Stahl 
Director: Mimi Leder 
Screenplay: Michael Schiffer 
Dreamworks SKG, the high-profile collaborative production team of Steven 
Spielberg, Jeffery Katzenberg and David Geffen, gets off on the right 
filmmaking foot with "The Peacemaker." A big, dumb, loud adventure that 
combines enough tawdry foreign intrigue for 14 James Bond flicks with
sparkling star power and enthralling visuals, "The Peacemaker" isn't a 
particularly strong genre entry, but even its weaknesses don't hinder it 
from being an entertaining lark. 
The only big names in the cast belong to the two leads: Current Batman 
George Clooney and ex-Batman flame Nicole Kidman. The latter plays Dr. 
Julia Kelly, a top presidential aid and the acting head of the White 
House's Nuclear Smuggling Group. Kelly becomes embroiled in an
important investigation surrounding the theft of 10 nuclear missiles 
from a speeding train by Russian terrorists. When one is "accidentally" 
set off, an entire Middle Eastern countryside is vaporized. 
Enter Clooney's gung-ho Colonel Thomas Devoe, who fast becomes Kelly's 
unlikely ally as they trot around the globe and try to keep track of the 
missiles throughout various trade-offs and other shifty dealings. It 
turns out that a potential buyer (Marcel Iures) has vengeance on his 
mind and would very much like to use one to annihilate the area 
surrounding our United Nations building, where a treaty is going to be 
signed involving the very governments he holds responsible for the
murder of his wife and child. 
When it devotes its time to action movie dynamics, the movie is a great 
deal of fun. Exhilarating sequences abound -- there's a spectacular 
round of bumper cars between Devoe and the bad guys in Vienna's exotic 
locale, as well as a literal bridge-hanger where he attempts to secure 
some of the remaining nukes. After the faulty send-offs of "Air Force 
One" and "G.I. Jane," it's refreshing to see "The Peacemaker" save some 
of its most riveting moments for its climax -- a suspenseful (if
over-the-top) chase through New York City, culminating in one of the 
most effective explosion-countdowns ever put to film. 
However, if "The Peacemaker" needs a pacemaker, it's in the plot area. 
It's a good thing the heros have engaging demeanors, because Iures' 
villain is about as interesting as burnt toast. The attempts to develop 
a sympathetic character out of him are dull and ordinary, and as a 
result, he's low on personality, a big no-no for this type of film. Also 
disconcerting is "The Peacemaker"'s rather dull setup of events. Only 
when Clooney and Kidman enter the frame does the movie ever become
involving, making the opening segments something of an uncomfortable 
sit. 
Speaking of the performers, they really carry "The Peacemaker" to 
memorable lengths. With a great turn here, Clooney proves he can carry a 
dramatic adventure as well as a horror film ("From Dusk Till Dawn"), a 
comic book adaptation ("Batman & Robin") or a romantic comedy ("One Fine 
Day"). He's a very agreeable actor, and even gets numerous chances to 
crack wise amidst the explosions and mass death. Kidman is also in top 
form and even gets to play a bigger part in the story than expected -- 
she's never quite resorted to a damsel in distress. The most beautiful 
woman working in movies today, Kidman even looks flawless covered in 
sweat and caked in mud. Also of note is Mimi Leder, whose you-are-there, 
Emmy-winning directing prowess on "ER" serves her work here well. Maybe 
filming gurneys and doctors in constant motion is good preparation for 
an action film. 
While "The Peacemaker" fumbles occasionally (more so in its first half), 
it's always diverting and never unwatchable. Almost every movie has its 
flaws, and although "The Peacemaker" is never an exception to that rule, 
it's certainly something special to see a film with enough notable 
merits to outweigh and overpower its drawbacks. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
PALMETTO
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Harry Barber (Woody Harrelson) is fresh out of prison, where he's served a 
couple of years for a crime he didn't commit. Even though he harbors animosity 
towards the obtuse local officials, Harry's first order of business is to return 
to his home town of Palmetto to be with his sculptor girlfriend Nina (Gina 
Gershon). While searching for work, he catches the eye of Rhea Malroux 
(Elisabeth Shue), the mysterious sexbomb wife of a Palmetto millionaire. Rhea 
proposes a scheme that'll get Harry $50,000 easy -- to play a small part in the 
staged kidnaping of her jailbait stepdaughter Odette (Chloe Sevigny). "You do 
like risks, don't you, Mr. Barber?" Rhea alluringly coos. Boys, form a line 
behind me. 
Part of "Palmetto"'s success can be attributed to the performance of Elisabeth 
Shue, who demonstrates here that her Oscar-nominated turn in "Leaving Las Vegas" 
might merely be foreshadowing great things to come. Shue's a seductive, campy 
delight, and pulls off a Barbara Stanwyck-Gloria Swanson combo with admirable 
relish. The other actors form a solid ensemble around her, including Sevigny 
("Kids"), tantalizingly slutty as a teen tease, as well as the ever-likeable 
Gershon, cast a far cry from her extreme roles in "Bound" and "Showgirls." 
Harrelson is still doing fine follow-up work to "The People vs. Larry Flynt."
"Palmetto" does have its share of grievances. Harrelson's narration is needless, 
I suppose, and Gershon's Nina cries to be meatier than she ultimately is. One of 
the plot's unexpected angles -- that Harry is asked by the police to become the 
press liaison for the very crime in which he's involved -- could have been 
played a little better. There are moments when you question the tone, but it's 
never so unstable that it deserves the reproach it's been receiving from most 
other critics. If "Palmetto" didn't want to be laughed at, would it really have 
tacked on a climax that plays like a live-action "Who Framed Roger Rabbit"? 
Although a few elements can be questioned, the movie works well on its own 
terms. Thanks to a juicy cast -- especially Shue -- and the nifty material 
approach from director Volker Schlondorff (you remember him from last summer's 
suddenly re-popular "The Tin Drum," right?), everything runs smoothly. And for 
fans of revelation-heavy endings, this film's got a few shocks in store that I 
won't even dream of revealing. "Palmetto" is a generous amount of fun to watch, 
and that's all you need to know. 

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
Miramax / 1:30 / 1997 / R (language, violence, perverse sexual theme) 
Cast: Parker Posey; Josh Hamilton; Freddie Prinze, Jr.; Tori Spelling; 
Genevieve Bujold 
Director: Mark Waters 
Screenplay: Mark Waters 
The characters in the pitch-black comedy "The House of Yes" have so many 
family scandals and disturbing secrets hanging over their heads that 
they make the Kennedy clan seem like the Waltons -- an odd comparison, 
because the Kennedy legacy plays a very active part here. This 
five-person adaptation of Wendy MacLeod's stage play mines 
extraordinarily dark material to get its laughs, and whether you find 
the finished product distasteful or uproarious, it's unarguably daring. 
Parker Posey, a versatile actress who frequently appears in independent 
films, has the lead here. She plays Jackie-O Pascal, an unbalanced young 
woman who models herself in style and appearance after the same- 
nicknamed former First Lady. On the eve of Thanksgiving in 1983 (20
years after the Kennedy assassination), the Pascal household -- which 
includes her younger brother Anthony (Freddie Prinze, Jr.) and mother 
(Genevieve Bujold) -- are anxiously awaiting the arrival of Marty (Josh 
Hamilton), Jackie-O's twin brother who's visiting for several days. When 
Marty does show up, a hurricane begins to rage outside the Washington 
D.C. estate. There's also a storm inside, because Marty brings along his 
fiancee Lesly (Tori Spelling) -- a fiancee he has not yet told his 
family about. 
Jackie-O takes the news worst of all, locking herself in a bathroom and 
leaving Anthony and Mrs. Pascal to entertain Lesly with strange stories 
of which the less said, the better. After Jackie-O collects herself and 
joins the party downstairs, it becomes quite clear that this is going to 
be no ordinary Thanksgiving dinner. And when the lightening causes a 
power failure and Mrs. Pascal turns in for the night, leaving the 
remaining four to fend for themselves, events take a strange turn --
Jackie-O tries to jumpstart a bond she shares with her twin sibling and 
Anthony does his best at attempting to seduce Lesly. 
You get a reaction from "The House of Yes" -- apparently called such 
because inside, just about anything goes -- not too long after it opens, 
around the time Mrs. Pascal makes an unprintable reference about the 
nature of Jackie-O and Marty's birth. It becomes quite clear then what 
warped territory it's going to explore, and you either find it absurdly 
audacious or downright unholy. If you fall into the former category, 
you've got to give director/screenwriter Mark Waters credit for having
the guts to milk many belly laughs from such perverse material. If 
you're in the latter, "The House of Yes" will likely make you very 
uncomfortable. 
A small but priceless cast backs Waters up all the way. Posey clearly 
has fun with her extremely topsy-turvy role, and her delivery alone is 
worth the Special Recognition for Acting award she received at this 
year's Sundance Film Festival. Hamilton is well-used as her foil; coming 
from such duds as "With Honors" the people-who-eat-people flick "Alive," 
Marty Pascal is probably his best part yet. Bujold does nice, eccentric 
work even if her character is underwritten, and Spelling does an 
interesting riff on her goody-goody "Beverly Hills 90210" image. If 
there's a scene-stealer, though, it's definitely Prinze, who goes from 
giddy naivety to deadpan deviousness with appealing enthusiasm. 
The fall of "The House of Yes" is that it comes apart at a climax which 
attempts to tie too many sketchy plot details (Mr. Pascal's mysterious 
disappearance the day Kennedy was shot, for instance) with a conclusion 
that's dramatically unsatisfying. Unfortunately, I can't say exactly how
without giving away a few key plot details that are meant to shock. 
Let's just say the last 15 minutes or so are a cheap attempt to wrap 
things up all too quickly. That's a shame, because all of these 
characters are delicious creations, each of whom sustains enough 
personality for his or her own film. 
It's not likely that any of this matters, though, because not a lot of 
people will see "The House of Yes" anyway, and therefore it should only 
spend a few weeks in the art houses before being remembered as one of 
Miramax's more outrageous indie features. Mainstream audiences won't see
it because of it plays such potentially troubling matters for laughs 
(remember "Citizen Ruth"?). The rest of us -- and we know who we are -- 
will go, and generally have a good time. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Welcome To Sarajevo (1997)
WELCOME TO SARAJEVO
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Based on the true-life account recorded by British journalist Michael Nicholson 
in the book "Natasha's Story," "Welcome" tells the story of a group of varied 
war reporters stationed in Sarajevo in 1992. Nicholson's film counterpart comes 
in the form of Michael Henderson (Stephen Dillane), a veteran television 
correspondent who, along side of his colleagues (including Woody Harrelson, 
Emily Lloyd and Shallow Grave's Kerry Fox), are angered and perplexed as to how 
Sarajevan troubles are taking backseat to the Royal Family's marital 
difficulties on the news and in the papers. Henderson then sets his sights on 
the impoverished, victimized children at a local orphanage in hopes that people 
will realize how monumental their situation is.
"Sarajevo"'s visual spectacle is so fierce and gritty that rarely does five 
minutes go by without the urge to look away from the screen becoming a tad 
unbearable. Of course, just because a movie is difficult to watch -- and this 
one is -- doesn't make it bad by any means (need I say more than "Schindler's 
List"?), but sights are really the movie's only powerful element. Characters and 
their relationships here are so blank and underdeveloped that they barely 
register; try to tell the female parts from one another -- I dare you. The 
film's eventual focus is on Henderson's effort to rescue a young, saucer-eyed 
urchin (Emira Nusevic), but their scenes are hurried and half-formed. It's hard, 
then, to invest much emotional baggage in the potentially harrowing moments that 
are devoted to them. 
At least we can be happy that "Welcome to Sarajevo" doesn't degenerate into 
blatant manipulation. The screenplay, while frustrating in patches, does allow 
for noble performances from its cast -- especially Dillane and newcomer Nusevic 
-- and provide a handful of memorable (though not necessarily in a good way) 
segments. Technical credits are also fantastic; it's impossible to tell what 
shots are genuine and which ones aren't, giving the movie a very appropriate, 
documentary-like feel. It just seems as though the film is uneven to the point 
of disappointment. "Welcome to Sarajevo" is an extremely admirable effort on 
behalf of its filmmakers, and I'm afraid that's nearly all it is. 

Title
Review for For Richer or Poorer (1997)
Universal / 1:56 / 1997 / PG-13 (language, sex jokes)
Cast: Tim Allen; Kirstie Alley; Jay O. Sanders; Michael Lerner; Wayne 
Knight; Larry Miller; Miguel A. Nunez; Megan Cavanagh 
Director: Bryan Spicer 
Screenplay: Jana Howington; Steve LuKanic 
Although "Home Improvement"'s Tim Allen and "Veronica's Closet"'s Kirstie 
Alley know success on the small screen, their collaborative efforts are 
marred in translation to the silver one with "For Richer or Poorer." Both 
stars are in top form here, and they even manage to pull off a few very 
funny bits before the film exchanges silly spoofing of the Amish culture 
in for sloppy sentimentality involving love and marriage. Let's put it 
this way -- there's a reason it's called "For Richer or Poorer" and not 
"Madcap Mennonite Misadventures." 
Allen and Alley play Brad and Caroline Sexton, an obnoxious, wealthy New 
York couple on the verge of a not-too-amicable divorce around the time of 
their 10th wedding anniversary. But before they can officially untie the 
knot, the IRS comes looking for them -- it seems their slimy accountant 
(Wayne Knight, Newman from "Seinfeld") has stolen $5 million from their 
accounts and set it up to look like tax fraud. They steal a cab and end 
up crashing in Intercourse, Pennsylvania (ha, ha) -- Amish country -- 
where they masquerade as a prominent farm family's cousins from the 
Midwest (but where'd they get their duds?). What follows is a semi-parody 
of "Witness," as the Sextons lay low with the Amish and grow accustomed 
to the hard-working simplicity of their everyday lives. 
In a fish-out-of-water comedy, taking the fish out of water around the 
40-minute mark isn't a very good idea -- especially when we're not given 
very many reasons to like either of our protagonists. But Allen and Alley 
(why is he billed above the title while she's not?) do get away with some 
great one-liners and nifty sight gags, the best of which are probably 
worth sticking around for. There's a hilarious dinner sequence where Brad 
and Caroline invent reasons for the liberal rules of their cluster to 
appease their inquiring "relatives" (the justification for Brad's 
clean-shaven face -- "minute lice") as well as a funny running gag 
involving a 4:45 a.m. wake-up call and what I believe is the very first 
Amish fashion show ever captured on film. 
Basically, "For Richer or Poorer" is okay whenever it lets its incognito 
couple go for each other's throats, which better explains that sinking 
feeling that occurs during a needless detour towards schmaltz in its 
final third. We're asked to swallow that the warm, intimate values of the 
Amish lifestyle melt Brad and Caroline's hearts and cause them to 
re-evaluate their relationship, a big, misguided no-no considering what 
shallow jerks they're depicted as until then. Other inconsistencies and 
flaws pop up, the cap-off of which is a surprisingly unfunny blooper reel 
(a la "The Nutty Professor" and the "Grumpy Old Men" movies) that runs 
during the closing credits. Come on -- such a funny leading man and lady 
and you're telling me the best outtake you've got is Alley slipping and 
sliding in pigpen mud? 
Still, for such a stinky story, Allen and Alley are constantly engaging; 
he's put to good use after the respectively poor and even-worse "The 
Santa Clause" and "Jungle 2 Jungle," while she makes quite an 
eye-catching comeback after a several-year movie drought (her last big 
role, I believe, was that of a chain-smoking scientist in 1995's 
outlandish "Village of the Damned" remake). The real Amish have some sort 
of rule about not being captured on film, and aside from Allen and Alley, 
"For Richer or Poorer" and fellow faith-offender "Kingpin" (the spoof of 
several summers ago which cast Randy Quaid as an Amish bowling protégé) 
just don't do much to prove that the creed needs a makeover. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for B*A*P*S (1997)
New Line / 1:30 / 1997 / PG-13 (language, crude humor, big hair)
Cast: Halle Berry; Martin Landau; Natalie Desselle; Ian Richardson; Jonathan 
Fried; Luigi Amodeo; Troy Beyer 
Director: Robert Townsend 
Screenplay: Troy Beyer 
A fish-out-of-water movie where the fish have bigger fingernails than Barbra 
Streisand herself, "B.A.P.S." offers up some pretty funny moments before 
self-destructing in its second half. What starts out as a sly, nasty comedy 
takes its story a little too seriously, and serves up a earnest ending 
oozing with false sentiment. It's a good thing "B.A.P.S." has a solid 
comedic team in stars Halle Berry ("Executive Decision," "The Rich Man's 
Wife") and Natalie Desselle ("Set It Off"), or the final stretch of this 
movie would be near intolerable. 
Berry and Desselle are respectively cast as homegirls Nisi and Mickey, two 
greasy spoon waitresses from Decatur, Georgia, who have big ideas and bigger 
hair -- not to mention the gold teeth and unsightly wardrobe. After learning 
that MTV is looking for the "Video Dance Girl of the Year," and that the 
winner will be awarded $10,000, the dynamically-dressed and -tressed duo 
drop everything and catch a flight to Los Angeles. After their dreams are 
shattered when they lose the contest, a chauffeur takes them to a swank 
Beverly Hills mansion, where a plan is hatched. The estate's owner, Mr. 
Blakemore (Martin Landau, here perhaps to pick up a paycheck?), is 
terminally ill, and his nephew (Jonathan Fried) offers Nisi the same amount 
of cash to stick around for a week and impersonate the granddaughter of his 
long lost love, hoping to lift the old man's spirits during his final days. 
No bonus points for guessing Nisi and Mickey are going to reform Blakemore 
and his home with their sassy, snappy ways -- that development is 
telegraphed from the movie's get-go. Still, the predictability wouldn't have 
mattered as long as "B.A.P.S." understands it's a spoof first and foremost. 
Unfortunately, the plot, as scant as it is, turns into something solemn, 
throwing silliness out the window for dumb twists and a finale that actually 
asks us to emote. "B.A.P.S.," which stands for black American princesses, is 
much more successful when it stays far away from fairy tale territory. 
There are quite a few good moments to be salvaged from the eventual mess, 
though. Nisi and Mickey's arrival into high society is amusing, as are their 
misadventures with his crusty, no-nonsense English butler (is there any 
other kind?) Manly, a character foil played marvelously by Ian Richardson. 
Even when the going gets tough, the on-target acting by Berry and Desselle 
is pleasant enough to keep you from dozing off. "B.A.P.S." ain't quite 
C.R.A.P. (oh, come on -- I couldn't resist), but thanks to confused 
storytelling, it comes a little too close to banality. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)

SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
While the wrenching intro is going to shock some of the more unassuming
audience members into sudden hysteria, it at least instantly announces
"Saving Private Ryan"'s agenda -- war isn't pretty, and Spielberg doesn't
waste any time pretending it is. Still, as extremely difficult as the
combat is to watch, it's just as hard to divert your concentration, thus
desensitizing viewers to the alarming horrors we will witness during the
next two-and-a-half hours. The movie demolishes the fine line between
observing and participating without any kind of preparation or warning;
the only way to capture the realism of violent battle is to drop you right
in the center of it, and this amazing film unapologetically does just
that. For those of us who have never experienced firsthand warfare,
"Saving Private Ryan" is very likely the closest that we'll ever get. 
Part of the afore-mentioned D-Day attack is overseen by Captain John
Miller (Tom Hanks), a quiet, resourceful man whose heroism only distances
him from the serene life he lead before enlisting -- "With every man I
kill, the farther away from home I feel," he says. Though Miller's forces
are victorious at Normandy, their triumph does not come without a
staggering human cost. Among the lives lost at Omaha Beach are two
brothers, a third sibling of whom has also fallen, leaving a fourth who
might still be alive somewhere deep in French territory. When the
government learns that the boys' mother will be receiving a trio of death
notices on the same day, they assign Miller to lead seven soldiers on a
mission even more dangerous than what they have previously faced -- to
travel behind enemy lines and retrieve the remaining sibling, one Private
James Ryan, at any cost. But tragedy begets tragedy, and Miller's team
questions the significance of risking their collective necks just to
rescue a single person that might already be dead. 
While it's perhaps unfair to compare "Saving Private Ryan" to a movie
like, say, "Armageddon," the association does in fact reveal a large part
of what's missing in film today -- genuine characters and stories that
make you care. While Armageddon's cast is composed of ciphers, some of
whom are killed off for obligation's sake, "Saving Private Ryan" boasts a
canvas of thoughtful, substantive individuals. When death is portrayed
here, you feel deep heartache and sorrow, not some sort of manufactured
sadness. Not surprisingly, Spielberg and screenwriter Robert Rodat ("Fly
Away Home") never stoop to exploitation or manipulation when they portray
the casualties of war, and the result is an intensely exhilarating
experience unlike anything you've seen since "Schindler's List." That
connection isn't just being made because Spielberg directed "Schindler" --
these films are arguably the two most important motion pictures of this
decade. 
Tom Hanks' performance is more moving than his Oscar-winning turns in
"Philadelphia" and "Forrest Gump" put together, and that's quite a feat
considering that John Miller isn't a very flashy role. But Hanks installs
emotional dignity in Miller's calm, commanding presence; when he finally
breaks down after an especially traumatic episode, you will too. With a
few exceptions like Tom Sizemore (as Hanks' devoted sergeant) and Matt
Damon (who shows up late in the game), the fine ensemble is made up of
mostly-unknown young actors. Giovanni Ribisi, a recurring guest star on
"Friends" (playing Lisa Kudrow's daffy brother), provides the film with
one of its most affecting moments, while Barry Pepper is striking as an
excellent marksman who prays as he picks off enemies. Jeremy Davies
("Spanking the Monkey") is the best of the bunch; perfectly cast as a
timid, violence-shy soldier recruited in the operation for his linguist
skills, he makes a powerful foil for the audience. Also strong are Adam
Goldberg, Vin Diesel and Edward Burns, the multi-talented guy behind "The
Brothers McMullen" and "She's the One." 
With "Saving Private Ryan," Steven Spielberg has fashioned another
monumental tale about humanity and self-sacrifice among the horrors of
war. He's done the unthinkable, really, since this work is every bit as
profound as "Schindler," his uncontended masterpiece. If anyone criticizes
"Saving Private Ryan" as being "too violent," then they've sadly missed
the anti-war point. Even the quiet, meditative moments boil with the
threat of spontaneous carnage, all to create a film that transcends its
medium --thanks to Spielberg's potently graphic depictions of historical
bloodshed and Janusz Kaminski's gritty, you-are-there cinematography, you
don't just watch this movie, you live it. A guaranteed lock on 1998 top
tens, updated American Film Institute lists and Oscar ballots next March
-- yes, it's that unforgettable -- "Saving Private Ryan" is, in a word,
phenomenal.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
VIRUS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Given the set-up, "Virus" sounds like yet another "Aliens" rip-off with 
a germ of an interesting idea thrown in for good measure. But what's an 
"Aliens" rip-off without a rag-tag team of assorted grunts and 
mercenaries to stop by this floating haunted house to infiltrate and 
investigate? "Virus"' comes in the form of high-seas scavengers who have 
just lost the barge they were tugging back to a presumable net gain. 
When the Irish cap'n (hammy Donald Sutherland, sounding like he got his 
accent inside a Lucky Charms box) and his motley crew spy the 
evil-infested boat, it's salvage salvation. Silly mortals. 
Starting here, the movie adheres to strict genre predictability. A lone 
survivor (Polish actress Joanna Pacula, very good here) is discovered 
and provides requisite plot exposition. People venture into dark 
corridors armed only with flashlights and never return. Sutherland's 
navigator, played by Jamie Lee Curtis, gets her Sigourney Weaver mojo 
workin' and guides the good guys in an attempt to kick interplanetary 
butt. Cast members get killed off in reverse credits order. It's a good 
thing director John Bruno is a skilled special effects craftsman, 
because "Virus"' technical terrors offer eye-popping amusement even when 
the story takes frequent naps from creativity. 
Like its own creepy creatures, "Virus" ends up cobbled together out of 
bits and pieces from similarly-themed fright flicks. In some respects, 
it almost plays like a remake of last January's awful "Deep Rising," but 
this movie is better than that one because a formless mass of 
otherworldly intelligence is a more compelling adversary - and story 
concept - than some anonymous sea monster that suddenly surfaces from 
the ocean's briny bowels. Curtis is also a fun heroine to have on your 
side (especially when she's in "Halloween" go-girl mode) but the manner 
in which she finally books it to safety is best described as 
plot-convenient. 
The likeable William Baldwin tags along as a swarthy engineer and 
Curtis' leading man, but there's no time for romance; their sole 
intention is survival. But what about the film's intentions? If you 
crave science-fiction, don't mind story holes, logic lapses and genre 
copy-catting and have 90 minutes to burn - the movie is pretty 
well-paced despite its ultimately squandered potential - then this 
"Virus" is worth catching. Everyone else, however, is better off staying 
in bed, drinking lots of fluids and popping some antibiotics.

Title
Review for Washington Square (1997)
Hollywood / 1:55 / 1997 / PG (intense childbirth, brief sexuality)
Cast: Jennifer Jason Leigh; Ben Chaplin; Albert Finney; Maggie Smith;
Judith Ivey
Director: Agnieszka Holland 
Screenplay: Carol Doyle 
Because Academy Award nominations are just around the corner, autumn
is the one season that brings around a surplus of big "small" films --
motion pictures that may boast strong credentials but rely more on
powerful story-telling than showy special effects to wow you
over. Most of these movies are period pieces, and most of these period
pieces have been among the best filmmaking of our time -- 1993's "The
Age of Innocence," 1994's "Little Women," 1995's "Sense and
Sensibility" and last November's "The English Patient." This year's
hopeful appears to be "Washington Square," and whether or not it's got
the potential to be Oscar bait has yet to be seen due to its
early-fall release date. But don't let timing throw you off --
"Washington Square" deserves a whole mantlepiece of awards.
Adapted from the Henry James novel, "Washington Square" tells the
story of Catherine Sloper (Jennifer Jason Leigh), an heiress who lives
in the titular New York estate in the mid-1850s. Catherine's birth
killed her mother, and she has spent her entire life listening to
resentful remarks from her wealthy physician father (Albert Finney)
that she holds none of his late wife's beauty, charm or
elegance. Catherine's whimsical Aunt Lavinia (Maggie Smith) dismisses
her brother-in-law's harsh criticism and tries to encourage her aloof,
shy niece.
At a party, Catherine attracts the attention of alluring wastrel
Morris Townsend (Ben Chaplin, last seen in "The Truth About Cats and
Dogs"). Overcome with the prospect of a loving relationship, she
whole-heartedly commits herself to Morris. Mr. Sloper, however, has
other ideas, namely that the young, penniless man has ulterior motives
-- that instead of wanting her, he might want her money -- and
threatens to cut Catherine off financially if she marries him.
After Hollywood's recent obsession with Jane Austen ("Clueless,"
"Emma," "Persuasion" and "Sense and Sensibility"), it's completely
reasonable that they should move onto Henry James -- "Washington
Square" is the second James adaptation (after last winter's "The
Portrait of a Lady") in less than a year, and his "The Wings of the
Dove" is scheduled for release next month. Those put off by
"Portrait"'s bizarre execution needn't worry at this James go-around,
because "Washington Square" is told in a much more accessible,
straightforward manner. The story is extremely easy to be pulled into
because, presumably, we can all relate to the awkwardness and
confusion Catherine feels.
As far as acting is concerned, "Washington Square" is flawless. Leigh,
usually cast as problem-plagued yuppies, makes a strong case as to why
she should do period films more often. She's exhibits a strong,
emotional presence, and when her heart breaks, so does ours. Smith
steals the movie with her dotty characterization; when Lavinia
secretly meets Morris in a house of ill repute, her suggestive
mannerisms brighten the proceedings up to an unbelievably lively
level. Chaplin and Finney are excellent in very difficult roles. Their
subtle, focused acting allows us to read their motivations differently
at various times. Is Morris offering pursuit for a monetary gain? Or
is Mr. Sloper simply underestimating his daughter's beauty? Chaplin
and Finney are so good at masking their impetuses that when these
questions are finally answered, it's a shock.
Also on display in the film is my wonderful Baltimore locale, with
Union Square making a surprisingly exceptional substitute for
Washington Square. (Who knew how gorgeous the place would look with
all of the drug needles swept up?) To be fair, though, everything in
this movie sparkles with period detail; the costumes, the art
direction, the set design, the original score -- they all contribute
to every accurate, beautiful spectacle. All of the high-level
technical credits never allow "Washington Square" to look bad for a
single moment -- even a scene where Catherine collapses in the rain on
a muddy street is a sigh-worthy sight.
Director Agnieszka Holland showed off her visual prowess for adapting
the classics a few summers ago with "The Secret Garden." That was a
nice movie, but with "Washington Square," she has created a place to
go back to again and again. Eloquence can often hide missteps, but not
here -- it heightens the film's uncountable strengths. From opening
credits to final scene -- which, by the way, is done with
applause-inducing originality -- "Washington Square" is an honestly
majestic gem.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Warner Bros. / 1:45 / 1999 / R (language, shark-attack gore)
Cast: Thomas Jane; Saffron Burrows; Samuel L. Jackson, LL Cool J;
Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Michael Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie; Aida Turturro
Director: Renny Harlin
Screenplay: Duncan Kennedy; Wayne Powers; Donna Powers
For director Renny Harlin, it's good to go back in the water. Four years
after his pirate debacle "Cutthroat Island" drowned at the box office
and sank a studio - Carolco Films - Harlin is again plundering a mostly
oceanic setting in "Deep Blue Sea." The surprising result: a movie with
bite, and not just because this loud-and-proud thriller plays very much
like "Jaws" on crank. A set-up that sounds supremely goofy still allows
for plenty of monster-flick fun, from the game performances to the gory
special effects to the grisly body count.
Forgive "Deep Blue Sea" of its wince-inducing exposition, which makes it
seem destined for straight-to-video oblivion: Scientists aboard a
floating laboratory in the Pacific, desperately searching for an
Alzheimer's cure, have genetically enhanced mako sharks for their groovy
brain tissue, only the test subjects turn on them after inadvertently
gaining supersmarts from the experiment. Silly mortals. It's not nice to
fool Mother Nature, especially if Mother Nature is 25 feet long, 8,000
pounds heavy, irritable, fast and hungry.
These fierce fishies escape following an early mishap involving a
gurney, a helicopter and wet walkways that reduces the principle cast by
nearly a third and can also stand among the finest sequences Harlin has
ever helmed - which is saying a lot, given that he's also overseen some
uniquely eye-popping stunts in "Die Hard 2," "Cliffhanger" and "The Long
Kiss Goodnight." The rest of "Deep Blue Sea" takes the form of a
"Titanic"-"Jurassic Park" hybrid as our rag-tag team of heroes avoids
snack status while escaping from their slowly submerging facility.
Character players like Michael Rapaport, Aida Turturro and Stellan
Skarsgĺrd are guaranteed goners as various nondescript hands, while the
great Samuel L. Jackson - the movie's sole recognizable name - caps his
stint as the study's bigshot bankroller with his typical dramatic fire.
He and Oscar always seem to be mentioned in the same breath, but not
this time. The real stories here the scary computer-generated and robot
beasties, thrilling wall-to-wall carnage and a breakthrough performance
from indie find Thomas Jane.
Jane - built, blonde and a Baltimore native to boot - makes for one
memorable action figure, especially in scenes where his stoic but
charismatic wrangler faces danger and returns a champ. He's the guy
audiences will most want to see pull through without becoming human
sushi, though LL Cool J rates a close second. As a religious cook who
knows his way around a kitchen, this amiable rapper-cum-actor does for
"Deep Blue Sea" what he did for "Halloween: H20" last summer - energize
an effective creep show with a comic dimension.
But the ringmaster of this crafty creature feature is still Harlin. He
knows when to comfortably cater to genre conventions - death-defying
dangles, close shaves, situation-appropriate kiss-off lines - and when
to stray from cliches, as evidenced by several tricks and treats thatll
take many viewers by surprise. The pinnacle of these - a sudden,
terrifying attack not, for once, foreshadowed by a stinging musical
score or a tracking camera shot - is delicious, disorienting and
altogether unexpected, just like the sum of "Deep Blue Sea."
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
WING COMMANDER
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The movie, then, is a missed opportunity for director Chris Roberts, who 
created the original, groundbreaking PC incarnation of "Wing Commander" 
back in 1990. How an interactive brainchild so revered could end up such 
a cinematic pile of junk under the helm of the same guy is a 
head-scratcher. "Wing Commander"'s story, credited to Roberts and 
screenwriter Kevin Droney, is clueless chaos melding incoherent 
narrative and unoriginal ideas. It rips off the finest films of its 
genre, Top Gun and, in one scene, even those spiffy "stereoscopic 
freeze" Gap commercials. 
Set in 2654, "Wing Commander" stars Freddie Prinze Jr. as a daredevil 
cosmos cowboy who hopes to be a great fighter pilot like his father 
before him. Along the way, he plays kissy-face with his stoic superior 
(Saffron Burrows) at the new galaxy hangout where he's posted, comes to 
terms with bigots who resent him for his "Pilgrim" heritage (don't ask), 
and goes on a top-secret mission involving the "jump coordinates" (what, 
no Death Star plans?) of a nasty alien race known as the Kilrathi. Or 
something like that. Given the immensely confusing activity, it's hard 
to tell. 
On the other hand, what's easy to see is that "Wing Commander" is a big 
old mess. The lame dialogue strains, filled with such original lines as 
"Don't you die on me!", "Battle stations!" and repeated (and frequently 
unanswered) calls for a "Medic!" Action sequences fizzle. The character 
conflict garners unintentional giggles. The sole source of suspense here 
is what these Kilrathi creeps look like, as they're kept out of view 
until the concluding 15 minutes. Imagine bearded Siamese cats crossed 
with something from a 50s Roger Corman cheapie and you've got a good 
idea. 
Little but techno-babble happens for an hour, and then it's as if "Wing 
Commander" tries to do too much at once; when it appears as though the 
movie's about to show signs of a pulse, it instead provides a hilarious 
touch of human drama culminating with a use for a bulldozer that has 
probably never been seen in this kind of space camp before. Matthew 
Lillard, featured prominently in said sequence, is cast as Prinze's 
hotshot partner, and though the two are fine young actors - recently 
paired in the hit "She's All That" - they're fighting more than 
otherworldly evil here. 
Rumor has it that "Wing Commander" was slated as a later-in-the-year 
release, bumped up to capitalize off this hot casting coup as well as 
the premiere of the new "Star Wars: Episode I" trailer. But in my 
audience, there were no females present to make goo-goo eyes at Prinze 
or Lillard, and many a member exited after the much-ballyhooed sneak 
peek. Since most cineplexes won't be granting refunds to the latter 
contingency, "Commander" might rake in some dough, but be warned: The 
high wears off as soon as the coming attraction gives way to the feature 
presentation.

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
PECKER
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
"Pecker" gets its title from the nickname of its main character, played 
by "Terminator 2"'s Edward Furlong. Called such for his childhood habit 
of eating like a bird and not because of any "Boogie Nights"-esque 
endowment (though that detail _would_ feel right at home in a Waters 
film), the 18-year-old simpleton is at his happiest while taking amateur 
snapshots of his family, friends and just about everything else around 
him - even rats copulating in a tipped-over trash can. When savvy New 
York art dealer Rorey (luminous Lily Taylor) stumbles across one of his 
makeshift shows in the sandwich shop where he works, she loves what she 
sees, and Pecker and his pictures become an overnight success in the 
trendy, pretentious world of Big Apple artistes. 
Plucking Pecker's kin out of blue-collarville is just the icing on the 
proverbial cake, largely because each character is such a genuine comic 
creation on his or her own. Mom (Mary Kay Place) manages a thrift store 
where the homeless get unsightly fashion tips, dad (Mark Joy) fixates 
over regional mandates regarding pubic hair while tending the family bar 
and kid sibling Little Chrissy (Lauren Hulsey) is a sugar-dependant who 
devours Domino straight from the sack. Grandma (Jean Schertler) divides 
her time between maintaining the title of "Baltimore's pit beef queen" 
and handling a statue of the Virgin Mary like it's a dummy in a really 
bad ventriloquist act - "Full of grace!" it screeches, whilst the 
puppeteers lips move all too conspicuously in the background. 
But it's the perfectly deadpan Christina Ricci and full-tilt bonkers 
Martha Plimpton who rack up the films highest laugh quotients, 
respectively cast as Pecker's gal pal Shelly and big sis Tina. Ricci has 
a handful of choice moments, whether running a local laundromat like 
Patton or waxing poetic over "the brilliant green of a grass stain." 
Tina, an emcee at a gay club called the Fudge Palace, is the most 
brilliantly warped personality here, and Plimpton, unrecognizable under 
a black Judds hairdo, has a loud and proud time bringing her to life. 
Furlong's limited range is evident when acting opposite burgeoning 
thesps like Ricci and Brandon Sexton III (who plays his klepto best 
bud), but he still radiates a goofily charismatic vibe, readily getting 
into the wacky Waters swing of things. 
There are a few lulls to the comedy (there are a few lulls to _every_ 
comedy), especially after Pecker's instant fame adversely affects all 
those around him you're still laughing, though not nearly as much. But 
this is only a slight flaw in the long run, since the movie regains 
momentum as it nears its giddy conclusion, a big party sequence that 
brings all the players and their unusual obsessions together - love the 
twisted new addiction given to Little Chrissy. Waters deserves as much 
credit as his completely game actors for keeping "Pecker"'s many running 
jokes fresh and funny each time they're rehashed; a filmmaker less 
imaginative and experienced with humorous crudity might run all this 
straight into the ground. 
The most surprising thing about "Pecker" is how sweet it is in its 
dealings with familial bonds, a focus Waters often employs. This could 
lead some diehard fans to accuse the writer/director of softening with 
age bona fide Waters jolts (including a sudden close-up anatomy lesson 
and a taboo stripper practice known as "teabagging") number relatively 
few here, and they're not going to shock anyone who bore witness to Ben 
Stiller's zipped-up cojones in "About Mary." But there's no shortage of 
other assorted crotch jokes with the kinder, gentler Waters; its just 
that you might have to make a trip to the video store if you want to see 
him at his nastiest. For everyone else, however, "Pecker" is a welcome 
pseudo-change.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Miramax / 2:06 / 1997 / R 
Cast: Matt Damon; Robin Williams; Minnie Driver; Ben Affleck; 
Stellan Skarsgĺrd; Casey Affleck; Cole Hauser 
Director: Gus Van Sant 
Screenplay: Ben Affleck; Matt Damon 
Just in time for the holidays comes "Good Will Hunting," a 
well-cast drama intent on delivering that warm-and-gooey feeling, 
so much that it's a surprise to learn this wannabe-uplifter comes 
from usually-dark director Gus Van Sant. A December 25th release 
date actually couldn't be more appropriate, because this movie is 
so much like the big Christmas dinner you'll be downing on that day 
-- it certainly looks appetizing, but it'll leave you overstuffed, 
even ending with a send-off so drawn out that it's the cinematic 
equivalent of L-tryptophan. 
Good's icky title refers to its main character -- Will Hunting 
(Matt Damon), a janitor at the Massachusetts Institute of 
Technology. Will's secretly much brighter than most of the students 
attending there; said attribute is revealed after esteemed 
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgĺrd from "Breaking the Waves") 
posts a too-tough math problem on a blackboard for his students to 
solve, and only Will is bright enough to crack the answer. 
Initially, Will and Lambeau are rivals, but the latter comes to the 
former's aid after the young ruffian is jailed on an 
all-too-frequent assault charge. 
Lambeau has a couple conditions for keeping Will on the streets: 
One, they work side by side on math theory; two, Will see a 
psychiatrist on a regular basis. After several unsuccessful 
pairings, a spark is ignited with unorthodox therapist Sean McGuire 
(Robin Williams), an old friend of Lambeau's. Will's time is then 
divided between being helped by McGuire and hanging out with his 
old Boston buddies, namely best pal Chuckie (immensely likeable Ben 
Affleck from "Chasing Amy"). There's also time for a romantic 
subplot involving Skylar (Minnie Driver), a beautiful, brainy 
Harvard student who falls for Will. 
Van Sant, who last directed the explosive media satire "To Die 
For," keeps things moving in a conventional way. The movie bears 
none of his eccentric trademarks; just when you think things are 
about to get engaging, they stay steady with disinteresting 
development. The screenplay, co-written by Damon and Affleck, is 
pretty standard; they know how to create compelling characters but 
don't do much compelling with them. At best, "Good Will Hunting" is 
watchable, but it's rarely moving or sentimental. 
If the heart of "Good Will Hunting" is the relationship between 
Will and McGuire, then it's a shockingly empty one. Their first few 
sessions, as they begin challenging each other's minds, hold 
promise, but future interaction is formulaic, predictable and 
uninvolving. Far better is the screen time devoted to Will with 
Skylar and Chuckie. There might be a better movie there, but the 
problem is that this development is secondary to Will's therapeutic 
process. Damon and Affleck are close friends in real life, and 
their chemistry is apparent, adding much potency to scenes that 
aren't very important. Driver, as she did in last April's "Grosse 
Pointe Blank," turns what could have been a throwaway role into 
something special; I found her scenes with Damon to be far more 
concentrated than anything else in the film. 
Because "Good Will Hunting" is a performance-driven piece, I can 
recommend it. There's an abundance of good acting here, including 
Williams scoring big with an atypically serious role; he does that 
goofy shtick so often (most recently in tripe like "Flubber" and 
"Fathers' Day") that it's easy to forget what a good dramatic 
player he is. It's just that there's little emotional investment 
made in the story. When "Good Will Hunting" stacks on a plethora of 
stirring climactic events, it's akin to going to a party where you 
don't know anyone and something disastrous happens -- you really 
just don't care. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
Paramount / 1:32 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, sexuality)
Cast: Steve Martin; Goldie Hawn; John Cleese; Mark McKinney; Oliver
Hudson
Director: Sam Weisman
Screenplay: Marc Lawrence
They often call it the city that never sleeps, and now they have a
reason. In "The Out-of-Towners," a remake of the 1970 Neil Simon
original, Steve Martin and Goldie Hawn play the titular travelers who
kvetch, flail and mug their way through a seemingly simple stay in the
Big Apple that turns into a zany obstacle course. Since New York City of
the '90s is friendlier than ever, this ultimate in tourist incompetence
- not assorted miscreants, perverts and serial killers - tidily updates
every native's worst nightmare. But as every farce enthusiast's
dream-come-true, the film falls short. Way short.
So, why the near-endorsement? Because Martin and Hawn, gifted comedians
who click both here and in 1992's much better "Housesitter," are capable
of turning even the lamest shtick into worthy shenanigans. When their
demure Ohio empty-nesters - hungry, strapped for cash and stranded in
metropolis for 24 hours - crash a sexaholics meeting for the free
pastry, an unoriginal scene racks up a solid laugh quotient. And the
movie has a wicked weapon in its casting of John Cleese as a
shades-of-Basil Fawlty hotel manager. A sequence that finds him
promenading in a frock and stiletto heels to "Bad Girls" might alone be
worth the admission price.
Martin and Hawn's non-stop outrageous fortune isn't totally without its
moments, just uneven enough to make for strictly scattered success.
Mischief like dangling from building balconies, an auto collision at
Fulton Fish Market, drug-induced traipsing around Central Park and a
spontaneous bout of passion on Tavern on the Green are too obvious to
score as intended set-pieces. "The Out-of-Towners" mines far funnier
territory when it preys on reliable crises involving rental cars,
baggage claim, road maps and monetary shortages. Some even ring true.
A dose of gloppy human emotion accompanies these occasionally
diminishing returns, creating a very different tone than the darkly
humorous bad luck that befell leads Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis in
Simon's "Out-of-Towners." There, Lemmon's impetus for seeing the Empire
State was a job interview he didn't necessarily need. Here, Martin has a
similar career opportunity awaiting, only this poor schmoe - recently
laid-off and keeping secrets from the wife - _must_ nail it. This
subplot paves the way for the moment-of-truth as his cover is blown,
followed by a loud argument, then a warm reconciliation scene, all
unnecessary. You get the idea.
Thanks to these climactic sentimental sidetracks, the film ends on an
overt weak note it had otherwise avoided, what with the delight
sustained by Martin's dilapidating sense of control, Hawn's absurd
antics, Cleese's impressive leg hikes and the sporadic hits in the
hit-or-miss gag ratio. "The Out-of-Towners" ultimately lets its assets
down even further with a whimpering finale, and as a result, some
viewers are likely to develop a reaction parallel to its much-maligned
setting: Nice place to visit, but I wouldn't want to live there.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
KISSING A FOOL
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
"Kissing a Fool" opens with a mystery wedding at a mansion in Chicago's North 
Shore. The estate belongs to a publishing mogul named Linda (Bonnie Hunt), and 
the bride is pretty, witty Sam Andrews (Mili Avital), an editor who works for 
her. The groom's identity remains an enigma until the film's final segment, but 
we know from the get-go it's one of two best friends -- cynical, womanizing 
sportscaster Max Abbitt (Schwimmer) or on-the-rebound, touchy novelist Jay 
Murphy (Jason Lee). The story unfolds in flashback, beginning with a whirlwind 
courtship between Max and Sam that leads to their ultra-fast engagement. Max 
loves Sam, but grows hesitant upon realizing that marriage is, or is supposed to 
be, a life-long commitment. (Duh.) Acting impulsively, he enlists Jay's help to 
test Sam's loyalty, but doesn't expect Jay to fall for her in the process. 
Romantic comedies are hard to do because each one is basically rehashing the 
same premise over and over again, and that rule holds true for "Kissing a Fool" 
-- very little of what goes on is remarkably new or challenging. But it's the 
way the material is handled that makes the film so appealing; the screenplay 
flows like various components of "Seinfeld," "Ally McBeal" and, yes, "Friends" 
rolled up into a comfortable comedic crisis. Occasionally, the dialogue and 
situations resemble something from the pens of Kevin Smith or Quentin Tarantino. 
One segment in particular finds Max and Sam telling Jay two wildly different 
versions of what happened on a date the previous evening, and we get to see both 
sides acted out; the capper to this is probably worth the admission price alone. 
Sore spots include a climax that's a little heavier than it should have been, 
plus a framing device that would be downright irritating if not for the 
gleefully acerbic presence of Bonnie Hunt. The only purpose for that latter 
glitch is to keep you guessing as to who really is going to end up with Sam, but 
look and listen closely to the movie's prologue and that mystery is solved. 
Flaws aside, "Kissing a Fool" is still a nice showcase for its performers. 
Israeli actress Avital ("StarGate") is effervescently charming, while Lee 
("Chasing Amy") does the whiny friend thing with earnest conviction despite a 
hairdo that never looks right on his head. But it's Schwimmer who turns doubt on 
its ear by acing a character that's the polar opposite of what he's known for. 
With projects like these, who needs "Friends"? 

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
VARSITY BLUES
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
At least there are worthwhile messages about self-confidence and winning 
not being everything buried amongst all the raunchy goings-on, but such 
morals will likely be lost on the movie's core audience of fratboys, 
users of Noxeema and avid "Teen Beat" readers. That last group will 
happily plunk down the admission price to watch "Dawson's Creek" hunk du 
jour James Van Der Beek literally tackle his first big-screen role, a 
high school football player whose moment to shine comes when his Texas 
team's star quarterback ("Pleasantville"'s Paul Walker) suffers an 
on-field injury. Think of Van Der Beek's dull Jonathan "Mox" Moxon as 
the anti-Dawson. 
Not exactly hot off the newfound fame, Mox clashes with a coach (Jon 
Voight) who'll do _anything_ to ensure the 23rd consecutive win of the 
state championships. That's the main storyline, but "Varsity Blues" 
veers off course on matters risque and ribald enough to ensure it 
doesn't flop like dissimilar gridiron flicks "Rudy" or "The Program." 
Mox's obese, good ol' boy pal Billy Bob (Ron Lester) dips pancakes in 
butter, guzzles maple syrup straight from the bottle and can't hold down 
booze! Mox's sexy biology instructor turns out to be a stripper who 
bumps and grinds to Van Halen's "Hot for Teacher" at a local strip club! 
Mox goes to a wild party where a couple does the nasty atop a vibrating 
washing machine! 
Mox is also lusted after by his ailing friend's girlfriend (Ali Larter), 
but this character seems to exist solely so "Varsity Blues" can stage a 
seduction scene complete with French kisses and Cool Whip. Sure, pretty 
Larter looks beguiling in her strategically-placed cream bikini, but a 
romantic temptation subplot is the last thing this movie needs, 
especially when it apparently doesn't have time or the creativity to 
resolve earlier ones (like a forgotten-about illness for Billy Bob and a 
black teammate who's trotted out only when a race card needs to be 
played). As you can probably guess, everything boils down to a 
testosterone-fueled big game where the stakes are high and the tension 
is non-existent. 
See, we know everything will turn out alright, mainly because "Varsity 
Blues" amounts to little more than a cinematic rendition of the ultimate 
male fantasy - jocks, chicks, Coors and scores of multiple varieties. 
It's nicely shot and well-performed by a mostly fresh-faced cast, but 
these assets go to waste because the movie's ambitions rarely amount to 
anything more than a "Porky's"-esque parade of boobs and liquor, liquor 
and boobs. (The most challenging shot prominently features both.) 
Perhaps there'd be nothing wrong with this were "Varsity Blues"' heart 
in the right place, but it's conflicted between body parts a foot above 
and a foot below.

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
New Line / 1:35 / 1998 / PG-13 (sex humor, language, Adam Sandler)
Cast: Adam Sandler; Drew Barrymore; Christine Taylor; Allen Covert; Angela 
Featherstone; Matthew Glave; Alexis Arquette; Frank Sivero; Christina Pickles 
Director: Frank Coraci 
Screenplay: Tim Herlihy 
After the not-so-fashionable '70s were affectionately captured on screen with 
"Boogie Nights" and "The Ice Storm," it was inevitable that someone would 
splash theaters with a loving tribute to the Me Decade. It's finally here -- 
only a few months after "Boogie" and "Ice" -- in the form of the 1985-set "The 
Wedding Singer," part pop culture nostalgia flick and part starring-vehicle 
for Adam Sandler, one of the more successful "Saturday Night Live" cast 
members to hit movie pay-dirt. As an Aqua Net-heavy flashback, "The Wedding 
Singer" is quite amusing, especially its Culture Club-laced soundtrack. But as 
a romantic comedy, what it really wants to be, the movie is pretty inept. 
Sandler plays Robbie Hart, the wedding singer of the title. Robbie's got quite 
a charismatic knack for turning the worst occasions -- like the scathing toast 
of a liquored-up groom's brother (Steve Buscemi, in a great bit of novelty 
casting) in the film's opening segment -- into a good time for all. But his 
personal life crashes when he's left at the altar by his fiancee (Angela 
Featherstone), and the humiliation and melancholia turn him into every 
reception-goer's worst nightmare. The sole bright spot in his world appears to 
be pretty, perky waitress Julia (Drew Barrymore), but she's on her way to 
weding a cheating Don Johnson-wannabe named Glenn (Matthew Glave). Connect the 
dots to see what happens. 
Some of what's wrong with "The Wedding Singer" can be summed up in two words: 
Adam Sandler. Sandler, whose 1994 "comedy" "Billy Madison" is still one of the 
decade's worst, just doesn't feel at home as the male lead in this type of 
film. In the recent "Happy Gilmore" (what, they didn't want to call this movie 
Robbie Hart?), he scored by playing a character with a raucous edge. It's 
fitting, then, that "The Wedding Singer" comes alive when it lets Sandler be 
his bawdy self, but when he waxes sentimental with Barrymore (which is most of 
the time), he oozes false earnestness -- it's as though he's secretly smirking 
at the material. Barrymore, though, is impossible to resist. She and Sandler 
do exhibit chemistry, and it's just enough to make you wish that he didn't 
seem so out of his element. 
What's even worse is how calculated the movie is at getting Robbie and Julia 
together. Glenn is shown to be such an arrogant, pompous jerk that it's never 
clear what exactly drew Julia to him in the first place. In one scene, Glenn 
spills the beans to Robbie about his cavorting ways and how he'll continue 
them into his marriage. That's not the best idea, considering how Glenn later 
confesses that he was aware Robbie had his eye on Julia the whole time. What 
did he hope to accomplish there? Perhaps "The Wedding Singer" would have been 
more effective in its romantic storyline had it taken a cue from "My Best 
Friend's Wedding," a film where Julia Roberts wanted to break up her pal's 
impending nuptials, but found it increasingly hard because her competition was 
a really sweet person, deserving of his love in every way possible. No such 
luck here. 
Yet while "The Wedding Singer" is wobbly and manipulative, it is consistently 
watchable. A handful of worthwhile elements standout among the haze, most 
notably Jon Lovitz's cameo as a flailing, vulgar stage performer ("Thank you 
... and that ain't no sock in my crotch!") and the running plethora of '80s 
memorabilia (a Rubick's Cube, a DeLorean and some pretty big hair make 
appearances). There's also Alexis Arquette's underused but dazzling supporting 
work as a member of Robbie's entourage who fancies himself a Boy George clone 
-- "Do You Really Want to Hurt Me?" is the only song he knows, and lemme tell 
you, it doesn't go over very well at Bar Mitzvahs. For a truly good 
retro-comedy, rent "Romy and Michele's High School Reunion," because, while 
survivable and even funny in patches, this "Wedding" is something old and not 
much new. 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The story is a no-brainer -- Ford stars as gruff but loveable island 
aviator Quinn Harris, while Heche is career-minded but loveable New York 
magazine editor Robin Monroe. Robin, on a tropical vacation with fiancé 
Frank (David Schwimmer), gets assigned to supervise an emergency photo 
shoot in nearby Tahiti, so she reluctantly hires Quinn to fly her there. 
The plane crashes during a terrible storm, and they immediately find 
themselves stuck in a deserted paradise with few ideas on getting back 
to civilization. A series of unpleasant, often hilarious catastrophes 
leaves little choice but for both members of this unlikely odd couple to 
fall for each other. Meanwhile, back at the resort, Frank is tempted 
himself by Quinn's shapely female tagalong (Jacqueline Obradors). 
That subplot obviously exists to get us rooting for the Quinn-Robin 
pairing, and while it makes for a few good laughs early on, it 
eventually becomes a contrived distraction from the far more engrossing 
misadventures of Quinn and Robin. And since the film spends most of its 
time with the castaways, this flaw is only a minor inconvenience. 
Director Ivan Reitman keeps the pace brisk. At a slim 101 minutes, "Six 
Days, Seven Nights" never wears out its welcome, where a lesser film 
could have felt like it was as long as its title. Michael Browning's 
clever screenplay allows for plenty of notable one-liners (my favorite, 
taken in context, is "You mean _arrrgh_ pirates?"), and though it 
essentially boils down to one mishap after another, they're all quite 
engaging. Even the movie's more "serious" moments are played with a 
wink. 
Heche has been under undeserved fire over whether or not her private 
life with Ellen DeGeneres would affect the "believability" of "Six Days, 
Seven Nights"' heterosexual pairing. (So she's a lesbian. So what. Deal 
with it.) Of course it doesn't, and here, her naysayers are proved wrong 
in a big way. In fact, her chemistry with Ford is what really makes the 
film click; these opposites attract with the utmost, endearing 
electricity. At one point, when the two are discussing the likelihood of 
romantic interest, Heche asks Ford how old he is. After several wrong 
guesses ("Forty-five? _Fifty_?"), he whispers his age to her. "You still 
look good," Heche stammers. "I still _am_ good," Ford replies. She's 
good too, and together, they make "Six Days, Seven Nights" one memorable 
ride. 

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
SLIDING DOORS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Great gimmick, mundane movie. Following this sensational intro, both of 
"Sliding Doors"' story tangents settle into the tedious complications 
and contrived crises that hamper so many contemporary romantic comedies; 
in fact, remove the delectable set-up and the fine acting of Paltrow and 
Scotsman John Hannah ("Four Weddings and a Funeral"), as a potential 
paramour for the newly-unattached Helen of Branch A, and this film has 
practically nothing. True to stints in past flicks, Paltrow shines 
brightly, especially here, while playing opposite the equally charming 
Hannah. Too bad the screenplay fails to give her an alter-ego who 
engages on pretty much any level. 
Still, it could be worse - it could be Branch B, which teams the already 
dull Helen with Lynch's scummy squeeze and Tripplehorn's just-as-scummy 
other woman. There's really nothing wrong with either Lynch or 
Tripplehorn's performances, parse - you get the feeling they're doing 
what they've been instructed by writer/director Peter Howitt - but when 
a movie like this doesn't even conjure up truly hissable antagonists, 
trouble can't be far. And as annoying as it is, Lynch's neurotic 
hem-hawing probably resides among the more lively elements of "Sliding 
Doors," if only because it's a near-perfect aping of Woody Allen - were 
Allen British and 30 years younger, of course. 
Let's at least give Howitt credit for keeping his dual tales straight 
and untangled, even as they overlap from one tedious scene to the next. 
His casting of the lovely always Paltrow is a definite asset - and 
permitting her use of the adorable Cockney accent she flexed in "Emma" 
is also a pro - but one wonders if such an interesting premise had to be 
squandered in service of such a uninteresting plot-and-character combo. 
By the time "Sliding Doors" reaches a weird conclusion that attempts to 
tie the two Helens' fates together, audiences will presumably examine 
their own Branch As and Bs, but maybe only in the sense of where the 
past two hours could have taken them.

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
CAN'T HARDLY WAIT
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Most of the action takes place at a big bash to celebrate Huntington 
High School's graduation day. Attending the beer- and sex-soaked 
festivities are our six main teenagers -- requisite nice guy Preston 
(Ethan Embry), prom queen Amanda (Jennifer Love Hewitt), star jock Mike 
(Peter Facinelli), acerbic wit Denise (Lauren Ambrose), white "homeboy" 
Kenny (Seth Green) and unpopular brainiac William (Charlie Korsmo). 
Kenny, hoping to hook up with a girl and lose his virginity, ends up 
bonding with Denise, who's present out of emotional support for Preston, 
who wants tell Amanda of his longtime crush on her. Amanda has just 
broken up with Mike, who's been tormenting William, who will seek 
revenge against Mike before the night is over. Did you get all that? 
Actually, the gossipy character interaction that composes "Can't Hardly 
Wait"'s various story threads ring true for the most part. (Gosh, I was 
there only two years ago!) It's within the characters themselves where 
the movie begins to falter. That they're walking, talking stereotypes 
really doesn't matter; this seems like a deliberate effort on the part 
of co-directors and -writers Harry Elfont and Deborah Kaplan to emanate 
such "classics" as "The Breakfast Club." But they fail to make their 
entire contemporary cross-section of young people completely 
interesting. Both Michael and William are crudely rendered, and their 
conflict, particularly how it ends, is pretty revolting. The 
Preston-Amanda romance (or lack thereof) is supposed to be Wait's main 
event, but it's hard to care much about either person. 
Preston is solely defined by his affection for Amanda, while, in turn, 
all she does throughout the film is mope and pout. The would-be 
relationship somehow manages to click despite the strange, hindering 
oversight that we're never allowed to see why she's so special to him. 
This is not because we root for Preston, but because we root for Ethan 
Embry, whose endearing, natural and occasionally goofy charm makes up 
for his alter-ego's lack of distinction. Embry ("That Thing You Do!") 
does a fine job of getting the audience to identify with the anxiety, 
longing, hesitancy and heartbreak of first love; if only his Preston 
were fully fleshed-out, he'd be worth following into a "Can't Hardly 
Wait" spin-off feature. 
On the other hand, Denise and Kenny already are; when the film 
eventually breaks up into several superimposing stories, it is only 
theirs that crackles with the completely realized good-time vibe that 
Elfont and Kaplan were probably going for -- and that's very likely 
because Lauren Ambrose and Seth Green have a great deal of fun bringing 
to life the most comedically vibrant party patrons here. So, while the 
material is distinctly uneven, these winning performers, their 
occasionally winning characters and smattering of winning moments make 
the whole package not much of a chore to endure. "Can't Hardly Wait" is 
a decent attempt to make a film that definitively encapsulates a 
decade's worth of teen fads and attitudes. It's just too bad the far 
more successful "Clueless" beat it to the punch three summers ago.

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
Fox Searchlight / 1:30 / 1997 / R (language, nudity)
Cast: Robert Carlyle; Tom Wilkinson; Mark Addy; Steve Huison; Paul 
Barber; Hugo Speer; William Snape; Lesley Sharp; Emily Woof 
Director: Peter Cattaneo 
Screenplay: Simon Beaufoy 
The male dancers in the much-hyped "The Full Monty" are more hamburger 
than beefcake, but the unanticipated surprise is that a group of Average 
Joes -- some shrimpy, some overweight, some, well, just plain average -- 
hesitantly getting down to tunes by Tom Jones, Sister Sledge and Gary
Glitter yields some of the best laughs of the season. What "The 
Birdcage" did for drag performers, The Full Monty does for strippers. A 
lot. 
Robert Carlyle, whose turn as "Trainspotting"'s violent psychopath 
Begbie earned him rave reviews last summer, has the lead role of Gaz, an 
ex-steelworker in Sheffield, England suffering from problems both 
monetary and family-related -- trips to the unemployment agency are 
frequent, the amount of time his ex-wife allows him to spend with his 
son (William Snape) is not. The same goes for his best friend Dave (Mark 
Addy), an overweight security guard who is upset over his current
inability to perform sexually, and his ex-foreman Gerald (Tom 
Wilkinson), who is too afraid to tell his big-spender wife about his 
recently-acquired pink slip. After the Chippendales come to town,
strip down to their boxers and attract a large female crowd, Gaz hatches 
a plan -- he'll recruit a team of his own dancers, and they'll get an 
even larger following by takin' it all off (i.e., the "full
monty"). 
Three more unlikely subjects join Gaz's troupe: Horse (Paul Barber), a 
middle-aged black man who can do the funky chicken with the best of 
them; Lomper (Steve Huison), a timid, suicidal security guard; and Guy 
(Hugo Speer), who makes up for an amazing lack of coordination by having 
quite a full monty himself, if you take my meaning. Together, the 
half-dozen males attempt to cast their daily difficulties and physical 
inadequacies (or surplus thereof, in Guy's place) aside and begin a 
rehearsing schedule that includes choreography, practice, breakaway 
pants and tiny red leather G-strings. 
"The Full Monty" is very similar to last summer's Demi Moore vehicle 
"Striptease" in setup -- her character, like the ones here, turn 
exhibitionist to get themselves out of dire financial and familial
circumstances, and they, like she, react to their situation with more 
than a little trepidation. In execution, however, you can't find two 
more different films. The latter movie was ineffective because it used 
Moore's well-toned and -oiled bod to promote better living through 
stripping. "Monty," however, fully realizes that its basic story is 
plenty rich in comedic value, and mines the predicament for all it's 
worth. Moore's "Striptease" daughter (played by her real-life kid) was 
on hand to obviously condone her actions. A child also plays a part in 
"Monty," but he is allowed be an active component of the humor and has 
no ulterior motives. There are themes here (concerning determination and 
self-confidence), but "The Full Monty" never attains the level of naked
preachiness that "Striptease" tapped into regularly. 
The actors are uniformly good, and thankfully so. If the performances 
weren't as game or farcical, the movie could have easily sank. Carlyle, 
in particular, carries Gaz to memorable lengths. In one early scene, he 
does an impromptu strip to "You Sexy Thing" to demonstrate to his 
cohorts how easy it all is. Haplessly swinging his jacket around his 
head and unintentionally pelting the chortling onlookers with pocket 
change, he creates a character that is both self-effacing and reckless.
Everyone else appears to be having a jolly good time too, whether pelvic 
thrusting their way through the unemployment line or getting moves for 
their routine by studying "Flashdance." 
"The Full Monty" is so intent on delivering a crowd-pleasing strip 
finale that its promised agenda brings around some of its few flaws -- 
several dramatic developments that center around the 
"will-they-or-won't-they?" issue feel unnecessary even if they do (no 
pun intended) flesh out some of the personality of the cast members. And 
for those of you with no ear for thick foreign brogue (think 
"Trainspotting"), most of the dialogue and references will likely stump. 
A few subplots venture into problematic areas; one in particular not 
only feels modish but also underdeveloped and unnecessary. 
Despite those errors, however, "The Full Monty" is still an exhilarating 
comedic blast. It has its head and heart in the right place and succeeds 
in making you either laugh, smile or nod in agreement with every joke or 
sight gag. It even ends on just the right note -- even though some of 
the female audience will reasonably be a tad disappointed. Gaz and 
company may have quite a few shortcomings, but The Full Monty sure 
doesn't. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Switchback (1997)
Paramount / 2:02 / 1997 / R (violence, language, nudie pics)
Cast: Dennis Quaid; Danny Glover; Jared Leto; R. Lee Ermey; Ted Levine; 
William Fichtner 
Director: Jeb Stuart 
Screenplay: Jeb Stuart 
This season needs another serial killer movie like Kathie Lee Gifford 
needs more public devastation. But lo and behold, here comes 
"SwitchBack," and fast on the heels of such stalker fare as "Kiss the 
Girls" and "I Know What You Did Last Summer." But "SwitchBack" is an 
undoubtedly weak genre entry, as the material it covers is old and 
tired, and the filmmakers rarely sustain enough energy to make any of 
the proceedings interesting. 
"SwitchBack" opens with the murder of a babysitter and the abduction of 
the young child she's watching. We learn late in the game that the kid 
belongs to FBI agent Frank LaCrosse (Dennis Quaid), and that the 
kidnapper/killer is a nameless fiend that LaCrosse has been tracking 
across the country for quite a while. He is promptly removed from the 
case, but this conflict of interest doesn't keep him from offering 
pursuit. LaCrosse's most recent trek takes him to a blood-soaked hotel 
room in Amarillo, Texas, where the local sheriff (R. Lee Ermey) is torn 
between his re-election campaign and helping his new ally catch his man. 
In a related aside, former railway worker Bob Goodall (Danny Glover) is 
cruising through the snowbound west in his pinup-plastered (even on the 
seatbelts) El Dorado. Along the way, he picks up -- and subsequently 
saves the life of -- hitchhiking loner Lane Dixon (Jared Leto). This 
tangent isn't a random one, as Bob or Lane will end up either holding a 
piece of the puzzle or turn out to be the killer himself. Or is the 
villain in fact LaCrosse, only pretending to be after the cold-hearted
murderer he knows so much about. 
In a sense, that's half of the basic problem with "SwitchBack." For its 
first hour, the movie presents evidence that any of these three men 
could be the perpetrator, so we're given little insight into who they 
are, likely for fear that we'll learn too much too fast and therefore be 
able to make the proper deduction. But "SwitchBack" then decides to 
explicitly reveal the killer's identity at its midpoint, and the 
following contradictory character motivations muddle both the pacing and 
the generation of suspense. 
Some of the acting is a burdensome area as well, probably because the 
performers were instructed to build personas that are the exact opposite 
of their true selves. What is Danny Glover doing here, grinning and 
yeehawing his way through the messy plot? And Dennis Quaid? (That 
monotone -- stop it!) Ermey is solid in a supporting role that's more 
interesting than the two leads thrown together, but the charismatic Leto 
(Claire Danes' object of affection in "My So-Called Life") is a 
scene-stealer tried and true. 
>From a material standpoint, "SwitchBack" is pretty empty. But even when 
first-time director Jeb Stuart (who wrote "The Fugitive" and "Die Hard") 
doesn't know what to do, he knows what he wants it to look like -- the 
movie provides some great visuals. The set-on-a-train climax looks good 
(even though the action is illogical), and the beautiful, crisp 
cinematography captures the Rockies in all of their icy splendor. Still, 
that's not enough to turn a lump of coal into a diamond, and more than 
the movie's look will end up leaving you cold. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Artisan Entertainment / 1:27 / 1999 / R (language, intensity)
Cast: Heather Donahue; Michael Williams; Joshua Leonard
Director: Daniel Myrick; Eduardo Sanchez
Screenplay: Daniel Myrick; Eduardo Sanchez
In a day when cities never sleep and the crime rates in them soar, the
woods would seem to offer nature's last refuge, a simple, reassuring
solace from the hectic hustle and bustle of the real world. But along
comes "The Blair Witch Project," this year's Little Movie That Could, to
promptly and potently shoot that notion out of the water. If "Blair
Witch" breaks out - and robust pre-release buzz certainly suggests that
it will - expect weekend camping trips to become a thing of the past.
You won't be able to sleep soundly in your own bed. Kiss the wilderness
goodbye forever.
An exercise in mounting dread set in the murky "Black Hills" of
Maryland, "The Blair Witch Project" was the hot ticket at this year's
Sundance Film Festival, inspiring additional screenings and even a
studio bidding war as a result of the blazingly positive word-of-mouth -
raves that must have blindsided the first-time filmmakers of this
impressive independent feature. They are Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez, and their directorial debut - cleverly spun as if the story
actually happened and shot on 16mm and home video to further hit the
horror home - is clearly one to remember. As if you'll be able to forget
it.
Know this going in - that "Blair Witch" is a purely fictional creation -
and the impact is perhaps lessened a bit; to make up for any potential
viewing drawbacks, just assure friends that the events displayed here
are factual, drag them along and watch them squirm. Which isn't to say
that those in the know won't get a mean case of "Witch" willies - the
three main performers in Blair are so authentic that it's easy to
believe in the on-screen dread they expertly convey. Heather Donahue,
Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard never strike false notes as student
filmmakers interviewing the yokels and exploring the terrain of
Frederick County in their quest to document the existence of a local
urban legend.
Unfortunately for them, their trek into the forest takes exceedingly
nasty turns - the less said of which the better. Worth noting: The
movie's concise mythology might leave you craving more. As tension
slowly, steadily builds over "Blair Witch"'s 87-minute run,
disagreements and skirmishes amongst the trio grow in both number and
anxiety, often escalating to shouting matches studded with various
expletives. Realistic, yes, and also redundant. But once "Project" kicks
into high gear for its final third - a non-stop stomach-churner -
there's little time for the cast to catch their breath enough to scream,
let alone swear.
Even with this intense noise-making, genre fans expecting an all-out
splatterfest are sure to be disappointed: "The Blair Witch Project,"
proudly respecting the power of the unseen, assaults the mind with
psychological terror instead of the eyes with explicit gore. Following
suit, Myrick and Sanchez also keep their ghastly antagonist completely
in viewers' imaginations for the duration of the film. Whether it's
intentional or merely a side effect of "Blair Witch"'s shoestring
budget, this game of no-show is a smart, sensical move - and the key to
the movie's scary success.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"The best possible argument for including [a shot of Bruce] Willis'
genitals would have been that the movie, after all, contains everything
else." -Roger Ebert on "Color of Night"

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
IN DREAMS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Things start out strong enough, with cinematographer Darius Khondji's 
stunning camera work guiding viewers into the bowels of a underwater 
ghost town during a creepy prologue that establishes a notably grim tone 
right off the bat. This eerie opulence remains a dazzling display of 
showmanship throughout the entire film - there's even something macabre 
about the way Khondji photographs a rustic, seemingly innocent New 
England autumn - but if there ever was a film that didn't deserve so 
good a polish, it's this one. Don't knock the look, but say what you 
will about the foolish plot, underdeveloped characters and flat 
dialogue. 
Annette Bening, another asset "In Dreams" shouldn't be so lucky to 
boast, gives an increasingly effective performance in a role that 
doesn't do much for her in return. She plays Claire Cooper, a 
Massachusetts children's book illustrator who's plagued by terrifying 
nightmares involving kidnaped children. She thinks these visions are a 
warning knell for horrible, soon-to-be-committed crimes, but neither her 
ho-hum husband (Aidan Quinn) nor the ho-hummer police can muster up the 
sense to take her seriously. This being a thriller, we know that she is, 
in fact, on the money, and it's a credit to Bening's acting that she 
delves equally into Claire's madness and compassion. 
But as soon as a body turns up and Claire has given the authorities 
reason enough to believe her claims, "In Dreams" trades in its nifty 
supernatural chills for a long series of allegedly spooky jolts that 
simply refuse to make sense. Scenes pile up like a car wreck with little 
or no explanation or exposition. Subplots appear and disappear. When 
Claire finally comes face-to-face with our evil murderer (Robert Downey 
Jr.), it turns out his name is Vivian, he's clairvoyant and he's got 
some major issues with mama, a la Norman Bates. "In Dreams" reaches its 
absurdist zenith here, and the climax drags with mumbled revelations and 
laughable twists. 
Some questions, then: What's with the garbage disposal retching 
applesauce? Are the drawings on the wall blood or paint? Who cranked up 
the Andrews Sisters on the CD player and caused the swing to move on its 
own? What about the computer? Does Vivian possess the gift of 
telekinesis in addition to his other powers? Why would he continually 
endanger Claire if she was necessary for his ultimate plan? Is the woman 
in Australia integral to anything? And the aforementioned flooded city - 
what function does that _really_ serve? Sigh. At least in my own dreams, 
I can imagine a better movie where certain talent didn't go to waste.

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
KNOCK OFF
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The backdrop is 1997 Hong Kong, right around the time the country's 
British rule was handed over to China. Van Damme plays Marcus Ray, a 
swarthy designer jeans rep (aren't you just loving this already?) with 
connections to the counterfeit underground, a market that's being 
retooled by an international smuggling ring - they're installing tiny 
"nanobombs" in the front waist buttons! (Please hold all jokes about 
exploding crotches.) Covert CIA agents, turncoat sales executives, 
former KGB thugs and the Russian mafia all somehow figure into "Knock 
Off" as well, but the plot is best described as incomprehensible, 
annoying sound and fury. In fact, if not for the generously wordy 
production notes, a summary of the film's set-up would be downright 
impossible. 
Director Tsui Hark, who previously worked with Van Damme on "Double 
Team," fills "Knock Off" with visual gimmicks that serve only as empty 
distractions. Like a watered-down version of this summer's "Snake Eyes," 
the camera knows no boundaries, traveling through newspapers, telephone 
lines, computers and rifle scopes as if they weren't solid objects; one 
weird shot appears to wander inside a shoe and emerge from a pool table 
pocket. Completely unacceptable action sequences only add to the 
maddening confusion, especially a horrible boat chase that opens the 
film on two left feet. "Knock Off" employs slow-motion, fast-forwards 
and freeze-frames to give its various battles and fight scenes an 
outlandish energy, but all of this flashy excess is completely 
unsynchronized. 
"Knock Off" wouldn't have been so painful to sit through had it at least 
been diverting in the way that only terrible movies can be, but no such 
luck. It's a straight-faced disaster, unbearably squandering a 
potentially juicy filmmaking style and wasting a fine supporting cast 
(Rob Schneider, Lela Rochon and Paul Sorvino), generally making its 
90-minute running time feel like an eternity. Perhaps "Knock Off" 
reaches its intolerably absurdist zenith not long after it starts, when, 
for no discernable reason, Van Damme carts sidekick Schneider around the 
crowded streets of Hong Kong in a rickshaw race. The latter grabs an eel 
from a nearby food stand and begins pelting the former with it, 
screaming, "Move that big, beautiful ass of yours!" If you know what's 
good for you, you'll do the same.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
TriStar / 2:18 / 1997 / PG-13 (harsh language, semi-nudity, a beating)
Cast: Jack Nicholson; Helen Hunt; Greg Kinnear; Shirley Knight; Cuba Gooding, 
Jr.; Skeet Ulrich; Yeardley Smith; Lupe Ontiveros; Jamie Kennedy 
Director: James L. Brooks 
Screenplay: Mark Andrus; James L. Brooks 
There's something about Jack Nicholson that makes him such a unmatched pleasure 
to watch -- his eyes, his voice, his entire demeanor, they all radiate the very 
foundation of cool. His presence is a complex one; pensive and droll at the same 
time, it's hard not to watch some of his more serious work (like in "A Few Good 
Men"'s courtroom climax) and emit nervous chuckles while being wowed at the 
strength of his composure. Nicholson's so versatile, it's a pity he doesn't get 
more comedic roles like the one he plays to perfection in James L. Brooks' "As 
Good As It Gets." Slated for Christmas day opener along side of many other 
high-profile releases, "As Good As It Gets" will likely rely on Nicholson to at 
first draw the crowds in. Then, hopefully, the movie will do the rest. 
Nicholson's middle-aged, obsessive-compulsive writer Melvin Udall
introduces his curmudgeonly self from "Good"'s get-go, as he stalks a
neighbor's pooch while it roams their New York City apartment
building's hallway. After it threateningly lifts its leg one too many
times, Melvin grabs the pup and tosses it down the garbage chute. The
dog's owner, homosexual artist Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear), doesn't
actually witness the event, but has no trouble finding the correct
foundation of blame once his pet turns up. Melvin, you see, has quite
a history of trouble with people in general, much of it stemming from
his snide demeanor -- he's simply not afraid to speak his mind, even
if what comes out is mean, damaging or downright spiteful. But it's
not treatment reserved for those who've wronged him -- Melvin even
mouths off to complete strangers. To a fan who wants to know how he
writes from the female perspective so well: "I think of a man, and
then I take away reason and accountability." To a hipster Jewish
couple sitting in his regular seat at a local diner: "I think people
who speak in metaphors oughta shampoo my crotch." You get the idea.
Melvin's only friend -- or, rather, the only person he can stand -- is
Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt), a waitress with a sickly son. But he even
alienates himself from her after making an extremely discouraging
remark about the kid's health; the child soon becomes so ill that
Carol takes leave from her employment.  Meanwhile, Simon is nearly
killed after walking in on a robbery in his apartment, and Melvin is
forced to take care of the dog he's tried to harm on so many
occasions. This starts something of melting process, and his
companionship with Fido leads to a greater understanding of what it's
like to have a friend. Melvin then tries to make peace with Carol in a
completely humane way, even if his efforts are, at first, rooted in
selfishness.
With his performance here, Nicholson stands to sweep at least the
nominations of major awards contests, if not take the actual trophies
home. His Melvin is quite an irascible, profane concoction, the type
of flawed, juicy character you really enjoy spending your time getting
to know. Hunt, as the female lead, is very much on his level, her
sense of devotion and determination palpable. Carol is probably the
most ordinary (for lack of a better word) person here, but Hunt keeps
her from becoming too ordinary; a scene where she attempts to read
Melvin a thank-you note demonstrates this. It's a welcome relief to
see Kinnear in a role that suits his talents instead of undermining
them (like "Dear God" and "A Smile Like Yours," his two most recent
features). Cuba Gooding, Jr. is fine in a minor part as a friend of
Simon's, and "Scream" alums Skeet Ulrich and Jamie Kennedy pop up --
welcome but so underused -- as male hustlers.
Brooks and Mark Andrus' screenplay is rich in personality and sharp,
memorable one-liners (some of which are painfully hysterical). Careful
consideration has been paid to the three leads -- the
obsessive-compulsive jerk, the down-on-her-luck waitress and the
struggling gay painter could have all been turned into creaky cliches,
which would have made this long picture quite a chore to sit
through. But they're all delicious, original creations, and watching
them help each other towards a mean of self-realization is both
fascinating and funny.  When a romance develops between Melvin and
Carol, it feels alternately forced and stirring -- the former at
perhaps a too-happy climax that fails to offer extensive closure for
Simon, the latter during a splendid dining sequence when Melvin
confesses that knowing her makes him "want to be a better man." The
love angle doesn't really work because it lacks a complete emotional
element (something a la "Jerry Maguire"), and the movie could have
been shorter and a little sweeter if it had trimmed a few things in
that area.
The ads for "As Good As It Gets" read "Brace yourself for Melvin," an
accurate warning considering the character's penchant for ill-tempered
political incorrectness. But brace yourself for Jack, too, because his
Melvin is full of the snazzy acting that attracts Oscar. Forget last
December 25th's awful "The Evening Star," where his cameo was the
liveliest thing in the film. And cross out this past spring's so-so
caper thriller "Blood & Wine," where he was fine but the movie
wasn't. Nicholson's back in "As Good As It Gets," and he's as great as
he gets.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
URBAN LEGEND
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The movie takes place on the creepy campus of New England's Pendleton 
College, where some freaked-out student or faculty member has begun a 
murder spree (check), offing victims according to those titular tales - 
most of them campfire and sleepover favorites - that doubly function as 
social parables (check). Our heroine is beautiful, brainy upperclassman 
Natalie (Alicia Witt, check), who may hold the key to cracking the 
mystery in a dark secret buried deep in her past (check). Our hero is 
handsome journalism major Paul (Jared Leto, check), a studious reporter 
for the school paper who's determined to get this scoop no matter what 
the price (check). Carnage ensues (check, check, check). 
Director Jamie Blanks and screenwriter Silvio Horta start better than 
they finish, with an extended "Scream"-esque prologue that depicts the 
film's first casualty, as a nervous little missy (Natasha Gregson 
Wagner) on a late-night commute loses her head in a vivid variation on 
the killer-in-the-backseat urban legend. Yikes. Most of the time, 
however, the filmmakers' scare tactics include silly false jumps and 
absurd red herrings; just about everyone around Pendleton, for example, 
owns and wears our psycho's hooded Nanook of the North-type costume. 
True, every movie in this genre relies on faux frights to generate 
suspense, but "Urban Legend" plays with them far too often to be very 
effective. 
Yet another disappointing facet of "Urban Legend" is exactly how it 
employs the villain's violent gimmick. Only a handful of the urban 
legends he brings to life seem genuinely inspired, and all the leftovers 
don't seem to fully realize their grisly potential. Horta leaves a lot 
of possibilities unexamined, and ends up having the killer simply 
splatter coed guts across dorm walls with a large axe when he runs out 
of ideas. The campy ending also doesn't satisfy; "Urban Legend"'s 
unmasked villain not only seems physically incapable of pulling off an 
early murder involving a a tree, a noose and a moving car, but they also 
explain their master plan to the incompasitated good guy with ... 
_a_slide_show_? 
At least the motive makes too-pat sense and there are some good in-jokes 
stretched throughout the movie's 98-minute running time; co-star Joshua 
Jackson, of "Dawson's Creek" fame, exits "Urban Legend" earlier than 
expected, but not before turning on a radio to the opening notes of 
Paula Cole's "I Don't Want to Wait." These postmodern references, along 
with the solid acting (particulary Witt and Michael Rosenbaum as a 
party-hardy frat boy), sleek production design and clever concept, add 
up to a so-so slasher film that falls a little short of delivering the 
goods. But delivering isolated scares is another matter entirely. Let's 
just say that, thanks to "Urban Legend," this critic will henceforth be 
keeping a close eye on the backseat of his car.

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
Gramercy / 1:50 / 1998 / R (violence, language, glimpses of nudity, drug use)
Cast: Jeff Bridges; John Goodman; Julianne Moore; Steve Buscemi; David 
Huddleston; Peter Stormare; Tara Reid; Philip Seymour Hoffman; Flea; John 
Turturro; Sam Elliott 
Director: Joel Coen 
Screenplay: Ethan Coen; Joel Coen 
You know you're in for a truly different cinematic experience the moment you 
realize Steve Buscemi has been cast as the movie in question's most normal 
character. Such is the case with "The Big Lebowski," Joel and Ethan Coen's 
first venture since their "Fargo" nabbed nationwide acclaim and a mantlepiece 
of Academy Award nods. There's no need to fear that the Coens suffered 
creative burnout with that accomplishment, because "Lebowski" is an effort 
that makes words like "strange" and "unusual" seem like an understatement. 
Thanks in part to delicious characterization and an all-encompassing sense of 
humor, the film is a smashing success. 
The central oddball here is the Dude (Jeff Bridges), an unemployed cad whose 
ambitions appear to be zilch beyond smoking pot, drinking beer and going 
bowling (are you college students already rooting for him, or what?). One 
night, a pair of thugs break into his house and pee on his carpet, a 
threatening act that's supposed to be carried out against a famous Pasadena 
millionaire (David Huddleston) who shares his birth name -- Jeff Lebowski -- 
with the Dude. Once the Dude realizes this coincidence, he visits the Big 
Lebowski in hopes to claim reparations for his soiled rug, and is back to his 
normal life with alley pals Walter (John Goodman), a hotheaded Vietnam vet, 
and Donny (Buscemi), a mild-mannered surfer, before too long. 
Soon, though, Lebowski's trampy trophy wife Bunny (Tara Reid) is kidnaped and 
held for a hefty ransom, and he turns to the Dude for help. It seems Bunny's 
troubles are related to a line of work she's kept secret from her husband -- 
she's actually an adult film star and is very in debt with a shady producer 
named Jackie Treehorn. The Dude, now on Lebowski's payroll, accepts the offer 
and agrees to handle the money drop; Walter tags along and insists that the 
Dude keep the cash for himself. Chaos obviously ensues, and the Dude 
eventually finds himself in hot water with cops, crooks and Lebowski's 
ultra-eccentric artist daughter Maude (Julianne Moore). 
"The Big Lebowski" deserves to win the Coens the same amount of acclaim that 
"Fargo" did; while that 1996 black comedy was certainly a better film, 
"Lebowski" is at least as breathtakingly imaginative. The movie boasts a 
mile-high absurdity level that sometimes threatens to topple over, but 
thankfully never does. The Coens (Joel directed, Ethan produced and both 
wrote) keep you in stitches as they unravel their exceedingly loopy tale, and 
must be commended for juggling a number of people and subplots one would 
expect to find in a Robert Altman flick. Whether we're watching Bridges fend 
off a marmet in his bathtub or Moore don Viking duds and dance in a Busby 
Berkeley-esque dream sequence, "The Big Lebowski" is immensely lively. There 
are those who will dislike this film, but not because it's boring. 
The cast has a great deal of fun with the bounteous material they're given. 
Bridges exudes a likeable, surprisingly sweet presence; his Dude sure isn't 
the cleanest guy around, but you'd still follow him to another movie. Goodman 
merits 1998's first Oscar consideration, as Walter's manic temper is one of 
"The Big Lebowski"'s many highlights; the same goes for Moore, whose throaty, 
delectable performance as Maude is a hilarious hoot. John Turturro may very 
well steal the movie with his two scenes as a colorful bowler from a rival 
faction. Sam Elliott's rambling narration gets the film off to a solid start. 
And some will recognize Peter Stormare -- "Fargo"'s silent heavy -- as Carl 
Hungus, a porn star who's really a samurai sword-wielding German nihilist and 
has-been pop star. 
Only in its final third does the movie falter, with a couple of loose plot 
threads and some cast members who quickly disappear and never emerge for a 
curtain call. These flaws are forgivable, though -- the Coens have crafted a 
tale so rich with personality that it's hard to look at the final product 
with anything but a big grin on your face. Without a doubt, "The Big 
Lebowski" is the best film so far this year. Sure, we're only three months in 
and the competition ("Deep Rising," "Desperate Measures," "The Wedding 
Singer," etc.) has been pretty bland, but it's still the gospel truth. Maybe 
during next awards season, "Lebowski" won't be a far cry from "Fargo." 
Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
54
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
Studio 54 was a haven for the rich, famous and generally good-looking 
before it closed its doors forever in 1986. Inside, anything went and, 
we are told, everything did. The film's fictional main character is 
Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe, the jerky jock from "I Know What You Did 
Last Summer"), a fresh-faced 19-year-old who dreams of venturing beyond 
the club's velvet rope and coming face-to-face with the wild decadence 
he can only read about in magazines. His wish comes true when Studio 54 
owner Steve Rubell (Mike Myers) spots him amongst a crowd of gawkers one 
night in '79 and permits him passage - but not before he doffs his 
hideous shirt, of course. 
Once inside, Shane becomes seduced by the club's dizzying vortex of sex 
and drugs. He has such a good time that he doesn't want to leave, so he 
seeks employment as a busboy. He quickly becomes friends with Greg 
(Breckin Meyer) and Anita (Salma Hayek), a married couple who work along 
side of him; Greg's a fellow busboy with aspirations to make the big 
money as a Studio 54 bartender, while Anita checks coats but desires a 
recording contract to call her own. After rubbing elbows (among other 
things) with a renowned socialite (Sela Ward) and gaining the personal 
interest of Rubell, Shane begins to ascend to the upper echelons of 54. 
But fame doesn't come without a price. 
"54"'s major shortcomings lie within its handling of the supporting 
players - at a slim hour-and-a-half, the film is too short to take on 
such a multi-character focus, and more than a few balls are dropped in 
the resulting juggling act. Alleged last-minute edits and reshoots are 
more than likely to blame for the occasionally rushed development and 
ambiguous interaction, since "54" sometimes feels like it's missing a 
scene here or there. Nowhere is this more apparent than in Shane's 
relationship with soap opera actress Julie Black (Neve Campbell), a 
frequent Studio 54 patron whom he's long admired from afar. The romance 
is prodded along before it has a chance to transform into something 
special. 
That "54" works despite these limitations, then, is largely due to the 
competence and energy with which it's assembled. Sure, it's shallow, 
slick, sanitized portrait of a bygone age, and sure, we've seen the 
rags-to-riches story gazillions of times, but debut director and 
screenwriter Mark Christopher keeps things moving with lively snapshots 
of the Studio 54 hustle and bustle and an even livelier cast to inhabit 
his bouncy vision. The film boasts some fine comic creativity, the 
pinnacle of which is Disco Dottie ("The Wedding Singer"'s Ellen Dow), an 
elderly dancing queen who plays the loving grandmother in public, but 
slides up to Shane behind 54's closed doors and asks for a "funky little 
treat." 
The solid, sexy cast smooths out - if only while you're caught up in the 
film - any rough spots belonging to their alter-egos or the plot. 
Newcomer Phillippe has the charisma and Joisey accent down pat; he and 
Campbell, as fetching as ever, look so good together it's a shame their 
subplot goes nowhere. Meyer exhibits the congenial appeal that made him 
a delight to watch in "Clueless" (he was the stoner with the 
Joker-smile), while Hayek simply sizzles, especially when leading a 
dance class with the mantra, "One, two, three, attitude!" Sherry 
Stringfield, unidentifiable under big '70s hair, takes on her first 
big-screen gig since she left "ER" as Rubell's accountant, but she's 
criminally underused. 
As the droopy-eyed, drug-addled Steve Rubell, Myers is worth the price 
of admission alone. When he's not playing the life of the party, the 
ex-"Saturday Night Live" comedian strips away all of Rubell's confidence 
and swagger to show a man desperately trying to fill his empty, unhappy 
life with exorbitance; it's a moment worthy of pity when, while lounging 
on a bed of money and vomiting from a particularly heavy evening, he 
attempts to seduce one of his employees. And while his performance is 
largely serious, Myers mixes the empathy with a delicate "Austin 
Powers"-esque wink, thus keeping consistent with "54"'s overall feel - 
gaudy, larger-than-life and satisfyingly ornamental, not unlike a giant 
disco ball.

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
Warner Bros. / 1:52 / 1997 / PG-13 (language, muted violence)
Cast: Dustin Hoffman; John Travolta; Alan Alda; Mia Kirshner; Blythe Danner; 
Ted Levine; Robert Prosky 
Director: Costa-Gavras 
Screenplay: Tom Matthews 
When it comes to depicting the effects of mass media, "Mad City" sure isn't 
pretty. This dull dramatic satire is notable for bagging a pair of solid 
actors -- Dustin Hoffman and John Travolta -- for its leads, but shortchanges 
itself by servicing them with a script about as stable as a mouthful of Pop 
Rocks with a carbonated chaser. As a result, "Mad City" is watchable, but 
never quite as involving or compelling as it strains to be. 
Hoffman plays Max Brackett, an investigative journalist regulated to small 
town-reporting in California after a live TV outburst sets him back with his 
superiors. Along with tagalong intern Laurie ("The Crow: City of Angels"' 
wooden Mia Kirshner), he is assigned to visit the Museum of Natural History 
and get a brief interview with its owner (Blythe Danner, eventually relegated 
to pacing the background but otherwise good). Afterwards, while Max is using a 
urinal -- still wired (thank goodness for plot coincidence!) -- and Laurie is 
waiting outside, fired security guard Sam Baily (Travolta) shows up with a bag 
of TNT and a gun, hoping to talk some sense into his former employer. 
Sam's timing is awful -- there's a group of wily schoolkids touring the 
exhibits -- and the stakes are raised when an accidentally-discharged bullet 
hits someone outside the museum's now-locked interior. But Max, secretly on 
the phone with his television station and reporting in voice-over, sees the 
potentially dangerous situation as both an enormous ratings-grabber and a 
chance for him to reclaim former career glory. Once discovered by an 
increasingly-weary and confused Sam -- and angered police, parents and 
citizens have surrounded the building -- Max manipulates him into a standoff 
with the authorities and arranges for live TV coverage as it ensues. 
Crafting solid characters seems to be a problem for first-time screenwriter 
Tom Matthews, as neither of these two leads have what it takes to keep us 
interested. Sam Baily would have hit home harder had Matthews taken some time 
to fully develop the guy. It's hinted at, but never explained, that Sam has a 
darker side than we are made privy to (there might have been a just reason for 
his dismissal), so, basically, he has been sanitized in order to make him 
tragic -- what we see and what we (briefly) hear contradict each other. 
Moreover, Sam's such a likeable cad that we know he's never going to snap and 
harm any of his prisoners; doing this keeps director Costa-Gavras from any 
child-in-jeopardy exploitation, but it also results in a huge lack of tension 
-- this has got to be one of the most laid-back hostage situations ever. Max 
Brackett, on the other hand, starts off interesting as the movie sets him up 
with numerous reprehensible traits. It becomes all too clear too fast, 
however, that they're only established so he can have a change of heart by the 
movie's end. From then on, everything plays out as expected, right down to a 
too-fake Larry King interview with Sam and Max and a totally contrived final 
scene that's supposed to illustrate (I think) how the media can swallow the 
soul of even the most innocent people. 
At least "Mad City" sports a nice technical feel, a handful of good scenes 
(there's one where a network affiliate suggests that Max get Sam to surrender 
on Thursday night -- a time when ratings are weak) and Alan Alda chewing the 
scenery as an odious field veteran. And of course it's an appropriate showcase 
for two strong performances from Hoffman and Travolta. Ironically, both actors 
have covered similar territories in previous vehicles -- the former starred in 
the news spoof "Hero" and the latter played a laid-off simpleton in "White 
Man's Burden." "Mad City" isn't as bad as either of those tankers, but 
considering the talent involved and the film's satirical potential (think "To 
Die For"), it's soft news that really could have been hard-hitting. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Grease (1978)
GREASE
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
A very skinny John Travolta and a very young Olivia Newton-John have the 
respective leads of Danny Zuko and Sandy Olsson, and their pairing still 
ranks as one of screendom's most effervescently charming. For those 
eight of you who aren't familiar with the story, here's a brief recap: 
Greaser bad boy Danny and Aussie good girl Sandy are reunited for their 
1959 senior year at Rydell High after a brief fling during the summer; 
both thought she was going to return to her native continent before 
school started, but both were wrong. Sandy tries to rekindle their 
relationship, but Danny's too cool a cat to fall for her wholesome 
appeal in front of his T-Bird buddies (including Jeff Conaway). So Sandy 
hooks up with a gang herself -- the Pink Ladies, headed by sassy, sexy 
Rizzo (Stockard Channing, just superb as an independent woman well ahead 
of her time) -- and Danny, who still really feels love for her, attempts 
a compromise of ideals in order to win her back. 
The drag race finale is yet something of a drag, and I never have 
thought much of "Greased Lightening," the film's big "guy" number (that 
choreography -- ack!), but "Grease"'s flaws amount too few to carp. The 
movie's first showpiece is "Summer Nights," where Danny and Sandy 
separately recount wildly different versions of their fun-in-the-sun 
romance. Not only is "Nights" tremendously catchy, but it's also a smart 
look at how men and women see the same events with varying eyes. There 
has yet to be a live-action musical sequence that rivals the one-two 
punch of "You're the One That I Want" and "We Go Together," "Grease"'s 
euphoric cappers. All this and some of the most pleasing moments come 
from the smaller, quieter moments; the Oscar-nominated "Hopelessly 
Devoted to You" is a lovely showcase for Newton-John, and Channing's 
lamenting ballad "There Are Worse Things I Could Do" is one of 
"Grease"'s most unjustly overlooked tunes. 
The soundtrack is remastered (though Travolta still hits that awful high 
note at the end of "Nights") and the restored widescreen allows us to 
see previously pan-and-scanned-out choreography, but nothing else has 
changed -- no computer-generated backgrounds, no outtakes or new musical 
numbers, no Jabba the Hutt cameos. And it's a testament to "Grease"'s 
timeless success that nothing needs to be changed -- it's the same 
all-around blast it's always been, with an appealing cast in a fun story 
told with great music. To '90s viewers, "Grease" will probably recall 
disco and bellbottoms as much as it made its original audience nostalgic 
for doo-wop and poodle skirts. But regardless of what decade it 
transports us to, we can all agree on one thing -- without a doubt, 
"Grease" is still the word.

Title
Review for Love Letter, The (1999)
Rating: ** (out of ****)
DreamWorks SKG / 1:28 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, sex)
Cast: Kate Capshaw; Ellen DeGeneres; Tom Everett Scott; Tom Selleck;
Julianne Nicholson; Geraldine McEwan; Blythe
Danner; Gloria Stuart
Director: Peter Ho-Sun Chan
Screenplay: Maria Maggenti
Signed, sealed and delivered as the estrogen alternative to that boy
behemoth known as "Star Wars," "The Love Letter" makes for smart weekend
counter-programming - but number this keen calendar positioning among
relatively few claims to brains. Still, it might go over, what with
women pining for a romantic refresher from all the "Star"-fueled hype,
some fairly imaginative marketing possibilities ("This weekend, make
Love,' not War'") and a curiosity factor stemming from the following
moral debate: Does Steven Spielberg catch the movie featuring wife Kate
Capshaw, "Letter"'s lead and producer, or the movie helmed by 800-lb.
gorilla pal and frequent collaborator George Lucas?
Actually, he's safe on both counts: Though Lucas' is the better film by
far, Spielberg would still be able to honestly compliment his beloved on
a job well done - especially since her easy-to-take performance breathes
dimension into a direly underwritten character. Capshaw looks and
performs great as Helen McFarquhar, a 40-ish divorcee and bookstore
owner in a picaresque New England hamlet called Loblolly by the Sea.
Life here is best described as leisurely, which is also a fine way to
summarize the movie itself. Perhaps "Letter"'ll play better on video,
where relaxed viewers can more so enjoy its sluggish (if sporadically
amusing) rhythms curled on their couch with iced tea and Melba toast.
During a mail sort on an already steamy summer day, Helen discovers a
four-paragraph profession of passion unsigned and anonymously dedicated.
At first, she assumes the collegiate hunk (Tom Everett Scott) she
recently hired for seasonal employment is pulling secret-admirer duties,
while he, thinking the exact opposite when the note floats into his
possession, flirts along aloofly. This relationship - the central story
thread of many - steers clear of heavy, "How Helen Got Her Groove
Back"-esque territory despite a considerable age difference between the
photogenic participants. If little else, at least "The Love Letter"
wisely doesn't present this fling as anything but lust amidst
dustjackets.
The titular typing then falls into a variety of other hands, each reader
figuring their own self as the intended recipient. This leads to a
gentle comedy of errors that gets less and less funny the further it
chugs along, diminishing returns which might have something to do with a
tart supporting turn by Ellen DeGeneres. As Helen's acerbic co-worker,
DeGeneres spouts off enough clever lines to keep the early scenes alive
and snappy, but suddenly - and all too soon - her screen time is
drastically reduced following a quickie quandary that's very indicative
of "The Love Letter"'s inability to develop matters to the fullest. The
movie only runs a scant 88 minutes.
With its ace joker temporarily out of the way, the film flails pretty
much through the end credits, though there are a few good scenes left
involving Capshaw and Scott. Tom Selleck, demonstrating appropriate
subtlety, shows up for just enough of the movie to ensure prominent
billing, but his role - an ex-beau of Helen's coping with mid-life
strain - remains at a frustrating distance. Class acts Blythe Danner and
"Titanic"'s Gloria Stuart also briefly swing by as Capshaw's mom and
grandmom, respectively, though their impact on the drama is, in one
case, non-existent, and, in the other, highly questionable. This cast
may be a keeper, but return the rest of "The Love Letter" to sender.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"The best possible argument for including [a shot of Bruce] Willis'
genitals would have been that the movie, after all, contains everything
else." -Roger Ebert on "Color of Night"

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
Rating: *** (out of ****)
New Line / 1:46 / 1999 / PG-13 (sex jokes, language)
Cast: Brendan Fraser; Alicia Silverstone; Christopher Walken; Sissy
Spacek; Dave Foley; Scott Thomson
Director: Hugh Wilson
Screenplay: Bill Kelly; Hugh Wilson
Last October's "Pleasantville" found the innocent 1950s going up against
the liberal '90s and getting creamed, with teens from modern times
reforming the pristine and pure "Father Knows Best"-esque universe they
found themselves trapped in. The new comedy "Blast From the Past," then,
covers similar terrain in reverse, featuring a hero whose life-long
experience with early-'60s society and mores throws him into mass
culture shock when he's suddenly thrust into a contemporary setting. The
story, once set up, sounds incredibly goofy, but "Blast From the Past"
is somehow a blast for the present that fondly recalls the bygone era
with cozy warmth and comfortable affection.
In shying away from "Pleasantville"'s progressive preachiness - it's one
big flaw - "Past" has frothy charm to spare, and a lot of it comes from
the impeccable actors. That Brendan Fraser and Alicia Silverstone are
given the movie's romantic leads virtually promises a strong turnout of
loyal young fans, but the big surprise is how good they are - both apart
and together. He, too often cast as cartoonish lunkheads, radiates
nice-guy appeal in a performance guaranteed to induce smiles and grins;
she, who followed her stellar "Clueless" debut with less-than-stellar
turns in tripe like "Hideaway" and "Excess Baggage," gets terrific
mileage out of a smallish role.
Christopher Walken and Sissy Spacek show up as Fraser's good-natured but
jaded parents, and their too-fun work here is the movie's equivalent of
a bonus prize. Writer Bill Kelly and co-scribe/director Hugh Wilson
("The First Wives Club") play all their best ideas first, resulting in a
terrific first hour that then begins to drag as it nears its conclusion;
after an inspired sequence set in a swing club, some frustrating
plotting takes place (that interlude with social services - huh?). But
the cast is the real blast in "Past," and they're alive and shining even
when the film isn't.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Now you'd think that Karla the roommate would figure out that since
Julia has been living for two years with terrifying nightmares, and
since most of her friends and neighbors have been filleted by the
Fisherman, it would be unwise to sneak into her room in the dark, make
suspicious noises and hide in the closet. Roommates do not think like
this in slasher movies." -Roger Ebert on "I Still Know What You Did Last
Summer"

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
New Line / 2:32 / 1997 / R (violence, drugs, sex, nudity, language)
Cast: Mark Wahlberg; Burt Reynolds; Julianne Moore; Don Cheadle; Heather
Graham; John C. Reilly; William H. Macy; Nicole Parker; Luis Guzman;
Philip Baker Hall; Alfred Molina; Nina Hartley
Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Screenplay: Paul Thomas Anderson
Disco balls, big hair and bellbottoms -- it's the fashionably gory glory
days of the 1970s in Paul Thomas Anderson's sophomore feature "Boogie
Nights." The movie is already garnering raves and even early fall Oscar
buzz, but this critic was left with a slightly sour taste in his mouth.
By no means a poor film, or even an unsatisfactory one, "Boogie Nights"
manages to keep momentum spinning for over an hour before giving into
shaky ground in its final last half. Don't get me wrong -- there's much
rich material within its long running time of 150 minutes-plus, but it's
being dazzlingly overrated.
Mark Wahlberg (formerly of Marky Mark fame and a lead turn in the stinky
"Fear") plays the main character here, a 17-year-old San Fernando Valley
busboy named Eddie Adams. Following an escape from his relentlessly
tough home life, Eddie falls into the vortex of seemingly painless
pleasure that is the adult film industry in '77. His recruiter, porn
director Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds), is amazed by the kid's prowess
on-screen, his benevolence off-screen and his general contributions to
the business. Of course, his 13-inch endowment doesn't hurt, either.
The other characters that make up the extended family of entertainers
are as follows: Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), Jack's wife and the den
mother of their small clan; Rollergirl (Heather Graham), a hot starlet
who's willing to take off everything but her skates; Buck Swope (Don
Cheadle), a veteran performer who dreams of marriage, children and his
own electronics store; Reed Rothchild (John C. Reilly), an actor who
quickly forms a bond with Eddie; and Little Bill (William H. Macy), a
technical worker who can never quite come to terms with the people and
situations around which he works.
Jack plans to redefine the genre by putting plot into porn -- giving
viewers reason to stay in their theater seats after they, uh, don't have
the motivation to. Eddie plays an integral part in this quest to make a
film that is "true and right and dramatic" -- he changes his name to the
highly suggestive Dirk Diggler and takes the starring role of a James
Bond-type hero with more of a focus on the women and sex than the
gadgets and foreign intrigue (sample title: "Brock Landers 7: Oral
Majesty"). But as Dirk, Jack, Amber and company make the transition into
the early 1980s, the pornography progresses from film to video and
their happy lives and sense of togetherness are threatened by ego,
violence, drugs and other extremes.
"Boogie Nights" tells a story that depends on its characters and for the
most part, it succeeds. Wahlberg, Reynolds, Moore and Reilly are all
fantastic creations: funny, flawed and full of life. Some members of the
supporting cast come across with colorful personalities even though they
aren't fully developed -- they're allowed to stay too much in the
background. You come away wishing you got to know Macy, Graham and
Cheadle better, because what you're given are interesting details that
don't amount to anything especially complete. All of the actors are
strong, including a performance by Reynolds that ranks among his best
work.
What restrains the movie from achieving a higher ground is a quite
jarring shift in tone, which takes place around the time that Little
Bill makes a disturbing resolution to the ongoing dilemma of constantly
finding his wife (actual porn star Nina Hartley) in compromising
positions with other men. From then on, "Boogie Nights" is less a satire
of the industry than a commentary on its evils, as these characters are
sucked down into a vortex of drugs, death and lascivious sex crimes. The
movie's final sequence is hopeful, but its sure-to-be-controversial last
frame is rather unnecessary.
Flaws aside, "Boogie Nights" is still a subversive, gutsy release from
New Line Cinema, a production company that usually specializes in ho-hum
genre pictures. It's a visual dynamo, a credit guaranteed from
Anderson's brilliant opening, a single-shot journey inside a disco club
that introduces us to most of the movie's main players. That the story
eventually spins out of control is forgivable, because the film is such
a technical marvel, accurate in its depiction of the 1970s from clothes
to hair to music (I still haven't stopped humming Three Dog Night's
"Mama Told Me Not to Come"). And even the movie's fumble of overlength
doesn't hinder it from being fully alive, because "Boogie Nights" is an
admirably enthusiastic jolt of cinematic caffeine -- you're never bored
with it.
When all said and done, "Boogie Nights" is an admirable picture, even if
its shortcomings (no pun intended) amount to more than expected. The
acting is distinguished, and the storytelling, for a long while, is
extremely well-crafted; there's just no reason to stretch everything out
to less than 30 minutes shy of three hours. In the end, "Boogie Nights"
is pretty similar to Dirk Diggler -- quite a sight but little more than
the sum of its parts, however nifty they might be.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
DreamWorks SKG / 1:42 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, thematic material)
Cast: Sandra Bullock; Ben Affleck; Maura Tierney; Steve Zahn; Blythe
Danner; Ronny Cox; Meredith Scott Lynn; David Strickland
Director: Bronwen Hughes
Screenplay: Marc Lawrence; Ian Bryce; Donna Roth
Sandra Bullock's girl-next-door sunniness is appealing in the same way
that Ben Affleck's swarthy-but-affable ease is appealing, so it's
reasonable to presume that a movie featuring their respective appeals
will be, um, appealing as well. "Forces of Nature," one such romantic
comedy, lives up to that precursor despite saddling these actors with
roles that might seem to contradict their proven likability: She's a
wild child with hefty emotional baggage while he's a harried,
straightforward bundle of nerves. The casting goes completely against
type, but Bullock and Affleck's stars shine brightly even when the film
gets dangerously dim - which is also, unfortunately, how it ends up.
The story is basically composed of a string of natural and man-made
disasters that lead this nice-looking but evidently mismatched pair to
profess their mutual affection for each other. So far, so fun, as this
much of Forces delivers largely entertaining fluff. What happens in the
dire aftermath, however, is best described as forced. It's not fair for
a movie to be amusing within the confines of several standard cinematic
conventions - the Meet Cute, the Opposites Attract and the Road Movie
among them - and then bungle the moment of truth and subsequent climax
and finale. They suck the mirth right out of the air and might leave a
bad taste in your mouth.
Thank goodness for Bullock and Affleck, then, who click even in the most
contrived of circumstances. They first share screen time on a New
York-to-Georgia flight that, due to a nasty accident involving a seagull
and a wing engine, never gets off the ground. Affleck's Ben (no stretch
there) already has the jitters because he's en route to his opulent
wedding in Savannah, and said mishap doesn't exactly set his mind at
ease - especially after grandpa keeled over at the bachelor party only
to confide on his hospital bed that marriage is nothing but constricting
chaos.
Despite these two seemingly isolated incidents of ill will, Ben hooks up
with Bullock's fellow passenger and free spirit Sarah (what, they didn't
want to call her Sandra?) for alternate travel strategies - she's headed
his way, so he figures he'll share the joys of outrageous fortune. But
one bit of bad luck turns into another, and soon, Ben and Sarah have
gotten arrested, robbed and quite wet from the torrential downpour of
rain and hail that follows them almost about everywhere - shot as
beautiful visual compositions by "Out of Sight" cinematographer Elliot
Davis - and these are merely a few of the crises they endure while
trying to go south.
Such lively misadventures, which comprise a bulk of "Forces of Nature,"
take a cue from "Planes, Trains & Automobiles" in their growing
absurdity and vehicular setting - aside from the aforementioned airliner
tragedy, Ben and Sarah inadvertently run into railroad trouble and hitch
a ride from a friendly hophead, though not in that order. Meanwhile,
"Forces of Nature" cuts back and forth between their plight and Ben's
bride, waiting by the phone and expecting the worst. This fairly
thankless part is filled by Maura Tierney, who was also given the
thankless part of Jim Carrey's wife in "Liar Liar," and she's further
hampered by an equally thankless subplot in which a successful ex tempts
her.
Of course, that flummox would be forgivable had Affleck and Tierney's
guaranteed nuptial-day reunion and its aftermath rang true, but for
once, an unpredictable, anti-Hollywood send-off flops. A powerful
hurricane hits the area just in time for this conclusion, and tosses the
colorful decor about in its mighty winds like rainbow confetti. It's a
pretty sight, but it makes one wonder if anybody in front of the camera
pays attention to the Weather Channel, or if anybody behind it couldn't
think of a better way to cap off an otherwise enjoyable movie.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Remember that old college boy joke about how, after sex, the ideal
women turns into a pizza and a six-pack? In this movie, the ideal man
turns into a vibrator and Ted Koppel." -Roger Ebert on "Let's Talk About
Sex"

Title
Review for Thousand Acres, A (1997)
Touchstone / 1:44 / 1997 / R (language, incest, brief nudity)
Cast: Michelle Pfeiffer; Jessica Lange; Jennifer Jason Leigh; Jason 
Robards; Colin Firth; Keith Carradine; Kevin Anderson; Pat Hingle; John 
Carroll Lynch 
Director: Jocelyn Moorhouse 
Screenplay: Laura Jones 
Sibling rivalry. Terminal illness. Extramarital affairs. Mental 
sickness. Parental conflicts. Child abuse. What sounds like a full week 
of Oprah Winfrey episodes is actually the material that "A Thousand 
Acres" covers in less than two hours. And the similarities to talk shows 
don't end there -- like that particular one, "Acres" is stark, 
manipulative, quite watchable and easy to digest. It's nothing
great, but at least rich performances make it worth its weight in acting 
gold. 
The film opens with a gathering of the Cook clan: Patriarch Larry (Jason 
Robards) and his three daughters -- Ginny (Jessica Lange), Rose 
(Michelle Pfeiffer) and Caroline (Jennifer Jason Leigh) -- and their 
respective families. On a rather impulsive whim, Larry decides to divide 
his 1,000 acre Iowa farm -- his pride and joy -- between his offspring. 
While Ginny and Rose are agree, Caroline reacts with some trepidation. 
Larry responds by shutting her out of his life altogether. 
His seemingly too-strong overacting gives way to a plethora of events 
straight out of so many TV movies-of-the-week. Long-buried secrets 
emerge and are confronted, leading to the questioning of his very mental 
health. Loyalties flip-flop, and before too long, the sisters are not 
only doubting their father but each other as well. In the middle of all 
this is an impromptu wedding for Caroline and marital woes for both 
Ginny and Rose, brought about by the resurfacing of an old friend played 
by "The English Patient"'s Colin Firth. 
It didn't surprise me to learn that "A Thousand Acres" takes its source 
from a previously-published work, but I would have guessed its roots 
were of the stage variety rather than a Pulitzer Prize-winning novel. In 
execution, it feels just like a play -- you're watching these people do 
things from a distance. The characters themselves are interesting, but 
it's hard to be involved in the unfolding events because you've seen 
them one too many a time already. Some subplots feel underdeveloped and 
some main characters end up forgotten in "Acres"' last third, and that's 
what keeps it from achieving a higher emotional reaction. 
Still, "A Thousand Acres"' selling point seems to be a plethora of 
robust acting from its four main stars, and that's what carries it 
across the finish line. Pfeiffer plays Rose as a hard-nosed truth-sayer, 
which contrasts Lange's naive restraint. Their scenes together -- and 
there are many -- fondly recall the stellar work Meryl Streep and Diane 
Keaton did in the somewhat similarly-themed "Marvin's Room," and A 
Thousand Acres effectively becomes a showcase for their intense,
beautiful vitality. Both Robards and Leigh offer fine support, but their 
roles seem to become less significant (especially Leigh's) as "Acres" 
nears its conclusion. 
Shot attractively and with a potent undercurrent of tension, "A Thousand 
Acres" extends plenty of reasons (namely Lange and Pfeiffer) to not let 
it slip through the fall movie offerings cracks even as it isn't a 
standout of the season. "A Thousand Acres" would probably like to pluck 
a thousand heartstrings, and although it fails in that specific area 
because of an overall familiarity and an eventual lack of strong 
material, it ultimately passes the test. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
This "modern immorality tale," as the ads go, finds drama coach Jerry 
(Ben Stiller) growing sexually distant from his girlfriend Terri 
(Catherine Keener). Jerry decides to initiate an affair with Mary (Amy 
Brenneman), the wife of his best friend Barry (Company alum Aaron 
Eckhart), and when Terri finds out, she has a fling of her own with 
Cheri (Nastassja Kinski), a sexy art gallery employee who also catches 
the eye of Cary (Jason Patric), a buddy of Jerry and Barry's. The long 
100 minutes it takes for these people to out-nasty each other feels like 
group therapy with a bunch of self-centered whiners or, worse, an 
episode of "Jerry Springer" sans schlock value. 
All of the bed-hopping, put-downs and duplicitous characters, and "Your 
Friends & Neighbors" isn't even amusing in a "Melrose Place" sort of 
way. The blame may be in the repetitious screenplay, but it's certainly 
not in the acting - this ensemble is so excruciatingly believable that 
you'd just like to give everyone a good smack. Particularly whup-worthy 
is Patric's Cary, a repugnant lothario who owns both the funniest (when 
his occupation is revealed) and the creepiest (when he tells about his 
"best lay") scenes of this so-called black comedy. Stiller and Eckhart 
are close behind as creeps with different horniness outlets, but neither 
matches Patric's vile ferocity. 
The women's roles aren't much nicer, save for Kinski, who stays on the 
underdeveloped side of things. Keener and Brenneman are fine as 
respectively curt and "sensitive" gals, but what's missing here is a 
reason to care about all of this depraved behavior. In "In the Company 
of Men," that sympathy generated from a deaf secretary who was the 
victim in a shocking scheme hatched by to cruel co-workers. The 
antagonists' behavior in that film sucked you into an uncommonly 
discomforting story, while here it sends these five irritating folks 
through terribly misguided motions over and over and over again. Save a 
seat for me, Fred. I'm coming with you.

Title
Review for Nightwatch (1998)
NIGHTWATCH
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
------------------------------------------------------------------------Rating: **1/2 (out of ****) 
Dimension / 1:45 / 1998 / R (language, violence, corpse nudity, elements 
of necrophilia)
Cast: Ewan McGregor; Josh Brolin; Patricia Arquette; Nick Nolte; Lauren 
Graham; Alix Koromzay; Brad Dourif; John C. Reilly 
Director: Ole Bornedal 
Screenplay: Ole Bornedal; Steven Soderbergh
------------------------------------------------------------------------After sitting on a shelf for well over a year, Ole Bornedal's 
"Nightwatch" is finally being released with little fanfare. Word had it 
that Dimension Films, the movie's distributor, smelled a big dud and 
waited until the competition was weak to see it open. But because 
"Nightwatch" is actually a decent thriller, it's probably closer to the 
truth to say that the studio was eager to see their film ride the 
coattails of star Ewan McGregor -- soon to be seen as a young Ben Kenobi 
in George Lucas' "Star Wars" prequels -- to a moderate, brisk payoff. 
Either way, modern horror is in thanks to the "Scream" films, and 
"Nightwatch" creates a suitably scary atmosphere that renders it 
watchable even when the plot degenerates into a blood-soaked mess. An 
eyeball here, a severed thumb there -- when everything turns gory, who 
needs a coherent story? 
In this reworking of Bornedal's Dutch "Nattevagten," McGregor plays 
Martin Bells, a young law student strapped for cash and study time. A 
job as the night watchman of the local morgue appears to give him the 
solution to both of his problems -- until, that is, strange things begin 
to happen. A serial killer is leaving his mark on the city, and his 
victims' bodies appear to have a life of their own. Making matters worse 
is a series of clues that leads the investigator (Nick Nolte) in charge 
of the case to suspect that Martin is the mastermind behind the murders. 
While Martin slowly realizes he's obviously the victim of a set-up, 
distrust falls on all those around him. Is the real killer his tough-guy 
best friend (Josh Brolin)? Is it the seemingly sinister mortician (Brad 
Dourif) who keeps late hours? Does his dedicated girlfriend (Patricia 
Arquette) know more than she lets on? Maybe, maybe not. 
It's very easy to peg the identity of "Nightwatch"'s resident psycho, so 
much that another character becomes a red herring to the obvious 
extreme. (For the record, I had everything correctly figured out a 
half-hour in, and I'm usually not that ahead of the ball.) This would 
have been acceptable had the movie not run out of surprises at its 
midpoint, but "Nightwatch" reveals too much too soon and grinds to a 
halt thereafter. When the murderer explicitly makes himself known by 
stepping out from behind a bathroom door, you think, "Yeah, and ... ?", 
and anticipate a few more twists that are maddeningly never delivered. 
When all is finally out in the open about the him and his past, ask 
yourself how he got where he is now, or how he plans to get away with 
what he does in the movie's climax. "Nightwatch"'s convoluted tale 
sports a whole lotta holes -- it's definitely not for theatrical 
nitpickers. 
On the other hand, "Nightwatch" does offer some resilience. As far as 
sheer, creepy ambience is concerned, the movie's got the most effective 
feel since "Seven." The morgue is where most of "Nightwatch" unfolds, 
and the film actually works the best when it lets McGregor roam its 
eerily fluorescent-lit halls in nervous silence; some of these sequences 
are so genuinely frightening that you wish they were put to use in a 
better movie. The same goes for the camaraderie between the well-played 
McGregor and Brolin characters -- they're constantly trying to one-up 
each other with dares, practical jokes and other games. It's an 
interesting friendship, one, of course, that will serve the serial 
killer storyline before everything is over. The cast does fine work, 
even when some players (particularly Arquette) are underused. These 
strengths outweigh the flaws, but just barely. While "Nightwatch" may 
end with a whimper, at least it starts out with a bang. 
------------------------------------------------------------------------Š 1998 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Suggestions, please, for the fourth movie in the series. How about 
Look Who's Talking Back,' in which the audience gets its turn?" -- 
Roger Ebert on "Look Who's Talking Now"

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
MAFIA!
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
The joke is on mob movies this time, specifically "The Godfather" 
trilogy, as the all-powerful Don Vincenzo Cortino (the late Lloyd 
Bridges) comes to a realization that his crime empire must be handed 
down to one of his two sons -- noble war hero Anthony (Jay Mohr in the 
Al Pacino role) or coke-addicted psychopath Joey (Billy Burke in the 
James Caan role). There's even a Diane Keaton-esque girlfriend 
(Christina Applegate, nicely deadpan) for the former, appropriately 
named Diane. Some of "Casino" is rolled into the story as well, as 
Anthony starts business in Las Vegas and courts a sassy showgirl (Pamela 
Gidley, a dead ringer for Sharon Stone) who does a pole routine that 
could get her into the Olympics. This surreal physical display is one of 
the film's funniest moments. 
For those who've never seen "The Godfather" -- get thee to a video 
store! -- or fear that the genre is too dated to milk for laughs, 
"Mafia!" also pokes fun at everything from "Striptease" to Barney to 
"The Lost World" to Riverdance to "Forrest Gump." (The best riff on 
"Gump," by the way, is not the "Run, florist, run!" bit showcased 
prominently on the previews, but rather a verbal exchange that ends with 
the line, "I have a son?") A great deal of these jokes work, though 
"Mafia!" sometimes pushes a visual too far, like the scene at a wedding 
reception where the band mistakenly believes a dancer is doing the 
Macarena, when, in fact, he's being jerked around by the hail of 
gunfire. It's funny to begin with, but the length of the sight gag 
sledgehammers away its effectiveness. 
Most of the time, however, the over-the-top approach is played just 
right, piling gag on gag until the comedy bases are loaded and a home 
run is scored; a prime example would be a send-up of "The English 
Patient" that segues into a free-for-all puke party a la "Stand by Me." 
The closing credits hide subliminal jokes ranging from mock-throwaway 
trivia about the cast ("Fun fact: Actress Christina Applegate invented 
radar") to a great rewrite of the American Humane Association 
disclaimer. Even the press kit gets in on the silliness -- the movie 
production information is written completely in Italian, while Abrahams' 
bio states that "in addition to [the his films, he] has also attended 
screenings of Gandhi,' Wall Street,' Dances With Wolves' and The 
Silence of the Lambs.'" 
Not much else can be said about "Mafia!" To criticize the indifferent 
plot or thin characters would be a pretty pointless task since their 
sole function is to provide something to hang all of the funny business 
on, and, in this case, the funny business is worthwhile for those of us 
who like this sort of thing. The genre that "Mafia!" belongs to is a 
difficult one to review because of its subjectivity -- either you find 
this sort of thing amusing or you don't. I did, and enough that I can 
recommend it as an enjoyable summer diversion, though it's nowhere near 
as enjoyable as many of its ancestors. Speaking of lineage, frequent 
Abrahams collaborators David Zucker and Pat Proft have similar fare due 
in the coming weeks with "BASEketball" and "Wrongfully Accused," 
respectively. Here's to hoping they're at least on par with "Mafia!"
